Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2603.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: ARTICLE 1 APPROPRIATIONS Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS.new text end new text begin The sums shown in the columns marked "Appropriations" are appropriated to the agencies and for the purposes specified in this article. The appropriations are from the general fund, or another named fund, and are available for the fiscal years indicated for each purpose. The figures "2026" and "2027" used in this article mean that the appropriations listed under them are available for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, or June 30, 2027, respectively. "The first year" is fiscal year 2026. "The second year" is fiscal year 2027. "The biennium" is fiscal years 2026 and 2027. new text end new text begin APPROPRIATIONS new text end new text begin Available for the Year new text end new text begin Ending June 30 new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin 2027 new text end Sec. 2. new text begin ATTORNEY GENERALnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 391,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 391,000 new text end new text begin This amount is for increased staffing within the Medicaid Fraud Division. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIESnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 5,883,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 2,030,000 new text end new text begin This amount is to increase capacity for compliance efforts and improve program integrity and service delivery for the child care assistance program. new text end new text begin The base for this appropriation is $2,030,000 in fiscal year 2028 and $2,029,000 in fiscal year 2029. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATIONnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 550,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 550,000 new text end new text begin This amount is for fraud prevention and detection at the department. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICESnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 21,955,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 23,676,000 new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Central Office Operations new text end new text begin 21,955,000 new text end new text begin 26,079,000 new text end new text begin (a) Finance and Management new text end new text begin 21,955,000 new text end new text begin 26,079,000 new text end new text begin Of this amount, $5,658,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $5,993,000 in fiscal year 2027 are for program integrity investigative analytics infrastructure at the department. The base for this appropriation is $4,736,000 in fiscal year 2028 and $4,707,000 in fiscal year 2029. new text end new text begin (b) The base for this appropriation is $19,660,000 in fiscal year 2028 and $19,474,000 in fiscal year 2029. new text end new text begin (c) Positions, salary money, and nonsalary administrative money may be transferred within the Department of Human Services as the commissioner considers necessary with the advance approval of the commissioner of management and budget. The commissioner shall report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over health and health and human services finance quarterly about transfers made under this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Forecasted Programs new text end new text begin 0 new text end new text begin (2,403,000) new text end new text begin The amounts that may be spent for each purpose are specified in the following paragraphs. new text end new text begin (a) Housing Supports new text end new text begin 0 new text end new text begin 1,800,000 new text end new text begin This amount is for housing support payments for certified recovery residence facilities. new text end new text begin (b) Medical Assistance Grants new text end new text begin 0 new text end new text begin (2,060,000) new text end new text begin The amounts in parentheses in this paragraph shall be reduced from other legislatively enacted appropriations made to the Commissioner of Human Services for Medical Assistance during the 2025 legislative session for the biennium ending June 30, 2027. new text end new text begin (c) Behavioral Health Fund new text end new text begin 0 new text end new text begin (2,143,000) new text end new text begin The amounts in parentheses in this paragraph shall be reduced from other legislatively enacted appropriations made to the commissioner of human services for the Behavioral Health Fund during the 2025 legislative session for the biennium ending June 30, 2027. new text end Sec. 6. new text begin DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT AND BUDGETnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 1,162,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 1,590,000 new text end new text begin This amount is for additional financial and human resource oversight capacity at the department. new text end Sec. 7. new text begin DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETYnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 2,025,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 2,025,000 new text end new text begin Appropriations by Fund new text end new text begin General new text end new text begin 1,810,000 new text end new text begin 1,810,000 new text end new text begin Workers' Compensation new text end new text begin 215,000 new text end new text begin 215,000 new text end new text begin These appropriations are to the Bureau of Criminal Apprehension for the Financial Crimes and Fraud Section. new text end Sec. 8. new text begin DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin (1,330,000) new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin (1,330,000) new text end new text begin Appropriations by Fund new text end new text begin General new text end new text begin (1,115,000) new text end new text begin (1,115,000) new text end new text begin Workers' Compensation new text end new text begin (215,000) new text end new text begin (215,000) new text end new text begin The amounts in parentheses in this section shall reduce other legislatively enacted appropriations for the biennium ending June 30, 2027, made during the 2025 legislative session to the Department of Commerce for their enforcement program. new text end Sec. 9. new text begin DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONSnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 12,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 44,000 new text end new text begin This amount is for increased bed costs related to Minnesota Statutes, section 609.5523. The base for this appropriation is $87,000 in fiscal year 2028 and $145,000 in fiscal year 2029. new text end Sec. 10. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS AND TRANSFERS GIVEN EFFECT ONCE.new text end new text begin If an appropriation, reduction to an appropriation, or transfer in this act is enacted during the 2025 legislative session more than once to fund the same intent and purpose, the appropriation, reduction to an appropriation, or transfer must be given effect only once. new text end ARTICLE 2 DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 13.46, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. General. (a) Data on individuals collected, maintained, used, or disseminated by the welfare system are private data on individuals, and shall not be disclosed except: (1) according to section 13.05; (2) according to court order; (3) according to a statute specifically authorizing access to the private data; (4) to an agent deleted text begin of the welfare system and andeleted text end new text begin ornew text end investigator acting on behalf of a county, the state, or the federal government, including a law enforcement person or attorney in the investigation or prosecution of a criminal, civil, or administrative proceeding relating to the administration of a program; (5) to personnel of the welfare system who require the data to verify an individual's identity; determine eligibility, amount of assistance, and the need to provide services to an individual or family across programs; coordinate services for an individual or family; evaluate the effectiveness of programs; assess parental contribution amounts; and investigate suspected fraud; (6) to administer federal funds or programs; (7) between personnel of the welfare system working in the same program; (8) to the Department of Revenue to administer and evaluate tax refund or tax credit programs and to identify individuals who may benefit from these programs, and prepare the databases for reports required under section 270C.13 and Laws 2008, chapter 366, article 17, section 6. The following information may be disclosed under this paragraph: an individual's and their dependent's names, dates of birth, Social Security or individual taxpayer identification numbers, income, addresses, and other data as required, upon request by the Department of Revenue. Disclosures by the commissioner of revenue to the commissioner of human services for the purposes described in this clause are governed by section 270B.14, subdivision 1. Tax refund or tax credit programs include, but are not limited to, the dependent care credit under section 290.067, the Minnesota working family credit under section 290.0671, the property tax refund under section 290A.04, and the Minnesota education credit under section 290.0674; (9) between the Department of Human Services; the Department of Employment and Economic Development; the Department of Children, Youth, and Families; Direct Care and Treatment; and, when applicable, the Department of Education, for the following purposes: (i) to monitor the eligibility of the data subject for unemployment benefits, for any employment or training program administered, supervised, or certified by that agency; (ii) to administer any rehabilitation program or child care assistance program, whether alone or in conjunction with the welfare system; (iii) to monitor and evaluate the Minnesota family investment program or the child care assistance program by exchanging data on recipients and former recipients of Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP) benefits, cash assistance under chapter 142F, 256D, 256J, or 256K, child care assistance under chapter 142E, medical programs under chapter 256B or 256L; and (iv) to analyze public assistance employment services and program utilization, cost, effectiveness, and outcomes as implemented under the authority established in Title II, Sections 201-204 of the Ticket to Work and Work Incentives Improvement Act of 1999. Health records governed by sections 144.291 to 144.298 and "protected health information" as defined in Code of Federal Regulations, title 45, section 160.103, and governed by Code of Federal Regulations, title 45, parts 160-164, including health care claims utilization information, must not be exchanged under this clause; (10) to appropriate parties in connection with an emergency if knowledge of the information is necessary to protect the health or safety of the individual or other individuals or persons; (11) data maintained by residential programs as defined in section 245A.02 may be disclosed to the protection and advocacy system established in this state according to Part C of Public Law 98-527 to protect the legal and human rights of persons with developmental disabilities or other related conditions who live in residential facilities for these persons if the protection and advocacy system receives a complaint by or on behalf of that person and the person does not have a legal guardian or the state or a designee of the state is the legal guardian of the person; (12) to the county medical examiner or the county coroner for identifying or locating relatives or friends of a deceased person; (13) data on a child support obligor who makes payments to the public agency may be disclosed to the Minnesota Office of Higher Education to the extent necessary to determine eligibility under section 136A.121, subdivision 2, clause (5); (14) participant Social Security or individual taxpayer identification numbers and names collected by the telephone assistance program may be disclosed to the Department of Revenue to conduct an electronic data match with the property tax refund database to determine eligibility under section 237.70, subdivision 4a; (15) the current address of a Minnesota family investment program participant may be disclosed to law enforcement officers who provide the name of the participant and notify the agency that: (i) the participant: (A) is a fugitive felon fleeing to avoid prosecution, or custody or confinement after conviction, for a crime or attempt to commit a crime that is a felony under the laws of the jurisdiction from which the individual is fleeing; or (B) is violating a condition of probation or parole imposed under state or federal law; (ii) the location or apprehension of the felon is within the law enforcement officer's official duties; and (iii) the request is made in writing and in the proper exercise of those duties; (16) the current address of a recipient of general assistance may be disclosed to probation officers and corrections agents who are supervising the recipient and to law enforcement officers who are investigating the recipient in connection with a felony level offense; (17) information obtained from a SNAP applicant or recipient households may be disclosed to local, state, or federal law enforcement officials, upon their written request, for the purpose of investigating an alleged violation of the Food and Nutrition Act, according to Code of Federal Regulations, title 7, section 272.1(c); (18) the address, Social Security or individual taxpayer identification number, and, if available, photograph of any member of a household receiving SNAP benefits shall be made available, on request, to a local, state, or federal law enforcement officer if the officer furnishes the agency with the name of the member and notifies the agency that: (i) the member: (A) is fleeing to avoid prosecution, or custody or confinement after conviction, for a crime or attempt to commit a crime that is a felony in the jurisdiction the member is fleeing; (B) is violating a condition of probation or parole imposed under state or federal law; or (C) has information that is necessary for the officer to conduct an official duty related to conduct described in subitem (A) or (B); (ii) locating or apprehending the member is within the officer's official duties; and (iii) the request is made in writing and in the proper exercise of the officer's official duty; (19) the current address of a recipient of Minnesota family investment program, general assistance, or SNAP benefits may be disclosed to law enforcement officers who, in writing, provide the name of the recipient and notify the agency that the recipient is a person required to register under section 243.166, but is not residing at the address at which the recipient is registered under section 243.166; (20) certain information regarding child support obligors who are in arrears may be made public according to section 518A.74; (21) data on child support payments made by a child support obligor and data on the distribution of those payments excluding identifying information on obligees may be disclosed to all obligees to whom the obligor owes support, and data on the enforcement actions undertaken by the public authority, the status of those actions, and data on the income of the obligor or obligee may be disclosed to the other party; (22) data in the work reporting system may be disclosed under section 142A.29, subdivision 7; (23) to the Department of Education for the purpose of matching Department of Education student data with public assistance data to determine students eligible for free and reduced-price meals, meal supplements, and free milk according to United States Code, title 42, sections 1758, 1761, 1766, 1766a, 1772, and 1773; to allocate federal and state funds that are distributed based on income of the student's family; and to verify receipt of energy assistance for the telephone assistance plan; (24) the current address and telephone number of program recipients and emergency contacts may be released to the commissioner of health or a community health board as defined in section 145A.02, subdivision 5, when the commissioner or community health board has reason to believe that a program recipient is a disease case, carrier, suspect case, or at risk of illness, and the data are necessary to locate the person; (25) to other state agencies, statewide systems, and political subdivisions of this state, including the attorney general, and agencies of other states, interstate information networks, federal agencies, and other entities as required by federal regulation or law for the administration of the child support enforcement program; (26) to personnel of public assistance programs as defined in section 518A.81, for access to the child support system database for the purpose of administration, including monitoring and evaluation of those public assistance programs; (27) to monitor and evaluate the Minnesota family investment program by exchanging data between the Departments of Human Services; Children, Youth, and Families; and Education, on recipients and former recipients of SNAP benefits, cash assistance under chapter 142F, 256D, 256J, or 256K, child care assistance under chapter 142E, medical programs under chapter 256B or 256L, or a medical program formerly codified under chapter 256D; (28) to evaluate child support program performance and to identify and prevent fraud in the child support program by exchanging data between the Department of Human Services; Department of Children, Youth, and Families; Department of Revenue under section 270B.14, subdivision 1, paragraphs (a) and (b), without regard to the limitation of use in paragraph (c); Department of Health; Department of Employment and Economic Development; and other state agencies as is reasonably necessary to perform these functions; (29) counties and the Department of Children, Youth, and Families operating child care assistance programs under chapter 142E may disseminate data on program participants, applicants, and providers to the commissioner of education; (30) child support data on the child, the parents, and relatives of the child may be disclosed to agencies administering programs under titles IV-B and IV-E of the Social Security Act, as authorized by federal law; (31) to a health care provider governed by sections 144.291 to 144.298, to the extent necessary to coordinate services; (32) to the chief administrative officer of a school to coordinate services for a student and family; data that may be disclosed under this clause are limited to name, date of birth, gender, and address; (33) to county correctional agencies to the extent necessary to coordinate services and diversion programs; data that may be disclosed under this clause are limited to name, client demographics, program, case status, and county worker information; or (34) between the Department of Human Services and the Metropolitan Council for the following purposes: (i) to coordinate special transportation service provided under section 473.386 with services for people with disabilities and elderly individuals funded by or through the Department of Human Services; and (ii) to provide for reimbursement of special transportation service provided under section 473.386. The data that may be shared under this clause are limited to the individual's first, last, and middle names; date of birth; residential address; and program eligibility status with expiration date for the purposes of informing the other party of program eligibility. (b) Information on persons who have been treated for substance use disorder may only be disclosed according to the requirements of Code of Federal Regulations, title 42, sections 2.1 to 2.67. (c) Data provided to law enforcement agencies under paragraph (a), clause (15), (16), (17), or (18), or paragraph (b), are investigative data and are confidential or protected nonpublic while the investigation is active. The data are private after the investigation becomes inactive under section 13.82, subdivision 7, clause (a) or (b). (d) Mental health data shall be treated as provided in subdivisions 7, 8, and 9, but are not subject to the access provisions of subdivision 10, paragraph (b). For the purposes of this subdivision, a request will be deemed to be made in writing if made through a computer interface system. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 13.46, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Investigative data. (a) Data on persons, including data on vendors of services, licensees, and applicants that is collected, maintained, used, or disseminated by the welfare system in an investigation, authorized by statute, and relating to the enforcement of rules or law are confidential data on individuals pursuant to section 13.02, subdivision 3, or protected nonpublic data not on individuals pursuant to section 13.02, subdivision 13, and shall not be disclosed except: (1) pursuant to section 13.05; (2) pursuant to statute or valid court order; (3) to a party named in a civil or criminal proceeding, administrative or judicial, for preparation of defense; (4) to an agent deleted text begin of the welfare systemdeleted text end or deleted text begin andeleted text end investigator acting on behalf of a county, state, or federal government, including a law enforcement officer or attorney in the investigation or prosecution of a criminal, civil, or administrative proceeding, unless the commissioner of human services or commissioner of children, youth, and families determines that disclosure may compromise a Department of Human Services or Department of Children, Youth, and Families ongoing investigation; or (5) to provide notices required or permitted by statute. The data referred to in this subdivision shall be classified as public data upon submission to an administrative law judge or court in an administrative or judicial proceeding. Inactive welfare investigative data shall be treated as provided in section 13.39, subdivision 3. (b) Notwithstanding any other provision in law, the commissioner of human services shall provide all active and inactive investigative data, including the name of the reporter of alleged maltreatment under section 626.557 or chapter 260E, to the ombudsman for mental health and developmental disabilities upon the request of the ombudsman. (c) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) and section 13.39, the existence of an investigation by the commissioner of human services of possible overpayments of public funds to a service provider or recipient new text begin or the reduction or withholding of payments new text end may be disclosed if the commissioner determines that it will not compromise the investigation. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142E.51, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Administrative disqualification of child care providers caring for children receiving child care assistance. (a) The department shall pursue an administrative disqualification, if the child care provider is accused of committing an intentional program violation, in lieu of a criminal action when it has not been pursued. Intentional program violations include intentionally making false or misleading statements;new text begin receiving or providing a kickback, as defined in subdivision 6, paragraph (b);new text end intentionally misrepresenting, concealing, or withholding facts; and repeatedly and intentionally violating program regulations under this chapter. Intent may be proven by demonstrating a pattern of conduct that violates program rules under this chapter. (b) To initiate an administrative disqualification, the commissioner must send written notice using a signature-verified confirmed delivery method to the provider against whom the action is being taken. Unless otherwise specified under this chapter or Minnesota Rules, chapter 3400, the commissioner must send the written notice at least 15 calendar days before the adverse action's effective date. The notice shall state (1) the factual basis for the agency's determination, (2) the action the agency intends to take, (3) the dollar amount of the monetary recovery or recoupment, if known, and (4) the provider's right to appeal the agency's proposed action. (c) The provider may appeal an administrative disqualification by submitting a written request to the state agency. A provider's request must be received by the state agency no later than 30 days after the date the commissioner mails the notice. (d) The provider's appeal request must contain the following: (1) each disputed item, the reason for the dispute, and, if applicable, an estimate of the dollar amount involved for each disputed item; (2) the computation the provider believes to be correct, if applicable; (3) the statute or rule relied on for each disputed item; and (4) the name, address, and telephone number of the person at the provider's place of business with whom contact may be made regarding the appeal. (e) On appeal, the issuing agency bears the burden of proof to demonstrate by a preponderance of the evidence that the provider committed an intentional program violation. (f) The hearing is subject to the requirements of section 142A.20. The human services judge may combine a fair hearing and administrative disqualification hearing into a single hearing if the factual issues arise out of the same or related circumstances and the provider receives prior notice that the hearings will be combined. (g) A provider found to have committed an intentional program violation and is administratively disqualified must be disqualified, for a period of three years for the first offense and permanently for any subsequent offense, from receiving any payments from any child care program under this chapter. (h) Unless a timely and proper appeal made under this section is received by the department, the administrative determination of the department is final and binding. Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142E.51, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Prohibited hiring deleted text begin practicedeleted text end new text begin practicesnew text end . new text begin (a) new text end It is prohibited to hire a child care center employee when, as a condition of employment, the employee is required to have one or more children who are eligible for or receive child care assistance, if: (1) the individual hiring the employee is, or is acting at the direction of or in cooperation with, a child care center provider, center owner, director, manager, license holder, or other controlling individual; and (2) the individual hiring the employee knows or has reason to know the purpose in hiring the employee is to obtain child care assistance program funds. new text begin (b) Program applicants, participants, and providers are prohibited from receiving or providing a kickback or payment in exchange for obtaining or attempting to obtain child care assistance benefits for their own financial gain. This paragraph does not apply to: new text end new text begin (1) marketing or promotional offerings that directly benefit an applicant or recipient's child or dependent for whom the child care provider is providing child care services; or new text end new text begin (2) child care provider discounts, scholarships, or other financial assistance allowed under section 142E.17, subdivision 7. new text end new text begin (c) An attempt to buy or sell access to a family's child care subsidy benefits to an unauthorized person by an applicant, a participant, or a provider is a kickback, an intentional program violation under subdivision 5, and wrongfully obtaining assistance under section 256.98. new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 245.095, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Withholding of payments. (a) Except as otherwise provided by state or federal law, the commissioner may withhold payments to a provider, vendor, individual, associated individual, or associated entity in any program administered by the commissioner if the commissioner determinesnew text begin :new text end new text begin (1)new text end there is a credible allegation of fraud for which an investigation is pending for a program administered by a Minnesota state or federal agencydeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (2) the individual, the entity, or an associated individual or entity was convicted of a crime charged in state or federal court with an offense that involves fraud or theft against a program administered by the commissioner or another Minnesota state or federal agency. For purposes of this subdivision, "convicted" means a judgment of conviction has been entered by a federal, state, or local court, regardless of whether an appeal from the judgment is pending, and includes a stay of adjudication, a court-ordered diversion program, or a plea of guilty or nolo contendere; new text end new text begin (3) the provider is operating after a Minnesota state or federal agency orders the suspension, revocation, or decertification of the provider's license; new text end new text begin (4) the provider, vendor, associated individual, or associated entity, including those receiving funds under any contract or registered program, has a background study disqualification under chapter 245C that has not been set aside and for which no variance has been issued, except for a disqualification under sections 245C.14, subdivision 5, and 245C.15, subdivision 4c; or new text end new text begin (5) by a preponderance of the evidence that the provider, vendor, individual, associated individual, or associated entity intentionally provided materially false information when billing the commissioner. new text end (b) For purposes of this subdivision, "credible allegation of fraud" means an allegation that has been verified by the commissioner from any source, including but not limited to: (1) fraud hotline complaints; (2) claims data mining; (3) patterns identified through provider audits, civil false claims cases, and law enforcement investigations; and (4) court filings and other legal documents, including but not limited to police reports, complaints, indictments, informations, affidavits, declarations, and search warrants. (c) The commissioner must send notice of the withholding of payments within five days of taking such action. The notice must: (1) state that payments are being withheld according to this subdivision; (2) set forth the general allegations related to the withholding action, except the notice need not disclose specific information concerning an ongoing investigation; (3) state that the withholding is for a temporary period and cite the circumstances under which the withholding will be terminated; and (4) inform the provider, vendor, individual, associated individual, or associated entity of the right to submit written evidence to contest the withholding action for consideration by the commissioner. (d) If the commissioner withholds payments under this subdivision, the provider, vendor, individual, associated individual, or associated entity has a right to request administrative reconsideration. A request for administrative reconsideration must be made in writing, state with specificity the reasons the payment withholding decision is in error, and include documents to support the request. Within 60 days from receipt of the request, the commissioner shall judiciously review allegations, facts, evidence available to the commissioner, and information submitted by the provider, vendor, individual, associated individual, or associated entity to determine whether the payment withholding should remain in place. (e) The commissioner shall stop withholding payments if the commissioner determines there is insufficient evidence of fraud by the provider, vendor, individual, associated individual, or associated entity or when legal proceedings relating to the alleged fraud are completed, unless the commissioner has sent notice under subdivision 3 to the provider, vendor, individual, associated individual, or associated entity. (f) The withholding of payments is a temporary action and is not subject to appeal under section 256.045 or chapter 14. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 245.095, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Data practices. new text end new text begin The commissioner may exchange information, including claims data, with state or federal agencies, professional boards, departments, or programs for the purpose of investigating or prosecuting a criminal, civil, or administrative proceeding related to suspected fraud or exclusion from any program administered by a state or federal agency. new text end Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 245A.04, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Application for licensure. (a) An individual, organization, or government entity that is subject to licensure under section 245A.03 must apply for a license. The application must be made on the forms and in the manner prescribed by the commissioner. The commissioner shall provide the applicant with instruction in completing the application and provide information about the rules and requirements of other state agencies that affect the applicant. An applicant seeking licensure in Minnesota with headquarters outside of Minnesota must have a program office located within 30 miles of the Minnesota border. An applicant who intends to buy or otherwise acquire a program or services licensed under this chapter that is owned by another license holder must apply for a license under this chapter and comply with the application procedures in this section and section 245A.043. The commissioner shall act on the application within 90 working days after a complete application and any required reports have been received from other state agencies or departments, counties, municipalities, or other political subdivisions. The commissioner shall not consider an application to be complete until the commissioner receives all of the required information.new text begin If the applicant or a controlling individual is the subject of a pending administrative, civil, or criminal investigation, the application is not complete until the investigation has closed or the related legal proceedings are complete.new text end When the commissioner receives an application for initial licensure that is incomplete because the applicant failed to submit required documents or that is substantially deficient because the documents submitted do not meet licensing requirements, the commissioner shall provide the applicant written notice that the application is incomplete or substantially deficient. In the written notice to the applicant the commissioner shall identify documents that are missing or deficient and give the applicant 45 days to resubmit a second application that is substantially complete. An applicant's failure to submit a substantially complete application after receiving notice from the commissioner is a basis for license denial under section 245A.043. (b) An application for licensure must identify all controlling individuals as defined in section 245A.02, subdivision 5a, and must designate one individual to be the authorized agent. The application must be signed by the authorized agent and must include the authorized agent's first, middle, and last name; mailing address; and email address. By submitting an application for licensure, the authorized agent consents to electronic communication with the commissioner throughout the application process. The authorized agent must be authorized to accept service on behalf of all of the controlling individuals. A government entity that holds multiple licenses under this chapter may designate one authorized agent for all licenses issued under this chapter or may designate a different authorized agent for each license. Service on the authorized agent is service on all of the controlling individuals. It is not a defense to any action arising under this chapter that service was not made on each controlling individual. The designation of a controlling individual as the authorized agent under this paragraph does not affect the legal responsibility of any other controlling individual under this chapter. (c) An applicant or license holder must have a policy that prohibits license holders, employees, subcontractors, and volunteers, when directly responsible for persons served by the program, from abusing prescription medication or being in any manner under the influence of a chemical that impairs the individual's ability to provide services or care. The license holder must train employees, subcontractors, and volunteers about the program's drug and alcohol policy. (d) An applicant and license holder must have a program grievance procedure that permits persons served by the program and their authorized representatives to bring a grievance to the highest level of authority in the program. (e) The commissioner may limit communication during the application process to the authorized agent or the controlling individuals identified on the license application and for whom a background study was initiated under chapter 245C. Upon implementation of the provider licensing and reporting hub, applicants and license holders must use the hub in the manner prescribed by the commissioner. The commissioner may require the applicant, except for child foster care, to demonstrate competence in the applicable licensing requirements by successfully completing a written examination. The commissioner may develop a prescribed written examination format. (f) When an applicant is an individual, the applicant must provide: (1) the applicant's taxpayer identification numbers including the Social Security number or Minnesota tax identification number, and federal employer identification number if the applicant has employees; (2) at the request of the commissioner, a copy of the most recent filing with the secretary of state that includes the complete business name, if any; (3) if doing business under a different name, the doing business as (DBA) name, as registered with the secretary of state; (4) if applicable, the applicant's National Provider Identifier (NPI) number and Unique Minnesota Provider Identifier (UMPI) number; and (5) at the request of the commissioner, the notarized signature of the applicant or authorized agent. (g) When an applicant is an organization, the applicant must provide: (1) the applicant's taxpayer identification numbers including the Minnesota tax identification number and federal employer identification number; (2) at the request of the commissioner, a copy of the most recent filing with the secretary of state that includes the complete business name, and if doing business under a different name, the doing business as (DBA) name, as registered with the secretary of state; (3) the first, middle, and last name, and address for all individuals who will be controlling individuals, including all officers, owners, and managerial officials as defined in section 245A.02, subdivision 5a, and the date that the background study was initiated by the applicant for each controlling individual; (4) if applicable, the applicant's NPI number and UMPI number; (5) the documents that created the organization and that determine the organization's internal governance and the relations among the persons that own the organization, have an interest in the organization, or are members of the organization, in each case as provided or authorized by the organization's governing statute, which may include a partnership agreement, bylaws, articles of organization, organizational chart, and operating agreement, or comparable documents as provided in the organization's governing statute; and (6) the notarized signature of the applicant or authorized agent. (h) When the applicant is a government entity, the applicant must provide: (1) the name of the government agency, political subdivision, or other unit of government seeking the license and the name of the program or services that will be licensed; (2) the applicant's taxpayer identification numbers including the Minnesota tax identification number and federal employer identification number; (3) a letter signed by the manager, administrator, or other executive of the government entity authorizing the submission of the license application; and (4) if applicable, the applicant's NPI number and UMPI number. (i) At the time of application for licensure or renewal of a license under this chapter, the applicant or license holder must acknowledge on the form provided by the commissioner if the applicant or license holder elects to receive any public funding reimbursement from the commissioner for services provided under the license that: (1) the applicant's or license holder's compliance with the provider enrollment agreement or registration requirements for receipt of public funding may be monitored by the commissioner as part of a licensing investigation or licensing inspection; and (2) noncompliance with the provider enrollment agreement or registration requirements for receipt of public funding that is identified through a licensing investigation or licensing inspection, or noncompliance with a licensing requirement that is a basis of enrollment for reimbursement for a service, may result in: (i) a correction order or a conditional license under section 245A.06, or sanctions under section 245A.07; (ii) nonpayment of claims submitted by the license holder for public program reimbursement; (iii) recovery of payments made for the service; (iv) disenrollment in the public payment program; or (v) other administrative, civil, or criminal penalties as provided by law. Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 245A.05, is amended to read: 245A.05 DENIAL OF APPLICATION. (a) The commissioner may deny a license if an applicant or controlling individual: (1) fails to submit a substantially complete application after receiving notice from the commissioner under section 245A.04, subdivision 1; (2) fails to comply with applicable laws or rules; (3) knowingly withholds relevant information from or gives false or misleading information to the commissioner in connection with an application for a license or during an investigation; (4) has a disqualification that has not been set aside under section 245C.22 and no variance has been granted; (5) has an individual living in the household who received a background study under section 245C.03, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clause (2), who has a disqualification that has not been set aside under section 245C.22, and no variance has been granted; (6) is associated with an individual who received a background study under section 245C.03, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clause (6), who may have unsupervised access to children or vulnerable adults, and who has a disqualification that has not been set aside under section 245C.22, and no variance has been granted; (7) fails to comply with section 245A.04, subdivision 1, paragraph (f) or (g); (8) fails to demonstrate competent knowledge as required by section 245A.04, subdivision 6; (9) has a history of noncompliance as a license holder or controlling individual with applicable laws or rules, including but not limited to this chapter and chapters 142E and 245C; deleted text begin ordeleted text end (10) is prohibited from holding a license according to section 245.095deleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; ornew text end new text begin (11) is the subject of a pending administrative, civil, or criminal investigation. new text end (b) An applicant whose application has been denied by the commissioner must be given notice of the denial, which must state the reasons for the denial in plain language. Notice must be given by certified mail, by personal service, or through the provider licensing and reporting hub. The notice must state the reasons the application was denied and must inform the applicant of the right to a contested case hearing under chapter 14 and Minnesota Rules, parts 1400.8505 to 1400.8612. The applicant may appeal the denial by notifying the commissioner in writing by certified mail, by personal service, or through the provider licensing and reporting hub. If mailed, the appeal must be postmarked and sent to the commissioner within 20 calendar days after the applicant received the notice of denial. If an appeal request is made by personal service, it must be received by the commissioner within 20 calendar days after the applicant received the notice of denial. If the order is issued through the provider hub, the appeal must be received by the commissioner within 20 calendar days from the date the commissioner issued the order through the hub. Section 245A.08 applies to hearings held to appeal the commissioner's denial of an application. Sec. 9. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 245A.07, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Temporary immediate suspension. (a) The commissioner shall act immediately to temporarily suspend a license issued under this chapter if: (1) the license holder'snew text begin or controlling individual'snew text end actions or failure to comply with applicable law or rule, or the actions of other individuals or conditions in the program, pose an imminent risk of harm to the health, safety, or rights of persons served by the program; (2) while the program continues to operate pending an appeal of an order of revocation, the commissioner identifies one or more subsequent violations of law or rule which may adversely affect the health or safety of persons served by the program; or (3) the license holdernew text begin or controlling individualnew text end is criminally charged in state or federal court with an offense that involves fraud or theft against a program administered by deleted text begin the commissionerdeleted text end new text begin a state or federal agencynew text end . (b) No state funds shall be made available or be expended by any agency or department of state, county, or municipal government for use by a license holder regulated under this chapter while a license issued under this chapter is under immediate suspension. A notice stating the reasons for the immediate suspension and informing the license holder of the right to an expedited hearing under chapter 14 and Minnesota Rules, parts 1400.8505 to 1400.8612, must be delivered by personal service to the address shown on the application or the last known address of the license holder. The license holder may appeal an order immediately suspending a license. The appeal of an order immediately suspending a license must be made in writing by certified mail, personal service, or other means expressly set forth in the commissioner's order. If mailed, the appeal must be postmarked and sent to the commissioner within five calendar days after the license holder receives notice that the license has been immediately suspended. If a request is made by personal service, it must be received by the commissioner within five calendar days after the license holder received the order. A license holder and any controlling individual shall discontinue operation of the program upon receipt of the commissioner's order to immediately suspend the license. new text begin (c) The commissioner may act immediately to temporarily suspend a license issued under this chapter if the license holder or controlling individual is the subject of a pending administrative, civil, or criminal investigation or subject to an administrative or civil action related to fraud against a program administered by a state or federal agency. new text end Sec. 10. new text begin [245A.142] EARLY INTENSIVE DEVELOPMENTAL AND BEHAVIORAL INTERVENTION PROVISIONAL LICENSURE. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Regulatory powers. new text end new text begin The commissioner shall regulate early intensive developmental and behavioral intervention (EIDBI) agencies pursuant to this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Provisional license. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner shall issue a provisional license to an agency providing EIDBI services as described in section 256B.0949 that meet the requirements of this section by .... A provisional license is effective for up to one year from the initial effective date of the license, except that a provisional license may be extended according to subdivisions ..., paragraph (b), and 3. new text end new text begin (b) Beginning ...., no agency providing EIDBI services may operate in Minnesota unless licensed under this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Provisional license regulatory functions. new text end new text begin The commissioner may: new text end new text begin (1) license, survey, and monitor without advance notice in accordance with this section; new text end new text begin (2) investigate reports of maltreatment; new text end new text begin (3) investigate complaints against EIDBI agencies; new text end new text begin (4) issue correction orders and assess monetary penalties; and new text end new text begin (5) take other action reasonably required to accomplish the purposes of this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Provisional license requirements. new text end new text begin (a) A provisional license holder must: new text end new text begin (1) identify all controlling individuals, as defined in section 245A.02, subdivision 5a, for the agency; new text end new text begin (2) provide documented disclosures surrounding the use of billing agencies or other consultants, available to the department upon request; new text end new text begin (3) establish provider policies and procedures related to staff training, staff qualifications, quality assurance, and service activities; new text end new text begin (4) document contracts with independent contractors for qualified supervising professionals, including the number of hours contracted and responsibilities, available to the department upon request; and new text end new text begin (5) comply with section 256B.0949, subdivisions 2, 3a, 6, 7, 14, 15, 16, and 16a. new text end new text begin (b) Provisional license holders must comply with this section within 90 calendar days from the effective date of the provisional license. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Reporting of maltreatment. new text end new text begin A provisional license holder must comply with the requirements of reporting of maltreatment of vulnerable adults and minors under section 626.557 and chapter 260E. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Background studies. new text end new text begin A provisional license holder must initiate a background study through the commissioner's NETStudy system as provided under sections 245C.03, subdivision 15, and 245C.10, subdivision 17. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Sanctions. new text end new text begin If the provisional license holder is not in substantial compliance with the requirements of this section after 90 days following the effective date of the provisional license, the commissioner may either: (1) not renew or terminate the provisional license; or (2) extend the provisional license for a period not to exceed 90 calendar days and apply conditions necessary to bring the facility into substantial compliance. If the provisional license holder is not in substantial compliance within the time allowed by the extension or does not satisfy the license conditions, the commissioner may terminate the license. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Reconsideration. new text end new text begin (a) If a provisional license holder disagrees with a sanction under subdivision 7, the provisional license holder may request reconsideration by the commissioner. The reconsideration request process must be conducted internally by the commissioner and is not an administrative appeal under chapter 14 or section 256.045. new text end new text begin (b) The provisional licensee requesting the reconsideration must make the request in writing and list and describe the reasons why the provisional licensee disagrees with the sanction under subdivision 7. new text end new text begin (c) The reconsideration request and supporting documentation must be received by the commissioner within 15 calendar days after the date the provisional licensee receives notice of the sanction under subdivision 7. new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Continued operation. new text end new text begin A provisional license holder may continue to operate after receiving notice of nonrenewal or termination: new text end new text begin (1) during the 15 calendar day reconsideration window; new text end new text begin (2) during the pendency of a reconsideration; or new text end new text begin (3) while in active negotiation with the commissioner for an extension of the provisional license with conditions, and the commissioner confirms the negotiation is active. new text end new text begin Subd. 10. new text end new text begin Transition to nonprovisional EIDBI license; future licensure standards. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must develop a process and transition plan for comprehensive EIDBI agency licensure by January 1, 2026. new text end new text begin (b) By December 1, 2026, the commissioner shall establish standards for nonprovisional EIDBI agency licensure and submit proposed legislation to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over human services licensing. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 11. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 245C.13, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Activities pending completion of background study. The subject of a background study may not perform any activity requiring a background study under paragraph (c) until the commissioner has issued one of the notices under paragraph (a). (a) Notices from the commissioner required prior to activity under paragraph (c) include: (1) a notice of the study results under section 245C.17 stating that: (i) the individual is not disqualified; or (ii) more time is needed to complete the study but the individual is not required to be removed from direct contact or access to people receiving services prior to completion of the study as provided under section 245C.17, subdivision 1, paragraph (b) or (c). The notice that more time is needed to complete the study must also indicate whether the individual is required to be under continuous direct supervision prior to completion of the background study. When more time is necessary to complete a background study of an individual affiliated with a Title IV-E eligible children's residential facility or foster residence setting, the individual may not work in the facility or setting regardless of whether or not the individual is supervised; (2) a notice that a disqualification has been set aside under section 245C.23; or (3) a notice that a variance has been granted related to the individual under section 245C.30. (b) For a background study affiliated with a licensed child care center or certified license-exempt child care center, the notice sent under paragraph (a), clause (1), item (ii), new text begin must not be issued until the commissioner receives a qualifying result for the individual for the fingerprint-based national criminal history record check or the fingerprint-based criminal history information from the Bureau of Criminal Apprehension. The notice new text end must require the individual to be under continuous direct supervision prior to completion of new text begin the remainder of new text end the background study except as permitted in subdivision 3. (c) Activities prohibited prior to receipt of notice under paragraph (a) include: (1) being issued a license; (2) living in the household where the licensed program will be provided; (3) providing direct contact services to persons served by a program unless the subject is under continuous direct supervision; (4) having access to persons receiving services if the background study was completed under section 144.057, subdivision 1, or 245C.03, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clause (2), (5), or (6), unless the subject is under continuous direct supervision; (5) for licensed child care centers and certified license-exempt child care centers, providing direct contact services to persons served by the program; (6) for children's residential facilities or foster residence settings, working in the facility or setting; deleted text begin ordeleted text end (7) for background studies affiliated with a personal care provider organization, except as provided in section 245C.03, subdivision 3b, before a personal care assistant provides services, the personal care assistance provider agency must initiate a background study of the personal care assistant under this chapter and the personal care assistance provider agency must have received a notice from the commissioner that the personal care assistant is: (i) not disqualified under section 245C.14; or (ii) disqualified, but the personal care assistant has received a set aside of the disqualification under section 245C.22deleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; ornew text end new text begin (8) for background studies affiliated with an early intensive developmental and behavioral intervention provider, before an individual provides services, the early intensive developmental and behavioral intervention provider must initiate a background study for the individual under this chapter and the early intensive developmental and behavioral intervention provider must have received a notice from the commissioner that the individual is: new text end new text begin (i) not disqualified under section 245C.14; or new text end new text begin (ii) disqualified, but the individual has received a set aside of the disqualification under section 245C.22. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 15, 2026. new text end Sec. 12. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 245C.14, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 4c. new text end new text begin Two-year disqualification. new text end new text begin An individual is disqualified under section 245C.14, subdivision 6, if less than two years has passed since a determination that the individual violated section 142A.12, 245.095, or 256B.064. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 13. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 245C.14, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Disqualification from owning, operating, or billing. new text end new text begin The commissioner shall disqualify an individual who is the subject of a background study from any position involving ownership, management, or control of a program or billing activities if a background study completed under this chapter shows a violation of section 142A.12, 245.095, or 256B.064. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 14. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 245C.15, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Permanent disqualification. (a) An individual is disqualified under section 245C.14 if: (1) regardless of how much time has passed since the discharge of the sentence imposed, if any, for the offense; and (2) unless otherwise specified, regardless of the level of the offense, the individual has committed any of the following offenses: sections 243.166 (violation of predatory offender registration law); 609.185 (murder in the first degree); 609.19 (murder in the second degree); 609.195 (murder in the third degree); 609.20 (manslaughter in the first degree); 609.205 (manslaughter in the second degree); a felony offense under 609.221 or 609.222 (assault in the first or second degree); a felony offense under sections 609.2242 and 609.2243 (domestic assault), spousal abuse, child abuse or neglect, or a crime against children; 609.2247 (domestic assault by strangulation); 609.228 (great bodily harm caused by distribution of drugs); 609.245 (aggravated robbery); 609.247, subdivision 2 or 3 (carjacking in the first or second degree); 609.25 (kidnapping); 609.2661 (murder of an unborn child in the first degree); 609.2662 (murder of an unborn child in the second degree); 609.2663 (murder of an unborn child in the third degree); 609.322 (solicitation, inducement, and promotion of prostitution); 609.324, subdivision 1 (other prohibited acts); 609.342 (criminal sexual conduct in the first degree); 609.343 (criminal sexual conduct in the second degree); 609.344 (criminal sexual conduct in the third degree); 609.345 (criminal sexual conduct in the fourth degree); 609.3451 (criminal sexual conduct in the fifth degree); 609.3453 (criminal sexual predatory conduct); 609.3458 (sexual extortion); 609.352 (solicitation of children to engage in sexual conduct); 609.365 (incest); a felony offense under 609.377 (malicious punishment of a child);new text begin 609.3775 (child torture);new text end a felony offense under 609.378 (neglect or endangerment of a child); 609.561 (arson in the first degree); 609.66, subdivision 1e (drive-by shooting); 609.749, subdivision 3, 4, or 5 (felony-level harassment or stalking); 609.855, subdivision 5 (shooting at or in a public transit vehicle or facility); 617.23, subdivision 2, clause (1), or subdivision 3, clause (1) (indecent exposure involving a minor); 617.246 (use of minors in sexual performance prohibited); 617.247 (possession of pictorial representations of minors); or, for a child care background study subject, conviction of a crime that would make the individual ineligible for employment under United States Code, title 42, section 9858f, except for a felony drug conviction, regardless of whether a period of disqualification under subdivisions 2 to 4, would apply if the individual were not a child care background study subject. (b) An individual's aiding and abetting, attempt, or conspiracy to commit any of the offenses listed in paragraph (a), as each of these offenses is defined in Minnesota Statutes, permanently disqualifies the individual under section 245C.14. (c) An individual's offense in any other state or country, where the elements of the offense are substantially similar to any of the offenses listed in paragraph (a), permanently disqualifies the individual under section 245C.14. (d) When a disqualification is based on a judicial determination other than a conviction, the disqualification period begins from the date of the court order. When a disqualification is based on an admission, the disqualification period begins from the date of an admission in court. When a disqualification is based on an Alford Plea, the disqualification period begins from the date the Alford Plea is entered in court. When a disqualification is based on a preponderance of evidence of a disqualifying act, the disqualification date begins from the date of the dismissal, the date of discharge of the sentence imposed for a conviction for a disqualifying crime of similar elements, or the date of the incident, whichever occurs last. (e) If the individual studied commits one of the offenses listed in paragraph (a) that is specified as a felony-level only offense, but the sentence or level of offense is a gross misdemeanor or misdemeanor, the individual is disqualified, but the disqualification look-back period for the offense is the period applicable to gross misdemeanor or misdemeanor offenses. (f) A child care background study subject shall be disqualified if the individual is registered, or required to be registered, on a state sex offender registry or repository or the National Sex Offender Registry. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 15. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 245C.15, subdivision 4a, is amended to read: Subd. 4a. Licensed family foster setting disqualifications. (a) Notwithstanding subdivisions 1 to 4, for a background study affiliated with a licensed family foster setting, regardless of how much time has passed, an individual is disqualified under section 245C.14 if the individual committed an act that resulted in a felony-level conviction for sections: 609.185 (murder in the first degree); 609.19 (murder in the second degree); 609.195 (murder in the third degree); 609.20 (manslaughter in the first degree); 609.205 (manslaughter in the second degree); 609.2112 (criminal vehicular homicide); 609.221 (assault in the first degree); 609.223, subdivision 2 (assault in the third degree, past pattern of child abuse); 609.223, subdivision 3 (assault in the third degree, victim under four); a felony offense under sections 609.2242 and 609.2243 (domestic assault, spousal abuse, child abuse or neglect, or a crime against children); 609.2247 (domestic assault by strangulation); 609.2325 (criminal abuse of a vulnerable adult resulting in the death of a vulnerable adult); 609.245 (aggravated robbery); 609.247, subdivision 2 or 3 (carjacking in the first or second degree); 609.25 (kidnapping); 609.255 (false imprisonment); 609.2661 (murder of an unborn child in the first degree); 609.2662 (murder of an unborn child in the second degree); 609.2663 (murder of an unborn child in the third degree); 609.2664 (manslaughter of an unborn child in the first degree); 609.2665 (manslaughter of an unborn child in the second degree); 609.267 (assault of an unborn child in the first degree); 609.2671 (assault of an unborn child in the second degree); 609.268 (injury or death of an unborn child in the commission of a crime); 609.322, subdivision 1 (solicitation, inducement, and promotion of prostitution; sex trafficking in the first degree); 609.324, subdivision 1 (other prohibited acts; engaging in, hiring, or agreeing to hire minor to engage in prostitution); 609.342 (criminal sexual conduct in the first degree); 609.343 (criminal sexual conduct in the second degree); 609.344 (criminal sexual conduct in the third degree); 609.345 (criminal sexual conduct in the fourth degree); 609.3451 (criminal sexual conduct in the fifth degree); 609.3453 (criminal sexual predatory conduct); 609.3458 (sexual extortion); 609.352 (solicitation of children to engage in sexual conduct); 609.377 (malicious punishment of a child);new text begin 609.3775 (child torture);new text end 609.378 (neglect or endangerment of a child); 609.561 (arson in the first degree); 609.582, subdivision 1 (burglary in the first degree); 609.746 (interference with privacy); 617.23 (indecent exposure); 617.246 (use of minors in sexual performance prohibited); or 617.247 (possession of pictorial representations of minors). (b) Notwithstanding subdivisions 1 to 4, for the purposes of a background study affiliated with a licensed family foster setting, an individual is disqualified under section 245C.14, regardless of how much time has passed, if the individual: (1) committed an action under paragraph (e) that resulted in death or involved sexual abuse, as defined in section 260E.03, subdivision 20; (2) committed an act that resulted in a gross misdemeanor-level conviction for section 609.3451 (criminal sexual conduct in the fifth degree); (3) committed an act against or involving a minor that resulted in a felony-level conviction for: section 609.222 (assault in the second degree); 609.223, subdivision 1 (assault in the third degree); 609.2231 (assault in the fourth degree); or 609.224 (assault in the fifth degree); or (4) committed an act that resulted in a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor-level conviction for section 617.293 (dissemination and display of harmful materials to minors). (c) Notwithstanding subdivisions 1 to 4, for a background study affiliated with a licensed family foster setting, an individual is disqualified under section 245C.14 if fewer than 20 years have passed since the termination of the individual's parental rights under section 260C.301, subdivision 1, paragraph (b), or if the individual consented to a termination of parental rights under section 260C.301, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), to settle a petition to involuntarily terminate parental rights. An individual is disqualified under section 245C.14 if fewer than 20 years have passed since the termination of the individual's parental rights in any other state or country, where the conditions for the individual's termination of parental rights are substantially similar to the conditions in section 260C.301, subdivision 1, paragraph (b). (d) Notwithstanding subdivisions 1 to 4, for a background study affiliated with a licensed family foster setting, an individual is disqualified under section 245C.14 if fewer than five years have passed since a felony-level violation for sections: 152.021 (controlled substance crime in the first degree); 152.022 (controlled substance crime in the second degree); 152.023 (controlled substance crime in the third degree); 152.024 (controlled substance crime in the fourth degree); 152.025 (controlled substance crime in the fifth degree); 152.0261 (importing controlled substances across state borders); 152.0262, subdivision 1, paragraph (b) (possession of substance with intent to manufacture methamphetamine); 152.027, subdivision 6, paragraph (c) (sale or possession of synthetic cannabinoids); 152.096 (conspiracies prohibited); 152.097 (simulated controlled substances); 152.136 (anhydrous ammonia; prohibited conduct; criminal penalties; civil liabilities); 152.137 (methamphetamine-related crimes involving children or vulnerable adults); 169A.24 (felony first-degree driving while impaired); 243.166 (violation of predatory offender registration requirements); 609.2113 (criminal vehicular operation; bodily harm); 609.2114 (criminal vehicular operation; unborn child); 609.228 (great bodily harm caused by distribution of drugs); 609.2325 (criminal abuse of a vulnerable adult not resulting in the death of a vulnerable adult); 609.233 (criminal neglect); 609.235 (use of drugs to injure or facilitate a crime); 609.24 (simple robbery); 609.247, subdivision 4 (carjacking in the third degree); 609.322, subdivision 1a (solicitation, inducement, and promotion of prostitution; sex trafficking in the second degree); 609.498, subdivision 1 (tampering with a witness in the first degree); 609.498, subdivision 1b (aggravated first-degree witness tampering); 609.562 (arson in the second degree); 609.563 (arson in the third degree); 609.582, subdivision 2 (burglary in the second degree); 609.66 (felony dangerous weapons); 609.687 (adulteration); 609.713 (terroristic threats); 609.749, subdivision 3, 4, or 5 (felony-level harassment or stalking); 609.855, subdivision 5 (shooting at or in a public transit vehicle or facility); or 624.713 (certain people not to possess firearms). (e) Notwithstanding subdivisions 1 to 4, except as provided in paragraph (a), for a background study affiliated with a licensed family child foster care license, an individual is disqualified under section 245C.14 if fewer than five years have passed since: (1) a felony-level violation for an act not against or involving a minor that constitutes: section 609.222 (assault in the second degree); 609.223, subdivision 1 (assault in the third degree); 609.2231 (assault in the fourth degree); or 609.224, subdivision 4 (assault in the fifth degree); (2) a violation of an order for protection under section 518B.01, subdivision 14; (3) a determination or disposition of the individual's failure to make required reports under section 260E.06 or 626.557, subdivision 3, for incidents in which the final disposition under chapter 260E or section 626.557 was substantiated maltreatment and the maltreatment was recurring or serious; (4) a determination or disposition of the individual's substantiated serious or recurring maltreatment of a minor under chapter 260E, a vulnerable adult under section 626.557, or serious or recurring maltreatment in any other state, the elements of which are substantially similar to the elements of maltreatment under chapter 260E or section 626.557 and meet the definition of serious maltreatment or recurring maltreatment; (5) a gross misdemeanor-level violation for sections: 609.224, subdivision 2 (assault in the fifth degree); 609.2242 and 609.2243 (domestic assault); 609.233 (criminal neglect); 609.377 (malicious punishment of a child); 609.378 (neglect or endangerment of a child); 609.746 (interference with privacy); 609.749 (stalking); or 617.23 (indecent exposure); or (6) committing an act against or involving a minor that resulted in a misdemeanor-level violation of section 609.224, subdivision 1 (assault in the fifth degree). (f) For purposes of this subdivision, the disqualification begins from: (1) the date of the alleged violation, if the individual was not convicted; (2) the date of conviction, if the individual was convicted of the violation but not committed to the custody of the commissioner of corrections; or (3) the date of release from prison, if the individual was convicted of the violation and committed to the custody of the commissioner of corrections. Notwithstanding clause (3), if the individual is subsequently reincarcerated for a violation of the individual's supervised release, the disqualification begins from the date of release from the subsequent incarceration. (g) An individual's aiding and abetting, attempt, or conspiracy to commit any of the offenses listed in paragraphs (a) and (b), as each of these offenses is defined in Minnesota Statutes, permanently disqualifies the individual under section 245C.14. An individual is disqualified under section 245C.14 if fewer than five years have passed since the individual's aiding and abetting, attempt, or conspiracy to commit any of the offenses listed in paragraphs (d) and (e). (h) An individual's offense in any other state or country, where the elements of the offense are substantially similar to any of the offenses listed in paragraphs (a) and (b), permanently disqualifies the individual under section 245C.14. An individual is disqualified under section 245C.14 if fewer than five years have passed since an offense in any other state or country, the elements of which are substantially similar to the elements of any offense listed in paragraphs (d) and (e). new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 16. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 245C.16, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Determining immediate risk of harm. (a) If the commissioner determines that the individual studied has a disqualifying characteristic, the commissioner shall review the information immediately available and make a determination as to the subject's immediate risk of harm to persons served by the program where the individual studied will have direct contact with, or access to, people receiving services. (b) The commissioner shall consider all relevant information available, including the following factors in determining the immediate risk of harm: (1) the recency of the disqualifying characteristic; (2) the recency of discharge from probation for the crimes; (3) the number of disqualifying characteristics; (4) the intrusiveness or violence of the disqualifying characteristic; (5) the vulnerability of the victim involved in the disqualifying characteristic; (6) the similarity of the victim to the persons served by the program where the individual studied will have direct contact; (7) whether the individual has a disqualification from a previous background study that has not been set aside; (8) if the individual has a disqualification which may not be set aside because it is a permanent bar under section 245C.24, subdivision 1, or the individual is a child care background study subject who has a felony-level conviction for a drug-related offense in the last five years, the commissioner may order the immediate removal of the individual from any position allowing direct contact with, or access to, persons receiving services from the program and from working in a children's residential facility or foster residence setting; and (9) if the individual has a disqualification which may not be set aside because it is a permanent bar under section 245C.24, subdivision 2, or the individual is a child care background study subject who has a felony-level conviction for a drug-related offense during the last five years, the commissioner may order the immediate removal of the individual from any position allowing direct contact with or access to persons receiving services from the center and from working in a licensed child care center or certified license-exempt child care center. (c) This section does not apply when the subject of a background study is regulated by a health-related licensing board as defined in chapter 214, and the subject is determined to be responsible for substantiated maltreatment under section 626.557 or chapter 260E. (d) This section does not apply to a background study related to an initial application for a child foster family setting license. (e) Except for paragraph (f), this section does not apply to a background study that is also subject to the requirements under section 256B.0659, subdivisions 11 and 13, for a personal care assistant or a qualified professional as defined in section 256B.0659, subdivision 1new text begin , or to a background study for an individual providing early intensive developmental and behavioral intervention services under section 245A.142 or 256B.0949new text end . (f) If the commissioner has reason to believe, based on arrest information or an active maltreatment investigation, that an individual poses an imminent risk of harm to persons receiving services, the commissioner may order that the person be continuously supervised or immediately removed pending the conclusion of the maltreatment investigation or criminal proceedings. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 17. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 245G.01, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 13d. new text end new text begin Individual counseling. new text end new text begin "Individual counseling" means professionally led psychotherapeutic treatment for substance use disorders that is delivered in a one-to-one setting or in a setting with the client and the client's family and other natural supports. new text end Sec. 18. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 245G.01, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 20f. new text end new text begin Psychoeducation. new text end new text begin "Psychoeducation" means the services described in section 245G.07, subdivision 1a, clause (2). new text end Sec. 19. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 245G.01, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 20g. new text end new text begin Psychosocial treatment services. new text end new text begin "Psychosocial treatment services" means the services described in section 245G.07, subdivision 1a. new text end Sec. 20. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 245G.01, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 20h. new text end new text begin Recovery support services. new text end new text begin "Recovery support services" means the services described in section 245G.07, subdivision 2a, paragraph (b), clause (1). new text end Sec. 21. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 245G.01, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 26a. new text end new text begin Treatment coordination. new text end new text begin "Treatment coordination" means the services described in section 245G.07, subdivision 1b. new text end Sec. 22. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 245G.02, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Exemption from license requirement. This chapter does not apply to a county or recovery community organization that is providing a service for which the county or recovery community organization is an eligible vendor under section 254B.05. This chapter does not apply to an organization whose primary functions are information, referral, diagnosis, case management, and assessment for the purposes of client placement, education, support group services, or self-help programs. This chapter does not apply to the activities of a licensed professional in private practice. A license holder providing the initial set of substance use disorder services allowable under section 254A.03, subdivision 3, paragraph (c), to an individual referred to a licensed nonresidential substance use disorder treatment program after a positive screen for alcohol or substance misuse is exempt from sections 245G.05; 245G.06, subdivisions 1, 1a, and 4; 245G.07, deleted text begin subdivisions 1deleted text end deleted text begin , paragraph (a), clauses (2) to (4), and 2, clauses (1) to (7)deleted text end new text begin subdivision 1a, clause (2)new text end ; and 245G.17. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 23. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 245G.07, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Treatment service. (a) A licensed deleted text begin residentialdeleted text end treatment program must offer the treatment services in deleted text begin clauses (1) to (5)deleted text end new text begin subdivisions 1a and 1b and may offer the treatment services in subdivision 2new text end to each client, unless clinically inappropriate and the justifying clinical rationale is documented. deleted text begin A nonresidentialdeleted text end new text begin Thenew text end treatment program must deleted text begin offer all treatment services in clauses (1) to (5) anddeleted text end document in the individual treatment plan the specific services for which a client has an assessed need and the plan to provide the servicesdeleted text begin :deleted text end new text begin .new text end deleted text begin (1) individual and group counseling to help the client identify and address needs related to substance use and develop strategies to avoid harmful substance use after discharge and to help the client obtain the services necessary to establish a lifestyle free of the harmful effects of substance use disorder; deleted text end deleted text begin (2) client education strategies to avoid inappropriate substance use and health problems related to substance use and the necessary lifestyle changes to regain and maintain health. Client education must include information on tuberculosis education on a form approved by the commissioner, the human immunodeficiency virus according to section 245A.19, other sexually transmitted diseases, drug and alcohol use during pregnancy, and hepatitis; deleted text end deleted text begin (3) a service to help the client integrate gains made during treatment into daily living and to reduce the client's reliance on a staff member for support; deleted text end deleted text begin (4) a service to address issues related to co-occurring disorders, including client education on symptoms of mental illness, the possibility of comorbidity, and the need for continued medication compliance while recovering from substance use disorder. A group must address co-occurring disorders, as needed. When treatment for mental health problems is indicated, the treatment must be integrated into the client's individual treatment plan; and deleted text end deleted text begin (5) treatment coordination provided one-to-one by an individual who meets the staff qualifications in section 245G.11, subdivision 7. Treatment coordination services include: deleted text end deleted text begin (i) assistance in coordination with significant others to help in the treatment planning process whenever possible; deleted text end deleted text begin (ii) assistance in coordination with and follow up for medical services as identified in the treatment plan; deleted text end deleted text begin (iii) facilitation of referrals to substance use disorder services as indicated by a client's medical provider, comprehensive assessment, or treatment plan; deleted text end deleted text begin (iv) facilitation of referrals to mental health services as identified by a client's comprehensive assessment or treatment plan; deleted text end deleted text begin (v) assistance with referrals to economic assistance, social services, housing resources, and prenatal care according to the client's needs; deleted text end deleted text begin (vi) life skills advocacy and support accessing treatment follow-up, disease management, and education services, including referral and linkages to long-term services and supports as needed; and deleted text end deleted text begin (vii) documentation of the provision of treatment coordination services in the client's file. deleted text end (b) A treatment service provided to a client must be provided according to the individual treatment plan and must consider cultural differences and special needs of a client. new text begin (c) A supportive service alone does not constitute a treatment service. Supportive services include: new text end new text begin (1) milieu management or supervising or monitoring clients without also providing a treatment service identified in subdivision 1a, 1b, or 2a; new text end new text begin (2) transporting clients; and new text end new text begin (3) waiting with clients for appointments at social service agencies, court hearings, and similar activities. new text end new text begin (d) A treatment service provided in a group setting must be provided in a cohesive manner and setting that allows every client receiving the service to interact and receive the same service at the same time. new text end Sec. 24. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 245G.07, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1a. new text end new text begin Psychosocial treatment service. new text end new text begin Psychosocial treatment services must be provided according to the hours identified in section 254B.19 for the ASAM level of care provided to the client. A license holder must provide the following psychosocial treatment services as a part of the client's individual treatment: new text end new text begin (1) counseling services that provide a client with professional assistance in managing substance use disorder and co-occurring conditions, either individually or in a group setting. Counseling must: new text end new text begin (i) utilization of evidence-based techniques to help a client modify behavior, overcome obstacles, and achieve and sustain recovery through techniques such as active listening, guidance, discussion, feedback, and clarification; new text end new text begin (ii) help for the client to identify and address needs related to substance use, develop strategies to avoid harmful substance use, and establish a lifestyle free of the harmful effects of substance use disorder; and new text end new text begin (iii) work to improve well-being and mental health, resolve or mitigate symptomatic behaviors, beliefs, compulsions, thoughts, and emotions, and enhance relationships and social skills, while addressing client-centered psychological and emotional needs; and new text end new text begin (2) psychoeducation services to provide a client with information about substance use and co-occurring conditions, either individually or in a group setting. Psychoeducation includes structured presentations, interactive discussions, and practical exercises to help clients understand and manage their conditions effectively. Topics include but are not limited to: new text end new text begin (i) the causes of substance use disorder and co-occurring disorders; new text end new text begin (ii) behavioral techniques that help a client change behaviors, thoughts, and feelings; new text end new text begin (iii) the importance of maintaining mental health, including understanding symptoms of mental illness; new text end new text begin (iv) medications for addiction and psychiatric disorders and the importance of medication adherence; new text end new text begin (v) the importance of maintaining physical health, health-related risk factors associated with substance use disorder, and specific health education on tuberculosis, HIV, other sexually transmitted diseases, drug and alcohol use during pregnancy, and hepatitis; and new text end new text begin (vi) harm-reduction strategies. new text end Sec. 25. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 245G.07, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1b. new text end new text begin Treatment coordination. new text end new text begin (a) Treatment coordination must be provided one-to-one by an individual who meets the staff qualifications in section 245G.11, subdivision 7. Treatment coordination services include: new text end new text begin (1) coordinating directly with others involved in the client's treatment and recovery, including the referral source, family or natural supports, social services agencies, and external care providers; new text end new text begin (2) providing clients with training and facilitating connections to community resources that support recovery; new text end new text begin (3) assisting clients in obtaining necessary resources and services such as financial assistance, housing, food, clothing, medical care, education, harm reduction services, vocational support, and recreational services that promote recovery; new text end new text begin (4) helping clients connect and engage with self-help support groups and expand social support networks with family, friends, and organizations; and new text end new text begin (5) assisting clients in transitioning between levels of care, including providing direct connections to ensure continuity of care. new text end new text begin (b) Treatment coordination does not include coordinating services or communicating with staff members within the licensed program. new text end new text begin (c) Treatment coordination may be provided in a setting with the individual client and others involved in the client's treatment and recovery. new text end Sec. 26. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 245G.07, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 2a. new text end new text begin Ancillary treatment service. new text end new text begin (a) A license holder may provide ancillary services in addition to the hours of psychosocial treatment services identified in section 254B.19 for the ASAM level of care provided to the client. new text end new text begin (b) A license holder may provide the following ancillary treatment services as a part of the client's individual treatment: new text end new text begin (1) recovery support services provided individually or in a group setting, that include: new text end new text begin (i) supporting clients in restoring daily living skills, such as health and health care navigation and self-care to enhance personal well-being; new text end new text begin (ii) providing resources and assistance to help clients restore life skills, including effective parenting, financial management, pro-social behavior, education, employment, and nutrition; new text end new text begin (iii) assisting clients in restoring daily functioning and routines affected by substance use and supporting them in developing skills for successful community integration; and new text end new text begin (iv) helping clients respond to or avoid triggers that threaten their community stability, assisting the client in identifying potential crises and developing a plan to address them, and providing support to restore the client's stability and functioning; and new text end new text begin (2) peer recovery support services provided according to sections 254B.05, subdivision 5, and 254B.052. new text end Sec. 27. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 245G.07, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. deleted text begin Counselorsdeleted text end new text begin Treatment service providersnew text end . new text begin (a) new text end All treatment servicesdeleted text begin , except peer recovery support services and treatment coordination,deleted text end must be provided by an deleted text begin alcohol and drug counselor qualified according to section 245G.11, subdivision 5, unless thedeleted text end individual deleted text begin providing the service isdeleted text end specifically qualified according to the accepted credential required to provide the service. deleted text begin The commissioner shall maintain a current list of professionals qualified to provide treatment services.deleted text end new text begin (b) Psychosocial treatment services must be provided by an alcohol and drug counselor qualified according to section 245G.11, subdivision 5, unless the individual providing the service is specifically qualified according to the accepted credential required to provide the service. The commissioner shall maintain a current list of professionals qualified to provide psychosocial treatment services. new text end new text begin (c) Treatment coordination must be provided by a treatment coordinator qualified according to section 245G.11, subdivision 7. new text end new text begin (d) Recovery support services must be provided by a behavioral health practitioner qualified according to section 245G.11, subdivision 12. new text end new text begin (e) Peer recovery support services must be provided by a recovery peer qualified according to section 245I.04, subdivision 18. new text end Sec. 28. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 245G.07, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Location of service provision. (a) The license holder must provide all treatment services a client receives at one of the license holder's substance use disorder treatment licensed locations or at a location allowed under paragraphs (b) to (f). If the services are provided at the locations in paragraphs (b) to (d), the license holder must document in the client record the location services were provided. (b) The license holder may provide nonresidential individual treatment services at a client's home or place of residence. (c) If the license holder provides treatment services by telehealth, the services must be provided according to this paragraph: (1) the license holder must maintain a licensed physical location in Minnesota where the license holder must offer all treatment services in subdivision deleted text begin 1, paragraph (a), clauses (1) to (4),deleted text end new text begin 1anew text end physically in-person to each client; (2) the license holder must meet all requirements for the provision of telehealth in sections 254B.05, subdivision 5, paragraph (f), and 256B.0625, subdivision 3b. The license holder must document all items in section 256B.0625, subdivision 3b, paragraph (c), for each client receiving services by telehealth, regardless of payment type or whether the client is a medical assistance enrollee; (3) the license holder may provide treatment services by telehealth to clients individually; (4) the license holder may provide treatment services by telehealth to a group of clients that are each in a separate physical location; (5) the license holder must not provide treatment services remotely by telehealth to a group of clients meeting together in person, unless permitted under clause (7); (6) clients and staff may join an in-person group by telehealth if a staff member qualified to provide the treatment service is physically present with the group of clients meeting together in person; and (7) the qualified professional providing a residential group treatment service by telehealth must be physically present on-site at the licensed residential location while the service is being provided. If weather conditions or short-term illness prohibit a qualified professional from traveling to the residential program and another qualified professional is not available to provide the service, a qualified professional may provide a residential group treatment service by telehealth from a location away from the licensed residential location. In such circumstances, the license holder must ensure that a qualified professional does not provide a residential group treatment service by telehealth from a location away from the licensed residential location for more than one day at a time, must ensure that a staff person who qualifies as a paraprofessional is physically present with the group of clients, and must document the reason for providing the remote telehealth service in the records of clients receiving the service. The license holder must document the dates that residential group treatment services were provided by telehealth from a location away from the licensed residential location in a central log and must provide the log to the commissioner upon request. (d) The license holder may provide the deleted text begin additionaldeleted text end new text begin ancillarynew text end treatment services under subdivision deleted text begin 2, clauses (2) to (6) and (8),deleted text end new text begin 2anew text end away from the licensed location at a suitable location appropriate to the treatment service. (e) Upon written approval from the commissioner for each satellite location, the license holder may provide nonresidential treatment services at satellite locations that are in a school, jail, or nursing home. A satellite location may only provide services to students of the school, inmates of the jail, or residents of the nursing home. Schools, jails, and nursing homes are exempt from the licensing requirements in section 245A.04, subdivision 2a, to document compliance with building codes, fire and safety codes, health rules, and zoning ordinances. (f) The commissioner may approve other suitable locations as satellite locations for nonresidential treatment services. The commissioner may require satellite locations under this paragraph to meet all applicable licensing requirements. The license holder may not have more than two satellite locations per license under this paragraph. (g) The license holder must provide the commissioner access to all files, documentation, staff persons, and any other information the commissioner requires at the main licensed location for all clients served at any location under paragraphs (b) to (f). (h) Notwithstanding sections 245A.65, subdivision 2, and 626.557, subdivision 14, a program abuse prevention plan is not required for satellite or other locations under paragraphs (b) to (e). An individual abuse prevention plan is still required for any client that is a vulnerable adult as defined in section 626.5572, subdivision 21. Sec. 29. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 245G.11, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Paraprofessionals. A paraprofessional must have knowledge of client rights, according to section 148F.165, and staff member responsibilities. A paraprofessional may notnew text begin make decisions tonew text end admit, transfer, or discharge a client but maynew text begin perform tasks related to intake and orientation. A paraprofessional maynew text end benew text begin thenew text end responsible deleted text begin for the delivery of treatment servicedeleted text end new text begin staff membernew text end according to section 245G.10, subdivision 3.new text begin A paraprofessional is not qualified to provide a treatment service according to section 245G.07, subdivisions 1a, 1b, and 2a.new text end Sec. 30. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 245G.11, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Treatment coordination provider qualifications. (a) Treatment coordination must be provided by qualified staff. An individual is qualified to provide treatment coordination if the individual meets the qualifications of an alcohol and drug counselor under subdivision 5 or if the individual: (1) is skilled in the process of identifying and assessing a wide range of client needs; (2) is knowledgeable about local community resources and how to use those resources for the benefit of the client; (3) has successfully completed 30 hours of classroom instruction on treatment coordination for an individual with substance use disorder; (4) has deleted text begin either:deleted text end new text begin a high school diploma or equivalent; andnew text end deleted text begin (i) a bachelor's degree in one of the behavioral sciences or related fields; or deleted text end deleted text begin (ii) current certification as an alcohol and drug counselor, level I, by the Upper Midwest Indian Council on Addictive Disorders; and deleted text end (5) has at least deleted text begin 2,000deleted text end new text begin 1,000new text end hours of supervised experience working with individuals with substance use disorder. (b) A treatment coordinator must receive at least one hour of supervision regarding individual service delivery from an alcohol and drug counselor, or a mental health professional who has substance use treatment and assessments within the scope of their practice, on a monthly basis. Sec. 31. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 245G.11, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 12. new text end new text begin Behavioral health practitioners. new text end new text begin (a) A behavioral health practitioner must meet the qualifications in section 245I.04, subdivision 4. new text end new text begin (b) A behavioral health practitioner working within a substance use disorder treatment program licensed under this chapter has the following scope of practice: new text end new text begin (1) a behavioral health practitioner may provide clients with recovery support services, as defined in section 245G.07, subdivision 2a, paragraph (b), clause (1); and new text end new text begin (2) a behavioral health practitioner must not provide treatment supervision to other staff persons. new text end new text begin (c) A behavioral health practitioner working within a substance use disorder treatment program licensed under this chapter must receive at least one hour of supervision per month on individual service delivery from an alcohol and drug counselor or a mental health professional who has substance use treatment and assessments within the scope of their practice. new text end Sec. 32. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 245G.22, subdivision 11, is amended to read: Subd. 11. Waiting list. An opioid treatment program must have a waiting list system. If the person seeking admission cannot be admitted within 14 days of the date of application, each person seeking admission must be placed on the waiting list, unless the person seeking admission is assessed by the program and found ineligible for admission according to this chapter and Code of Federal Regulations, title 42, part 1, subchapter A, section 8.12 (e), and title 45, parts 160 to 164. The waiting list must assign a unique client identifier for each person seeking treatment while awaiting admission. A person seeking admission on a waiting list who receives no services under section 245G.07, subdivision deleted text begin 1deleted text end new text begin 1a or 1bnew text end , must not be considered a client as defined in section 245G.01, subdivision 9. Sec. 33. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 245G.22, subdivision 15, is amended to read: Subd. 15. Nonmedication treatment services; documentation. (a) The program must offer at least 50 consecutive minutes of individual or group therapy treatment services as defined in section 245G.07, subdivision deleted text begin 1deleted text end deleted text begin , paragraph (a)deleted text end new text begin 1anew text end , clause (1), per week, for the first ten weeks following the day of service initiation, and at least 50 consecutive minutes per month thereafter. As clinically appropriate, the program may offer these services cumulatively and not consecutively in increments of no less than 15 minutes over the required time period, and for a total of 60 minutes of treatment services over the time period, and must document the reason for providing services cumulatively in the client's record. The program may offer additional levels of service when deemed clinically necessary. (b) Notwithstanding the requirements of comprehensive assessments in section 245G.05, the assessment must be completed within 21 days from the day of service initiation. Sec. 34. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 254B.01, subdivision 10, is amended to read: Subd. 10. deleted text begin Skilleddeleted text end new text begin Psychosocialnew text end treatment services. "deleted text begin Skilleddeleted text end new text begin Psychosocialnew text end treatment services" includes the treatment services described in section 245G.07, deleted text begin subdivisions 1, paragraph (a), clauses (1) to (4), and 2, clauses (1) to (6). Skilleddeleted text end new text begin subdivision 1a. Psychosocialnew text end treatment services must be provided by qualified professionals as identified in section 245G.07, subdivision 3new text begin , paragraph (b)new text end . Sec. 35. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 254B.01, subdivision 11, is amended to read: Subd. 11. deleted text begin Sober homedeleted text end new text begin Recovery residencenew text end . A deleted text begin sober homedeleted text end new text begin recovery residencenew text end is a cooperative living residence, a room and board residence, an apartment, or any other living accommodation that: (1) provides temporary housing to persons with substance use disorders; (2) stipulates that residents must abstain from using alcohol or other illicit drugs or substances not prescribed by a physician; (3) charges a fee for living there; (4) does not provide counseling or treatment services to residents; (5) promotes sustained recovery from substance use disorders; and (6) follows the sober living guidelines published by the federal Substance Abuse and Mental Health Services Administration. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027. new text end Sec. 36. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 254B.05, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Licensure or certification required. (a) Programs licensed by the commissioner are eligible vendors. Hospitals may apply for and receive licenses to be eligible vendors, notwithstanding the provisions of section 245A.03. American Indian programs that provide substance use disorder treatment, extended care, transitional residence, or outpatient treatment services, and are licensed by tribal government are eligible vendors. (b) A licensed professional in private practice as defined in section 245G.01, subdivision 17, who meets the requirements of section 245G.11, subdivisions 1 and 4, is an eligible vendor of a comprehensive assessment provided according to section 254A.19, subdivision 3, and treatment services provided according to sections 245G.06 and 245G.07, deleted text begin subdivision 1deleted text end deleted text begin , paragraphs (a), clauses (1) to (5), and (b); and subdivision 2, clauses (1) to (6).deleted text end new text begin subdivisions 1, 1a, and 1b.new text end (c) A county is an eligible vendor for a comprehensive assessment when provided by an individual who meets the staffing credentials of section 245G.11, subdivisions 1 and 5, and completed according to the requirements of section 254A.19, subdivision 3. A county is an eligible vendor of deleted text begin caredeleted text end new text begin treatmentnew text end coordination services when provided by an individual who meets the staffing credentials of section 245G.11, subdivisions 1 and 7, and provided according to the requirements of section 245G.07, subdivision deleted text begin 1deleted text end deleted text begin , paragraph (a), clause (5)deleted text end new text begin 1bnew text end . A county is an eligible vendor of peer recovery services when the services are provided by an individual who meets the requirements of section 245G.11, subdivision 8new text begin , and according to section 254B.052new text end . (d) A recovery community organization that meets the requirements of clauses (1) to (14) and meets certification or accreditation requirements of the Alliance for Recovery Centered Organizations, the Council on Accreditation of Peer Recovery Support Services, or a Minnesota statewide recovery organization identified by the commissioner is an eligible vendor of peer recovery support services. A Minnesota statewide recovery organization identified by the commissioner must update recovery community organization applicants for certification or accreditation on the status of the application within 45 days of receipt. If the approved statewide recovery organization denies an application, it must provide a written explanation for the denial to the recovery community organization. Eligible vendors under this paragraph must: (1) be nonprofit organizations under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, be free from conflicting self-interests, and be autonomous in decision-making, program development, peer recovery support services provided, and advocacy efforts for the purpose of supporting the recovery community organization's mission; (2) be led and governed by individuals in the recovery community, with more than 50 percent of the board of directors or advisory board members self-identifying as people in personal recovery from substance use disorders; (3) have a mission statement and conduct corresponding activities indicating that the organization's primary purpose is to support recovery from substance use disorder; (4) demonstrate ongoing community engagement with the identified primary region and population served by the organization, including individuals in recovery and their families, friends, and recovery allies; (5) be accountable to the recovery community through documented priority-setting and participatory decision-making processes that promote the engagement of, and consultation with, people in recovery and their families, friends, and recovery allies; (6) provide nonclinical peer recovery support services, including but not limited to recovery support groups, recovery coaching, telephone recovery support, skill-building, and harm-reduction activities, and provide recovery public education and advocacy; (7) have written policies that allow for and support opportunities for all paths toward recovery and refrain from excluding anyone based on their chosen recovery path, which may include but is not limited to harm reduction paths, faith-based paths, and nonfaith-based paths; (8) maintain organizational practices to meet the needs of Black, Indigenous, and people of color communities, LGBTQ+ communities, and other underrepresented or marginalized communities. Organizational practices may include board and staff training, service offerings, advocacy efforts, and culturally informed outreach and services; (9) use recovery-friendly language in all media and written materials that is supportive of and promotes recovery across diverse geographical and cultural contexts and reduces stigma; (10) establish and maintain a publicly available recovery community organization code of ethics and grievance policy and procedures; (11) not classify or treat any recovery peer hired on or after July 1, 2024, as an independent contractor; (12) not classify or treat any recovery peer as an independent contractor on or after January 1, 2025; (13) provide an orientation for recovery peers that includes an overview of the consumer advocacy services provided by the Ombudsman for Mental Health and Developmental Disabilities and other relevant advocacy services; and (14) provide notice to peer recovery support services participants that includes the following statement: "If you have a complaint about the provider or the person providing your peer recovery support services, you may contact the Minnesota Alliance of Recovery Community Organizations. You may also contact the Office of Ombudsman for Mental Health and Developmental Disabilities." The statement must also include: (i) the telephone number, website address, email address, and mailing address of the Minnesota Alliance of Recovery Community Organizations and the Office of Ombudsman for Mental Health and Developmental Disabilities; (ii) the recovery community organization's name, address, email, telephone number, and name or title of the person at the recovery community organization to whom problems or complaints may be directed; and (iii) a statement that the recovery community organization will not retaliate against a peer recovery support services participant because of a complaint. (e) A recovery community organization approved by the commissioner before June 30, 2023, must have begun the application process as required by an approved certifying or accrediting entity and have begun the process to meet the requirements under paragraph (d) by September 1, 2024, in order to be considered as an eligible vendor of peer recovery support services. (f) A recovery community organization that is aggrieved by an accreditation, certification, or membership determination and believes it meets the requirements under paragraph (d) may appeal the determination under section 256.045, subdivision 3, paragraph (a), clause (14), for reconsideration as an eligible vendor. If the human services judge determines that the recovery community organization meets the requirements under paragraph (d), the recovery community organization is an eligible vendor of peer recovery support services. (g) All recovery community organizations must be certified or accredited by an entity listed in paragraph (d) by June 30, 2025. (h) Detoxification programs licensed under Minnesota Rules, parts 9530.6510 to 9530.6590, are not eligible vendors. Programs that are not licensed as a residential or nonresidential substance use disorder treatment or withdrawal management program by the commissioner or by tribal government or do not meet the requirements of subdivisions 1a and 1b are not eligible vendors. (i) Hospitals, federally qualified health centers, and rural health clinics are eligible vendors of a comprehensive assessment when the comprehensive assessment is completed according to section 254A.19, subdivision 3, and by an individual who meets the criteria of an alcohol and drug counselor according to section 245G.11, subdivision 5. The alcohol and drug counselor must be individually enrolled with the commissioner and reported on the claim as the individual who provided the service. (j) Any complaints about a recovery community organization or peer recovery support services may be made to and reviewed or investigated by the ombudsperson for behavioral health and developmental disabilities under sections 245.91 and 245.94. Sec. 37. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 254B.05, subdivision 1a, is amended to read: Subd. 1a. Room and board provider requirements. (a) Vendors of room and board are eligible for behavioral health fund payment if the vendor: (1) has rules prohibiting residents bringing chemicals into the facility or using chemicals while residing in the facility and provide consequences for infractions of those rules; (2) is determined to meet applicable health and safety requirements; (3) is not a jail or prison; (4) is not concurrently receiving funds under chapter 256I for the recipient; (5) admits individuals who are 18 years of age or older; (6) is registered as a board and lodging or lodging establishment according to section 157.17; (7) has awake staff on site whenever a client is present; (8) has staff who are at least 18 years of age and meet the requirements of section 245G.11, subdivision 1, paragraph (b); (9) has emergency behavioral procedures that meet the requirements of section 245G.16; (10) meets the requirements of section 245G.08, subdivision 5, if administering medications to clients; (11) meets the abuse prevention requirements of section 245A.65, including a policy on fraternization and the mandatory reporting requirements of section 626.557; (12) documents coordination with the treatment provider to ensure compliance with section 254B.03, subdivision 2; (13) protects client funds and ensures freedom from exploitation by meeting the provisions of section 245A.04, subdivision 13; (14) has a grievance procedure that meets the requirements of section 245G.15, subdivision 2; and (15) has sleeping and bathroom facilities for men and women separated by a door that is locked, has an alarm, or is supervised by awake staff. (b) Programs licensed according to Minnesota Rules, chapter 2960, are exempt from paragraph (a), clauses (5) to (15). (c) Programs providing children's mental health crisis admissions and stabilization under section 245.4882, subdivision 6, are eligible vendors of room and board. (d) Programs providing children's residential services under section 245.4882, except services for individuals who have a placement under chapter 260C or 260D, are eligible vendors of room and board. (e) Licensed programs providing intensive residential treatment services or residential crisis stabilization services pursuant to section 256B.0622 or 256B.0624 are eligible vendors of room and board and are exempt from paragraph (a), clauses (6) to (15). (f) A vendor that is not licensed as a residential treatment program must have a policy to address staffing coverage when a client may unexpectedly need to be present at the room and board site. new text begin (g) No new vendors for room and board services may be approved after June 30, 2025, to receive payments from the behavioral health fund, under the provisions of section 254B.04, subdivision 2a. Room and board vendors that were approved and operating prior to July 1, 2025, may continue to receive payments from the behavioral health fund for services provided until June 30, 2027. Room and board vendors providing services in accordance with section 254B.04, subdivision 2a, will no longer be eligible to claim reimbursement for room and board services provided on or after July 1, 2027. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 38. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 254B.06, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Prohibition of duplicative claim submission. new text end new text begin (a) For time-based claims, submissions must follow the guidelines in the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services' Healthcare Common Procedure Coding System and the American Medical Association's Current Procedural Terminology to determine the appropriate units of time to report. new text end new text begin (b) More than half the duration of a time-based code must be spent performing the service to be eligible under this section. Any provision of service during the remaining balance of the unit of time is not eligible for any other claims submission and would be considered a duplicative claim submission. new text end new text begin (c) A provider may only round up to the next whole number of service units on a submitted claim when more than one and one-half times the defined value of the code has occurred and no additional time increment code exists. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 39. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 254B.181, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Requirements. new text begin (a) All recovery residences must be certified by the commissioner in accordance with the standards of a National Alliance for Recovery Residences Level 1 or Level 2 recovery residence. new text end new text begin (b) new text end All deleted text begin sober homesdeleted text end new text begin recovery residencesnew text end mustnew text begin :new text end new text begin (1)new text end comply with applicable state laws and regulations and local ordinances related to maximum occupancy, fire safety, and sanitationdeleted text begin . In addition, all sober homes must:deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (2) have safety policies and procedures that at a minimum address: new text end new text begin (i) safety inspections requiring periodic verification of smoke detectors, carbon monoxide detectors, and fire extinguishers, and emergency evacuation drills; new text end new text begin (ii) exposure to bodily fluids and contagious diseases; and new text end new text begin (iii) emergency procedures posted in conspicuous locations in the residence; new text end deleted text begin (1)deleted text end new text begin (3)new text end maintain a supply of an opiate antagonist in the home deleted text begin in a conspicuous location anddeleted text end new text begin ,new text end post information on proper usenew text begin , and train staff on how to administer the opiate antagonistnew text end ; deleted text begin (2)deleted text end new text begin (4)new text end have written policies regarding access to all prescribed medicationsnew text begin and storage of medications when requested by a residentnew text end ; deleted text begin (3)deleted text end new text begin (5)new text end have written policies regarding deleted text begin evictionsdeleted text end new text begin residency termination that include how length of stay is determined and eviction proceduresnew text end ; deleted text begin (4)deleted text end new text begin (6)new text end return all property and medications to a person discharged from the home and retain the items for a minimum of 60 days if the person did not collect them upon discharge. The owner must make an effort to contact persons listed as emergency contacts for the discharged person so that the items are returned; new text begin (7) ensure separation of funds of persons served by the program from funds of the program or program staff. The program and staff must not: new text end new text begin (i) borrow money from a person served by the program; new text end new text begin (ii) purchase personal items from a person served by the program; new text end new text begin (iii) sell merchandise or personal services to a person served by the program; new text end new text begin (iv) require a person served by the program to purchase items for which the program is eligible for reimbursement; or new text end new text begin (v) use funds of persons served by the program to purchase items for which the program is already receiving public or private payments; new text end deleted text begin (5)deleted text end new text begin (8)new text end document the names and contact information for persons to contact in case of an emergency or upon discharge and notification of a family member, or other emergency contact designated by the resident under certain circumstances, including but not limited to death due to an overdose; deleted text begin (6)deleted text end new text begin (9)new text end maintain contact information for emergency resources in the community to address mental health and health emergencies; deleted text begin (7)deleted text end new text begin (10)new text end have policies on staff qualifications and prohibition against fraternization; deleted text begin (8)deleted text end new text begin (11)new text end permit residents to use, as directed by a licensed prescriber, legally prescribed and dispensed or administered pharmacotherapies approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration for the treatment of opioid use disorder; deleted text begin (9)deleted text end new text begin (12)new text end permit residents to use, as directed by a licensed prescriber, legally prescribed and dispensed or administered pharmacotherapies approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration to treat co-occurring substance use disorders and mental health conditions; deleted text begin (10)deleted text end new text begin (13)new text end have a fee schedule and refund policy; deleted text begin (11)deleted text end new text begin (14)new text end have rules for residentsnew text begin , including on any prohibited itemsnew text end ; deleted text begin (12)deleted text end new text begin (15)new text end have policies that promote resident participation in treatment, self-help groups, or other recovery supports; deleted text begin (13)deleted text end new text begin (16)new text end have policies requiring abstinence from alcohol and illicit drugsnew text begin on the property. If the program utilizes drug screening or toxicology, the procedures must be included in policynew text end ; deleted text begin anddeleted text end deleted text begin (14)deleted text end new text begin (17)new text end distributenew text begin and post in the common areasnew text end the deleted text begin sober homedeleted text end new text begin residentnew text end bill of rightsdeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin , resident rules, and grievance process;new text end new text begin (18) have policies and procedures on searches; new text end new text begin (19) have code of ethics policies and procedures that are aligned with the National Alliance for Recovery Residences code of ethics and document that the policies and procedures are read and signed by every individual associated with the operation of the recovery residence, including owners, operators, staff, and volunteers; new text end new text begin (20) have a description of how residents are involved with the governance of the residence, including decision-making procedures, how residents are involved in setting and implementing rules, and the role of peer leaders, if any; and new text end new text begin (21) have procedures to maintain a respectful environment, including appropriate action to stop intimidation, bullying, sexual harassment, or threatening behavior of residents, staff, and visitors within the residence. Programs must consider trauma-informed and resilience-promoting practices when determining action. new text end Sec. 40. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 254B.181, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Bill of rights. An individual living in a deleted text begin sober homedeleted text end new text begin recovery residencenew text end has the right to: (1) have access to an environment that supports recovery; (2) have access to an environment that is safe and free from alcohol and other illicit drugs or substances; (3) be free from physical and verbal abuse, neglect, financial exploitation, and all forms of maltreatment covered under the Vulnerable Adults Act, sections 626.557 to 626.5572; (4) be treated with dignity and respect and to have personal property treated with respect; (5) have personal, financial, and medical information kept private and to be advised of the deleted text begin sober home'sdeleted text end new text begin recovery residence'snew text end policies and procedures regarding disclosure of such information; (6) access, while living in the residence, to other community-based support services as needed; (7) be referred to appropriate services upon leaving the residence, if necessary; (8) retain personal property that does not jeopardize safety or health; (9) assert these rights personally or have them asserted by the individual's representative or by anyone on behalf of the individual without retaliation; (10) be provided with the name, address, and telephone number of the ombudsman for mental healthdeleted text begin , substance use disorder,deleted text end and developmental disabilitiesnew text begin and the certifying designated state affiliatenew text end and information about the right to file a complaint; (11) be fully informed of these rights and responsibilities, as well as program policies and procedures; and (12) not be required to perform services for the residence that are not included in the usual expectations for all residents. Sec. 41. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 254B.181, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Complaintsdeleted text begin ; ombudsman for mental health and developmental disabilitiesdeleted text end . Any complaints about a deleted text begin sober homedeleted text end new text begin recovery residencenew text end may be made to and reviewed or investigated by the ombudsman for mental health and developmental disabilities, pursuant to sections 245.91 and 245.94new text begin , and the certifying designated state affiliatenew text end . Sec. 42. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 254B.181, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Resident records. new text end new text begin (a) A recovery residence must maintain documentation for each resident of a written agreement prior to beginning residency that includes the following: new text end new text begin (1) the resident bill of rights; new text end new text begin (2) financial obligations and agreements, refund policy, and payments from third party payers for any fees paid on the resident's behalf; new text end new text begin (3) services provided; new text end new text begin (4) recovery goals; new text end new text begin (5) relapse policies; and new text end new text begin (6) policies on personal property. new text end new text begin (b) A recovery residence must maintain documentation for each resident demonstrating: new text end new text begin (1) completion of orientation on emergency procedures; new text end new text begin (2) completion of orientation on resident rules; new text end new text begin (3) that the resident is formally linked with the community, such as the resident maintaining or searching for a job, being enrolled in an education program, or working with family services or health and housing programs; new text end new text begin (4) that residents and staff engage in community relations and interactions to promote kinship with other recovery communities and goodwill for recovery services; and new text end new text begin (5) any referrals made for additional services. new text end new text begin (c) Resident records are private data on individuals as defined in section 13.02, subdivision 12. new text end Sec. 43. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 254B.181, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Staff requirements. new text end new text begin Certified level 2 programs must have staff to model and teach recovery skills and behaviors and must have the following policies and procedures: new text end new text begin (1) written job descriptions for each staff member position, including position responsibilities and qualifications; new text end new text begin (2) performance plans for development of staff in need of improvement; new text end new text begin (3) a staffing plan that demonstrates continuous development for all staff; new text end new text begin (4) background checks for all staff who will have direct and regular interaction with residents; new text end new text begin (5) expectations for staff to maintain clear personal and professional boundaries; new text end new text begin (6) annual trainings on emergency procedures, the resident bill of rights, grievance policies and procedures, and the code of ethics; and new text end new text begin (7) a prohibition on staff providing billable peer recovery support services to residents of the recovery residence. new text end Sec. 44. new text begin [254B.182] RECOVERY RESIDENCE CERTIFICATION. new text end new text begin (a) Effective January 1, 2027, the commissioner of human services shall certify all recovery residences in Minnesota that are in compliance with section 254B.181. Beginning January 1, 2027, a recovery residence may not serve clients without a certification from the commissioner. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner shall: new text end new text begin (1) publish a list of certified recovery residences, including any data related to date of certification, contact information, compliance reports, and the results of any investigations. The facts of any investigation that substantiates an adverse impact on an individual's health or safety is public information, except for any identifying information on a resident or complainant; new text end new text begin (2) make requirements for certification of recovery residences publicly accessible; new text end new text begin (3) review and recertify recovery residences every three years; new text end new text begin (4) compile an annual report on the number of recovery residences, the number of newly certified recovery residences in the last year, and the number of recovery residences that lost certification in the last year; new text end new text begin (5) review and make certification determinations for all recovery residences beginning on July 1, 2027; and new text end new text begin (6) make a certification determination for a recovery residence within 90 days of application. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner may decertify a recovery residence with a 30-day notice. new text end new text begin (d) A recovery residence that is not certified or is decertified may request reconsideration. The recovery residence must appeal a denial or decertification in writing and send or deliver the reconsideration request to the commissioner by certified mail, by personal service, or through the provider licensing and reporting hub. If the recovery residence mails the reconsideration request, the reconsideration request must be postmarked and sent to the commissioner within ten calendar days after the recovery residence receives the order of certification denial or decertification. If the recovery residence delivers a reconsideration request by personal service, the commissioner must receive the reconsideration request within ten calendar days after the recovery residence received the order. If the order is issued through the provider hub, the request must be received by the commissioner within 20 calendar days from the date the commissioner issued the order through the hub. If a recovery residence submits a timely reconsideration request of an order of certification denial or decertification, the recovery residence may continue to operate the program until the commissioner issues a final order. The commissioner's disposition of a request for reconsideration is final and not subject to appeal under chapter 14. new text end Sec. 45. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 254B.19, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Level of care requirements. (a) For each client assigned an ASAM level of care, eligible vendors must implement the standards set by the ASAM for the respective level of care. Additionally, vendors must meet the following requirements: (1) For ASAM level 0.5 early intervention targeting individuals who are at risk of developing a substance-related problem but may not have a diagnosed substance use disorder, early intervention services may include individual or group counseling, treatment coordination, peer recovery support, screening brief intervention, and referral to treatment provided according to section 254A.03, subdivision 3, paragraph (c). (2) For ASAM level 1.0 outpatient clients, adults must receive up to eight hours per week of deleted text begin skilleddeleted text end new text begin psychosocialnew text end treatment services and adolescents must receive up to five hours per week. Services must be licensed according to section 245G.20 and meet requirements under section 256B.0759. deleted text begin Peer recoverydeleted text end new text begin Ancillary servicesnew text end and treatment coordination may be provided beyond the hourly deleted text begin skilleddeleted text end new text begin psychosocialnew text end treatment service hours allowable per week. (3) For ASAM level 2.1 intensive outpatient clients, adults must receive nine to 19 hours per week of deleted text begin skilleddeleted text end new text begin psychosocialnew text end treatment services and adolescents must receive six or more hours per week. Vendors must be licensed according to section 245G.20 and must meet requirements under section 256B.0759. deleted text begin Peer recoverydeleted text end new text begin Ancillarynew text end services and treatment coordination may be provided beyond the hourly deleted text begin skilleddeleted text end new text begin psychosocialnew text end treatment service hours allowable per week. If clinically indicated on the client's treatment plan, this service may be provided in conjunction with room and board according to section 254B.05, subdivision 1a. (4) For ASAM level 2.5 partial hospitalization clients, adults must receive 20 hours or more of deleted text begin skilleddeleted text end new text begin psychosocialnew text end treatment services. Services must be licensed according to section 245G.20 deleted text begin and must meet requirements under section 256B.0759deleted text end . Level 2.5 is for clients who need daily monitoring in a structured setting, as directed by the individual treatment plan and in accordance with the limitations in section 254B.05, subdivision 5, paragraph (h). If clinically indicated on the client's treatment plan, this service may be provided in conjunction with room and board according to section 254B.05, subdivision 1a. (5) For ASAM level 3.1 clinically managed low-intensity residential clients, programs must provide at least 5 hours of deleted text begin skilleddeleted text end new text begin psychosocialnew text end treatment services per week according to each client's specific treatment schedule, as directed by the individual treatment plan. Programs must be licensed according to section 245G.20 and must meet requirements under section 256B.0759. (6) For ASAM level 3.3 clinically managed population-specific high-intensity residential clients, programs must be licensed according to section 245G.20 and must meet requirements under section 256B.0759. Programs must have 24-hour staffing coverage. Programs must be enrolled as a disability responsive program as described in section 254B.01, subdivision 4b, and must specialize in serving persons with a traumatic brain injury or a cognitive impairment so significant, and the resulting level of impairment so great, that outpatient or other levels of residential care would not be feasible or effective. Programs must provide, at a minimum, daily deleted text begin skilleddeleted text end new text begin psychosocialnew text end treatment services seven days a week according to each client's specific treatment schedule, as directed by the individual treatment plan. (7) For ASAM level 3.5 clinically managed high-intensity residential clients, services must be licensed according to section 245G.20 and must meet requirements under section 256B.0759. Programs must have 24-hour staffing coverage and provide, at a minimum, daily deleted text begin skilleddeleted text end new text begin psychosocialnew text end treatment services seven days a week according to each client's specific treatment schedule, as directed by the individual treatment plan. (8) For ASAM level withdrawal management 3.2 clinically managed clients, withdrawal management must be provided according to chapter 245F. (9) For ASAM level withdrawal management 3.7 medically monitored clients, withdrawal management must be provided according to chapter 245F. (b) Notwithstanding the minimum daily deleted text begin skilleddeleted text end new text begin psychosocialnew text end treatment service requirements under paragraph (a), clauses (6) and (7), ASAM level 3.3 and 3.5 vendors must provide each client at least 30 hours of treatment services per week for the period between January 1, 2024, through June 30, 2024. Sec. 46. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256.98, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Wrongfully obtaining assistance. (a) A person who commits any of the following acts or omissions with intent to defeat the purposes of sections 145.891 to 145.897, the MFIP program formerly codified in sections 256.031 to 256.0361, the AFDC program formerly codified in sections 256.72 to 256.871, chapter 142G, 256B, 256D, 256I, 256K, or 256L, child care assistance programs, and emergency assistance programs under section 256D.06, is guilty of theft and shall be sentenced under section 609.52, subdivision 3, clauses (1) to (5): (1) obtains or attempts to obtain, or aids or abets any person to obtain by means of a willfully false statement or representation, by intentional concealment of any material fact, or by impersonation or other fraudulent device, assistance or the continued receipt of assistance, to include child care assistance or food benefits produced according to sections 145.891 to 145.897 and MinnesotaCare services according to sections 256.9365, 256.94, and 256L.01 to 256L.15, to which the person is not entitled or assistance greater than that to which the person is entitled; (2) knowingly aids or abets in buying or in any way disposing of the property of a recipient or applicant of assistance without the consent of the county agency; or (3) obtains or attempts to obtain, alone or in collusion with others, the receipt of payments to which the individual is not entitled as a provider of subsidized child caredeleted text begin , ordeleted text end by deleted text begin furnishing or concurring indeleted text end new text begin receiving or providing any prohibited payment, as defined in section 609.542, subdivision 2, including a kickback, or by submitting or aiding or abetting the submission ofnew text end a willfully false claim for child care assistance. (b) The continued receipt of assistance to which the person is not entitled or greater than that to which the person is entitled as a result of any of the acts, failure to act, or concealment described in this subdivision shall be deemed to be continuing offenses from the date that the first act or failure to act occurred. Sec. 47. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256.983, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Funding. (a) County and Tribal agency reimbursement shall be made through the settlement provisions applicable to the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP), MFIP, child care assistance programs, the medical assistance program, and other federal and state-funded programs. (b) The commissioners will maintain program compliance if for any deleted text begin three consecutive month perioddeleted text end new text begin quarternew text end , a county or Tribal agency fails to comply with fraud prevention investigation program guidelines, or fails to meet the cost-effectiveness standards developed by the commissioners. This result is contingent on the commissioners providing written notice, including an offer of technical assistance, within 30 days of the end of the deleted text begin third or subsequent monthdeleted text end new text begin quarternew text end of noncompliance. The county or Tribal agency shall be required to submit a corrective action plan to the commissioners within 30 days of receipt of a notice of noncompliance. Failure to submit a corrective action plan or, continued deviation from standards of more than ten percent after submission of a corrective action plan, will result in denial of funding for each subsequent month, or billing the county or Tribal agency for fraud prevention investigation (FPI) service provided by the commissioners, or reallocation of program grant funds, or investigative resources, or both, to other counties or Tribal agencies. The denial of funding shall apply to the general settlement received by the county or Tribal agency on a quarterly basis and shall not reduce the grant amount applicable to the FPI project. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 48. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.04, subdivision 21, is amended to read: Subd. 21. Provider enrollment. (a) The commissioner shall enroll providers and conduct screening activities as required by Code of Federal Regulations, title 42, section 455, subpart E. A provider must enroll each provider-controlled location where direct services are provided. The commissioner may deny a provider's incomplete application if a provider fails to respond to the commissioner's request for additional information within 60 days of the request. The commissioner must conduct a background study under chapter 245C, including a review of databases in section 245C.08, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clauses (1) to (5), for a provider described in this paragraph. The background study requirement may be satisfied if the commissioner conducted a fingerprint-based background study on the provider that includes a review of databases in section 245C.08, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clauses (1) to (5). (b) The commissioner shall revalidate deleted text begin eachdeleted text end : (1) new text begin each new text end provider under this subdivision at least once every five years; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (2) new text begin each new text end personal care assistance agency under this subdivision once every three yearsdeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (3) at the commissioner's discretion, any other Medicaid-only provider type the commissioner deems "high risk" under this subdivision. new text end (c) The commissioner shall conduct revalidation as follows: (1) provide 30-day notice of the revalidation due date including instructions for revalidation and a list of materials the provider must submit; (2) if a provider fails to submit all required materials by the due date, notify the provider of the deficiency within 30 days after the due date and allow the provider an additional 30 days from the notification date to comply; and (3) if a provider fails to remedy a deficiency within the 30-day time period, give 60-day notice of termination and immediately suspend the provider's ability to bill. The provider does not have the right to appeal suspension of ability to bill. (d) If a provider fails to comply with any individual provider requirement or condition of participation, the commissioner may suspend the provider's ability to bill until the provider comes into compliance. The commissioner's decision to suspend the provider is not subject to an administrative appeal. (e) Correspondence and notifications, including notifications of termination and other actions, may be delivered electronically to a provider's MN-ITS mailbox. This paragraph does not apply to correspondences and notifications related to background studies. (f) If the commissioner or the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services determines that a provider is designated "high-risk," the commissioner may withhold payment from providers within that category upon initial enrollment for a 90-day period. The withholding for each provider must begin on the date of the first submission of a claim. (g) An enrolled provider that is also licensed by the commissioner under chapter 245A, is licensed as a home care provider by the Department of Health under chapter 144A, or is licensed as an assisted living facility under chapter 144G and has a home and community-based services designation on the home care license under section 144A.484, must designate an individual as the entity's compliance officer. The compliance officer must: (1) develop policies and procedures to assure adherence to medical assistance laws and regulations and to prevent inappropriate claims submissions; (2) train the employees of the provider entity, and any agents or subcontractors of the provider entity including billers, on the policies and procedures under clause (1); (3) respond to allegations of improper conduct related to the provision or billing of medical assistance services, and implement action to remediate any resulting problems; (4) use evaluation techniques to monitor compliance with medical assistance laws and regulations; (5) promptly report to the commissioner any identified violations of medical assistance laws or regulations; and (6) within 60 days of discovery by the provider of a medical assistance reimbursement overpayment, report the overpayment to the commissioner and make arrangements with the commissioner for the commissioner's recovery of the overpayment. The commissioner may require, as a condition of enrollment in medical assistance, that a provider within a particular industry sector or category establish a compliance program that contains the core elements established by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services. (h) The commissioner may revoke the enrollment of an ordering or rendering provider for a period of not more than one year, if the provider fails to maintain and, upon request from the commissioner, provide access to documentation relating to written orders or requests for payment for durable medical equipment, certifications for home health services, or referrals for other items or services written or ordered by such provider, when the commissioner has identified a pattern of a lack of documentation. A pattern means a failure to maintain documentation or provide access to documentation on more than one occasion. Nothing in this paragraph limits the authority of the commissioner to sanction a provider under the provisions of section 256B.064. (i) The commissioner shall terminate or deny the enrollment of any individual or entity if the individual or entity has been terminated from participation in Medicare or under the Medicaid program or Children's Health Insurance Program of any other state. The commissioner may exempt a rehabilitation agency from termination or denial that would otherwise be required under this paragraph, if the agency: (1) is unable to retain Medicare certification and enrollment solely due to a lack of billing to the Medicare program; (2) meets all other applicable Medicare certification requirements based on an on-site review completed by the commissioner of health; and (3) serves primarily a pediatric population. (j) As a condition of enrollment in medical assistance, the commissioner shall require that a provider designated "moderate" or "high-risk" by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services or the commissioner permit the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, its agents, or its designated contractors and the state agency, its agents, or its designated contractors to conduct unannounced on-site inspections of any provider location. The commissioner shall publish in the Minnesota Health Care Program Provider Manual a list of provider types designated "limited," "moderate," or "high-risk," based on the criteria and standards used to designate Medicare providers in Code of Federal Regulations, title 42, section 424.518. The list and criteria are not subject to the requirements of chapter 14. The commissioner's designations are not subject to administrative appeal. (k) As a condition of enrollment in medical assistance, the commissioner shall require that a high-risk provider, or a person with a direct or indirect ownership interest in the provider of five percent or higher, consent to criminal background checks, including fingerprinting, when required to do so under state law or by a determination by the commissioner or the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services that a provider is designated high-risk for fraud, waste, or abuse. (l)(1) Upon initial enrollment, reenrollment, and notification of revalidation, all durable medical equipment, prosthetics, orthotics, and supplies (DMEPOS) medical suppliers meeting the durable medical equipment provider and supplier definition in clause (3), operating in Minnesota and receiving Medicaid funds must purchase a surety bond that is annually renewed and designates the Minnesota Department of Human Services as the obligee, and must be submitted in a form approved by the commissioner. For purposes of this clause, the following medical suppliers are not required to obtain a surety bond: a federally qualified health center, a home health agency, the Indian Health Service, a pharmacy, and a rural health clinic. (2) At the time of initial enrollment or reenrollment, durable medical equipment providers and suppliers defined in clause (3) must purchase a surety bond of $50,000. If a revalidating provider's Medicaid revenue in the previous calendar year is up to and including $300,000, the provider agency must purchase a surety bond of $50,000. If a revalidating provider's Medicaid revenue in the previous calendar year is over $300,000, the provider agency must purchase a surety bond of $100,000. The surety bond must allow for recovery of costs and fees in pursuing a claim on the bond.new text begin Any action to obtain monetary recovery or sanctions from a surety bond must occur within six years from the date the debt is affirmed by a final agency decision. An agency decision is final when the right to appeal the debt has been exhausted or the time to appeal has expired under section 256B.064.new text end (3) "Durable medical equipment provider or supplier" means a medical supplier that can purchase medical equipment or supplies for sale or rental to the general public and is able to perform or arrange for necessary repairs to and maintenance of equipment offered for sale or rental. (m) The Department of Human Services may require a provider to purchase a surety bond as a condition of initial enrollment, reenrollment, reinstatement, or continued enrollment if: (1) the provider fails to demonstrate financial viability, (2) the department determines there is significant evidence of or potential for fraud and abuse by the provider, or (3) the provider or category of providers is designated high-risk pursuant to paragraph (f) and as per Code of Federal Regulations, title 42, section 455.450. The surety bond must be in an amount of $100,000 or ten percent of the provider's payments from Medicaid during the immediately preceding 12 months, whichever is greater. The surety bond must name the Department of Human Services as an obligee and must allow for recovery of costs and fees in pursuing a claim on the bond. This paragraph does not apply if the provider currently maintains a surety bond under the requirements in section 256B.0659 or 256B.85. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 49. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.0625, subdivision 5m, is amended to read: Subd. 5m. Certified community behavioral health clinic services. (a) Medical assistance covers services provided by a not-for-profit certified community behavioral health clinic (CCBHC) that meets the requirements of section 245.735, subdivision 3. (b) The commissioner shall reimburse CCBHCs on a per-day basis for each day that an eligible service is delivered using the CCBHC daily bundled rate system for medical assistance payments as described in paragraph (c). The commissioner shall include a quality incentive payment in the CCBHC daily bundled rate system as described in paragraph (e). There is no county share for medical assistance services when reimbursed through the CCBHC daily bundled rate system. (c) The commissioner shall ensure that the CCBHC daily bundled rate system for CCBHC payments under medical assistance meets the following requirements: (1) the CCBHC daily bundled rate shall be a provider-specific rate calculated for each CCBHC, based on the daily cost of providing CCBHC services and the total annual allowable CCBHC costs divided by the total annual number of CCBHC visits. For calculating the payment rate, total annual visits include visits covered by medical assistance and visits not covered by medical assistance. Allowable costs include but are not limited to the salaries and benefits of medical assistance providers; the cost of CCBHC services provided under section 245.735, subdivision 3, paragraph (a), clauses (6) and (7); and other costs such as insurance or supplies needed to provide CCBHC services; (2) payment shall be limited to one payment per day per medical assistance enrollee when an eligible CCBHC service is provided. A CCBHC visit is eligible for reimbursement if at least one of the CCBHC services listed under section 245.735, subdivision 3, paragraph (a), clause (6), is furnished to a medical assistance enrollee by a health care practitioner or licensed agency employed by or under contract with a CCBHC; (3) initial CCBHC daily bundled rates for newly certified CCBHCs under section 245.735, subdivision 3, shall be established by the commissioner using a provider-specific rate based on the newly certified CCBHC's audited historical cost report data adjusted for the expected cost of delivering CCBHC services. Estimates are subject to review by the commissioner and must include the expected cost of providing the full scope of CCBHC services and the expected number of visits for the rate period; (4) the commissioner shall rebase CCBHC rates once every two years following the last rebasing and no less than 12 months following an initial rate or a rate change due to a change in the scope of services. For CCBHCs certified after September 31, 2020, and before January 1, 2021, the commissioner shall rebase rates according to this clause for services provided on or after January 1, 2024; (5) the commissioner shall provide for a 60-day appeals process after notice of the results of the rebasing; (6) an entity that receives a CCBHC daily bundled rate that overlaps with another federal Medicaid rate is not eligible for the CCBHC rate methodology; (7) payments for CCBHC services to individuals enrolled in managed care shall be coordinated with the state's phase-out of CCBHC wrap payments. The commissioner shall complete the phase-out of CCBHC wrap payments within 60 days of the implementation of the CCBHC daily bundled rate system in the Medicaid Management Information System (MMIS), for CCBHCs reimbursed under this chapter, with a final settlement of payments due made payable to CCBHCs no later than 18 months thereafter; (8) the CCBHC daily bundled rate for each CCBHC shall be updated by trending each provider-specific rate by the Medicare Economic Index for primary care services. This update shall occur each year in between rebasing periods determined by the commissioner in accordance with clause (4). CCBHCs must provide data on costs and visits to the state annually using the CCBHC cost report established by the commissioner; and (9) a CCBHC may request a rate adjustment for changes in the CCBHC's scope of services when such changes are expected to result in an adjustment to the CCBHC payment rate by 2.5 percent or more. The CCBHC must provide the commissioner with information regarding the changes in the scope of services, including the estimated cost of providing the new or modified services and any projected increase or decrease in the number of visits resulting from the change. Estimated costs are subject to review by the commissioner. Rate adjustments for changes in scope shall occur no more than once per year in between rebasing periods per CCBHC and are effective on the date of the annual CCBHC rate update. (d) Managed care plans and county-based purchasing plans shall reimburse CCBHC providers at the CCBHC daily bundled rate. The commissioner shall monitor the effect of this requirement on the rate of access to the services delivered by CCBHC providers. If, for any contract year, federal approval is not received for this paragraph, the commissioner must adjust the capitation rates paid to managed care plans and county-based purchasing plans for that contract year to reflect the removal of this provision. Contracts between managed care plans and county-based purchasing plans and providers to whom this paragraph applies must allow recovery of payments from those providers if capitation rates are adjusted in accordance with this paragraph. Payment recoveries must not exceed the amount equal to any increase in rates that results from this provision. This paragraph expires if federal approval is not received for this paragraph at any time. (e) The commissioner shall implement a quality incentive payment program for CCBHCs that meets the following requirements: (1) a CCBHC shall receive a quality incentive payment upon meeting specific numeric thresholds for performance metrics established by the commissioner, in addition to payments for which the CCBHC is eligible under the CCBHC daily bundled rate system described in paragraph (c); (2) a CCBHC must be certified and enrolled as a CCBHC for the entire measurement year to be eligible for incentive payments; (3) each CCBHC shall receive written notice of the criteria that must be met in order to receive quality incentive payments at least 90 days prior to the measurement year; and (4) a CCBHC must provide the commissioner with data needed to determine incentive payment eligibility within six months following the measurement year. The commissioner shall notify CCBHC providers of their performance on the required measures and the incentive payment amount within 12 months following the measurement year. (f) All claims to managed care plans for CCBHC services as provided under this section shall be submitted directly to, and paid by, the commissioner on the dates specified no later than January 1 of the following calendar year, if: (1) one or more managed care plans does not comply with the federal requirement for payment of clean claims to CCBHCs, as defined in Code of Federal Regulations, title 42, section 447.45(b), and the managed care plan does not resolve the payment issue within 30 days of noncompliance; and (2) the total amount of clean claims not paid in accordance with federal requirements by one or more managed care plans is 50 percent of, or greater than, the total CCBHC claims eligible for payment by managed care plans. If the conditions in this paragraph are met between January 1 and June 30 of a calendar year, claims shall be submitted to and paid by the commissioner beginning on January 1 of the following year. If the conditions in this paragraph are met between July 1 and December 31 of a calendar year, claims shall be submitted to and paid by the commissioner beginning on July 1 of the following year. (g) Peer services provided by a CCBHC certified under section 245.735 are a covered service under medical assistance when a licensed mental health professional or alcohol and drug counselor determines that peer services are medically necessary. Eligibility under this subdivision for peer services provided by a CCBHC supersede eligibility standards under sections 256B.0615, 256B.0616, and 245G.07, subdivision deleted text begin 2deleted text end new text begin 2anew text end ,new text begin paragraph (b),new text end clause deleted text begin (8)deleted text end new text begin (2)new text end . Sec. 50. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.0659, subdivision 21, is amended to read: Subd. 21. Requirements for provider enrollment of personal care assistance provider agencies. (a) All personal care assistance provider agencies must provide, at the time of enrollment, reenrollment, and revalidation as a personal care assistance provider agency in a format determined by the commissioner, information and documentation that includes, but is not limited to, the following: (1) the personal care assistance provider agency's current contact information including address, telephone number, and email address; (2) proof of surety bond coverage for each business location providing services. Upon new enrollment, or if the provider's Medicaid revenue in the previous calendar year is up to and including $300,000, the provider agency must purchase a surety bond of $50,000. If the Medicaid revenue in the previous year is over $300,000, the provider agency must purchase a surety bond of $100,000. The surety bond must be in a form approved by the commissioner, must be renewed annually, and must allow for recovery of costs and fees in pursuing a claim on the bondnew text begin . Any action to obtain monetary recovery or sanctions from a surety bond must occur within six years from the date the debt is affirmed by a final agency decision. An agency decision is final when the right to appeal the debt has been exhausted or the time to appeal has expired under section 256B.064new text end ; (3) proof of fidelity bond coverage in the amount of $20,000 for each business location providing service; (4) proof of workers' compensation insurance coverage identifying the business location where personal care assistance services are provided; (5) proof of liability insurance coverage identifying the business location where personal care assistance services are provided and naming the department as a certificate holder; (6) a copy of the personal care assistance provider agency's written policies and procedures including: hiring of employees; training requirements; service delivery; and employee and consumer safety including process for notification and resolution of consumer grievances, identification and prevention of communicable diseases, and employee misconduct; (7) copies of all other forms the personal care assistance provider agency uses in the course of daily business including, but not limited to: (i) a copy of the personal care assistance provider agency's time sheet if the time sheet varies from the standard time sheet for personal care assistance services approved by the commissioner, and a letter requesting approval of the personal care assistance provider agency's nonstandard time sheet; (ii) the personal care assistance provider agency's template for the personal care assistance care plan; and (iii) the personal care assistance provider agency's template for the written agreement in subdivision 20 for recipients using the personal care assistance choice option, if applicable; (8) a list of all training and classes that the personal care assistance provider agency requires of its staff providing personal care assistance services; (9) documentation that the personal care assistance provider agency and staff have successfully completed all the training required by this section, including the requirements under subdivision 11, paragraph (d), if enhanced personal care assistance services are provided and submitted for an enhanced rate under subdivision 17a; (10) documentation of the agency's marketing practices; (11) disclosure of ownership, leasing, or management of all residential properties that is used or could be used for providing home care services; (12) documentation that the agency will use the following percentages of revenue generated from the medical assistance rate paid for personal care assistance services for employee personal care assistant wages and benefits: 72.5 percent of revenue in the personal care assistance choice option and 72.5 percent of revenue from other personal care assistance providers. The revenue generated by the qualified professional and the reasonable costs associated with the qualified professional shall not be used in making this calculation; and (13) effective May 15, 2010, documentation that the agency does not burden recipients' free exercise of their right to choose service providers by requiring personal care assistants to sign an agreement not to work with any particular personal care assistance recipient or for another personal care assistance provider agency after leaving the agency and that the agency is not taking action on any such agreements or requirements regardless of the date signed. (b) Personal care assistance provider agencies shall provide the information specified in paragraph (a) to the commissioner at the time the personal care assistance provider agency enrolls as a vendor or upon request from the commissioner. The commissioner shall collect the information specified in paragraph (a) from all personal care assistance providers beginning July 1, 2009. (c) All personal care assistance provider agencies shall require all employees in management and supervisory positions and owners of the agency who are active in the day-to-day management and operations of the agency to complete mandatory training as determined by the commissioner before submitting an application for enrollment of the agency as a provider. All personal care assistance provider agencies shall also require qualified professionals to complete the training required by subdivision 13 before submitting an application for enrollment of the agency as a provider. Employees in management and supervisory positions and owners who are active in the day-to-day operations of an agency who have completed the required training as an employee with a personal care assistance provider agency do not need to repeat the required training if they are hired by another agency, if they have completed the training within the past three years. By September 1, 2010, the required training must be available with meaningful access according to title VI of the Civil Rights Act and federal regulations adopted under that law or any guidance from the United States Health and Human Services Department. The required training must be available online or by electronic remote connection. The required training must provide for competency testing. Personal care assistance provider agency billing staff shall complete training about personal care assistance program financial management. This training is effective July 1, 2009. Any personal care assistance provider agency enrolled before that date shall, if it has not already, complete the provider training within 18 months of July 1, 2009. Any new owners or employees in management and supervisory positions involved in the day-to-day operations are required to complete mandatory training as a requisite of working for the agency. Personal care assistance provider agencies certified for participation in Medicare as home health agencies are exempt from the training required in this subdivision. When available, Medicare-certified home health agency owners, supervisors, or managers must successfully complete the competency test. (d) All surety bonds, fidelity bonds, workers' compensation insurance, and liability insurance required by this subdivision must be maintained continuously. After initial enrollment, a provider must submit proof of bonds and required coverages at any time at the request of the commissioner. Services provided while there are lapses in coverage are not eligible for payment. Lapses in coverage may result in sanctions, including termination. The commissioner shall send instructions and a due date to submit the requested information to the personal care assistance provider agency. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 51. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.0757, subdivision 4c, is amended to read: Subd. 4c. Behavioral health home services staff qualifications. (a) A behavioral health home services provider must maintain staff with required professional qualifications appropriate to the setting. (b) If behavioral health home services are offered in a mental health setting, the integration specialist must be a licensed nurse, as defined in section 148.171, subdivision 9. (c) If behavioral health home services are offered in a primary care setting, the integration specialist must be a mental health professional who is qualified according to section 245I.04, subdivision 2. (d) If behavioral health home services are offered in either a primary care setting or mental health setting, the systems navigator must be a mental health practitioner who is qualified according to section 245I.04, subdivision 4, or a community health worker as defined in section 256B.0625, subdivision 49. (e) If behavioral health home services are offered in either a primary care setting or mental health setting, the qualified health home specialist must be one of the following: (1) a mental health certified peer specialist who is qualified according to section 245I.04, subdivision 10; (2) a mental health certified family peer specialist who is qualified according to section 245I.04, subdivision 12; (3) a case management associate as defined in section 245.462, subdivision 4, paragraph (g), or 245.4871, subdivision 4, paragraph (j); (4) a mental health rehabilitation worker who is qualified according to section 245I.04, subdivision 14; (5) a community paramedic as defined in section 144E.28, subdivision 9; (6) a peer recovery specialist as defined in section deleted text begin 245G.07, subdivision 1, clause (5)deleted text end new text begin 245G.11, subdivision 8new text end ; or (7) a community health worker as defined in section 256B.0625, subdivision 49. Sec. 52. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.0949, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Definitions. (a) The terms used in this section have the meanings given in this subdivision. (b) "Advanced certification" means a person who has completed advanced certification in an approved modality under subdivision 13, paragraph (b). (c) "Agency" means the legal entity that is enrolled with Minnesota health care programs as a medical assistance provider according to Minnesota Rules, part 9505.0195, to provide EIDBI services and that has the legal responsibility to ensure that its employees or contractors carry out the responsibilities defined in this section. Agency includes a licensed individual professional who practices independently and acts as an agency. (d) "Autism spectrum disorder or a related condition" or "ASD or a related condition" means either autism spectrum disorder (ASD) as defined in the current version of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders (DSM) or a condition that is found to be closely related to ASD, as identified under the current version of the DSM, and meets all of the following criteria: (1) is severe and chronic; (2) results in impairment of adaptive behavior and function similar to that of a person with ASD; (3) requires treatment or services similar to those required for a person with ASD; and (4) results in substantial functional limitations in three core developmental deficits of ASD: social or interpersonal interaction; functional communication, including nonverbal or social communication; and restrictive or repetitive behaviors or hyperreactivity or hyporeactivity to sensory input; and may include deficits or a high level of support in one or more of the following domains: (i) behavioral challenges and self-regulation; (ii) cognition; (iii) learning and play; (iv) self-care; or (v) safety. (e) "Person" means a person under 21 years of age. (f) "Clinical supervision" means the overall responsibility for the control and direction of EIDBI service delivery, including individual treatment planning, staff supervision, individual treatment plan progress monitoring, and treatment review for each person. Clinical supervision is provided by a qualified supervising professional (QSP) who takes full professional responsibility for the service provided by each supervisee. (g) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of human services, unless otherwise specified. (h) "Comprehensive multidisciplinary evaluation" or "CMDE" means a comprehensive evaluation of a person to determine medical necessity for EIDBI services based on the requirements in subdivision 5. (i) "Department" means the Department of Human Services, unless otherwise specified. (j) "Early intensive developmental and behavioral intervention benefit" or "EIDBI benefit" means a variety of individualized, intensive treatment modalities approved and published by the commissioner that are based in behavioral and developmental science consistent with best practices on effectiveness. new text begin (k) "Employee" means any person who is employed by an agency, including temporary and part-time employees, and who performs work for at least 80 hours in a year for that agency in Minnesota. Employee does not include an independent contractor. new text end deleted text begin (k)deleted text end new text begin (l)new text end "Generalizable goals" means results or gains that are observed during a variety of activities over time with different people, such as providers, family members, other adults, and people, and in different environments including, but not limited to, clinics, homes, schools, and the community. deleted text begin (l)deleted text end new text begin (m)new text end "Incident" means when any of the following occur: (1) an illness, accident, or injury that requires first aid treatment; (2) a bump or blow to the head; or (3) an unusual or unexpected event that jeopardizes the safety of a person or staff, including a person leaving the agency unattended. deleted text begin (m)deleted text end new text begin (n)new text end "Individual treatment plan" or "ITP" means the person-centered, individualized written plan of care that integrates and coordinates person and family information from the CMDE for a person who meets medical necessity for the EIDBI benefit. An individual treatment plan must meet the standards in subdivision 6. deleted text begin (n)deleted text end new text begin (o)new text end "Legal representative" means the parent of a child who is under 18 years of age, a court-appointed guardian, or other representative with legal authority to make decisions about service for a person. For the purpose of this subdivision, "other representative with legal authority to make decisions" includes a health care agent or an attorney-in-fact authorized through a health care directive or power of attorney. deleted text begin (o)deleted text end new text begin (p)new text end "Mental health professional" means a staff person who is qualified according to section 245I.04, subdivision 2. deleted text begin (p)deleted text end new text begin (q)new text end "Person-centered" means a service that both responds to the identified needs, interests, values, preferences, and desired outcomes of the person or the person's legal representative and respects the person's history, dignity, and cultural background and allows inclusion and participation in the person's community. deleted text begin (q)deleted text end new text begin (r)new text end "Qualified EIDBI provider" means a person who is a QSP or a level I, level II, or level III treatment provider. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 53. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.0949, subdivision 15, is amended to read: Subd. 15. EIDBI provider qualifications. (a) A QSP must be deleted text begin employed bydeleted text end new text begin an employee ofnew text end an agency and be: (1) a licensed mental health professional who has at least 2,000 hours of supervised clinical experience or training in examining or treating people with ASD or a related condition or equivalent documented coursework at the graduate level by an accredited university in ASD diagnostics, ASD developmental and behavioral treatment strategies, and typical child development; or (2) a developmental or behavioral pediatrician who has at least 2,000 hours of supervised clinical experience or training in examining or treating people with ASD or a related condition or equivalent documented coursework at the graduate level by an accredited university in the areas of ASD diagnostics, ASD developmental and behavioral treatment strategies, and typical child development. (b) A level I treatment provider must be deleted text begin employed bydeleted text end new text begin an employee ofnew text end an agency and: (1) have at least 2,000 hours of supervised clinical experience or training in examining or treating people with ASD or a related condition or equivalent documented coursework at the graduate level by an accredited university in ASD diagnostics, ASD developmental and behavioral treatment strategies, and typical child development or an equivalent combination of documented coursework or hours of experience; and (2) have or be at least one of the following: (i) a master's degree in behavioral health or child development or related fields including, but not limited to, mental health, special education, social work, psychology, speech pathology, or occupational therapy from an accredited college or university; (ii) a bachelor's degree in a behavioral health, child development, or related field including, but not limited to, mental health, special education, social work, psychology, speech pathology, or occupational therapy, from an accredited college or university, and advanced certification in a treatment modality recognized by the department; (iii) a board-certified behavior analyst as defined by the Behavior Analyst Certification Board or a qualified behavior analyst as defined by the Qualified Applied Behavior Analysis Credentialing Board; or (iv) a board-certified assistant behavior analyst with 4,000 hours of supervised clinical experience that meets all registration, supervision, and continuing education requirements of the certification. (c) A level II treatment provider must be deleted text begin employed bydeleted text end new text begin an employee ofnew text end an agency and must be: (1) a person who has a bachelor's degree from an accredited college or university in a behavioral or child development science or related field including, but not limited to, mental health, special education, social work, psychology, speech pathology, or occupational therapy; and meets at least one of the following: (i) has at least 1,000 hours of supervised clinical experience or training in examining or treating people with ASD or a related condition or equivalent documented coursework at the graduate level by an accredited university in ASD diagnostics, ASD developmental and behavioral treatment strategies, and typical child development or a combination of coursework or hours of experience; (ii) has certification as a board-certified assistant behavior analyst from the Behavior Analyst Certification Board or a qualified autism service practitioner from the Qualified Applied Behavior Analysis Credentialing Board; (iii) is a registered behavior technician as defined by the Behavior Analyst Certification Board or an applied behavior analysis technician as defined by the Qualified Applied Behavior Analysis Credentialing Board; or (iv) is certified in one of the other treatment modalities recognized by the department; or (2) a person who has: (i) an associate's degree in a behavioral or child development science or related field including, but not limited to, mental health, special education, social work, psychology, speech pathology, or occupational therapy from an accredited college or university; and (ii) at least 2,000 hours of supervised clinical experience in delivering treatment to people with ASD or a related condition. Hours worked as a mental health behavioral aide or level III treatment provider may be included in the required hours of experience; or (3) a person who has at least 4,000 hours of supervised clinical experience in delivering treatment to people with ASD or a related condition. Hours worked as a mental health behavioral aide or level III treatment provider may be included in the required hours of experience; or (4) a person who is a graduate student in a behavioral science, child development science, or related field and is receiving clinical supervision by a QSP affiliated with an agency to meet the clinical training requirements for experience and training with people with ASD or a related condition; or (5) a person who is at least 18 years of age and who: (i) is fluent in a non-English language or is an individual certified by a Tribal Nation; (ii) completed the level III EIDBI training requirements; and (iii) receives observation and direction from a QSP or level I treatment provider at least once a week until the person meets 1,000 hours of supervised clinical experience. (d) A level III treatment provider must be deleted text begin employed bydeleted text end new text begin en employee ofnew text end an agency, have completed the level III training requirement, be at least 18 years of age, and have at least one of the following: (1) a high school diploma or commissioner of education-selected high school equivalency certification; (2) fluency in a non-English language or Tribal Nation certification; (3) one year of experience as a primary personal care assistant, community health worker, waiver service provider, or special education assistant to a person with ASD or a related condition within the previous five years; or (4) completion of all required EIDBI training within six months of employment. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 54. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.0949, subdivision 16, is amended to read: Subd. 16. Agency duties. (a) An agency delivering an EIDBI service under this section must: (1) enroll as a medical assistance Minnesota health care program provider according to Minnesota Rules, part 9505.0195, and section 256B.04, subdivision 21, and meet all applicable provider standards and requirements; (2) demonstrate compliance with federal and state laws for EIDBI service; (3) verify and maintain records of a service provided to the person or the person's legal representative as required under Minnesota Rules, parts 9505.2175 and 9505.2197; (4) demonstrate that while enrolled or seeking enrollment as a Minnesota health care program provider the agency did not have a lead agency contract or provider agreement discontinued because of a conviction of fraud; or did not have an owner, board member, or manager fail a state or federal criminal background check or appear on the list of excluded individuals or entities maintained by the federal Department of Human Services Office of Inspector General; (5) have established business practices including written policies and procedures, internal controls, and a system that demonstrates the organization's ability to deliver quality EIDBI services; (6) have an office located in Minnesota or a border state; (7) conduct a criminal background check on an individual who has direct contact with the person or the person's legal representative; (8) report maltreatment according to section 626.557 and chapter 260E; (9) comply with any data requests consistent with the Minnesota Government Data Practices Act, sections 256B.064 and 256B.27; (10) provide training for all agency staff on the requirements and responsibilities listed in the Maltreatment of Minors Act, chapter 260E, and the Vulnerable Adult Protection Act, section 626.557, including mandated and voluntary reporting, nonretaliation, and the agency's policy for all staff on how to report suspected abuse and neglect; (11) have a written policy to resolve issues collaboratively with the person and the person's legal representative when possible. The policy must include a timeline for when the person and the person's legal representative will be notified about issues that arise in the provision of services; (12) provide the person's legal representative with prompt notification if the person is injured while being served by the agency. An incident report must be completed by the agency staff member in charge of the person. A copy of all incident and injury reports must remain on file at the agency for at least five years from the report of the incident; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (13) before starting a service, provide the person or the person's legal representative a description of the treatment modality that the person shall receive, including the staffing certification levels and training of the staff who shall provide a treatmentdeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (14) provide clinical supervision by a qualified supervising professional for a minimum of one hour of supervision for every ten hours of direct treatment per person that meets clinical licensure requirements for quality supervision and effective intervention; and new text end new text begin (15) provide clinical, in-person supervision sessions by a qualified supervising professional at least once per month for intervention, observation, and direction. new text end (b) When delivering the ITP, and annually thereafter, an agency must provide the person or the person's legal representative with: (1) a written copy and a verbal explanation of the person's or person's legal representative's rights and the agency's responsibilities; (2) documentation in the person's file the date that the person or the person's legal representative received a copy and explanation of the person's or person's legal representative's rights and the agency's responsibilities; and (3) reasonable accommodations to provide the information in another format or language as needed to facilitate understanding of the person's or person's legal representative's rights and the agency's responsibilities. Sec. 55. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.0949, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 18. new text end new text begin Provisional licensure. new text end new text begin Beginning on January 1, 2026, the commissioner shall begin issuing provisional licenses to enrolled EIDBI agencies while permanent licensing standards are developed. EIDBI agencies enrolled by December 31, 2025, have 60 calendar days to submit an application for provisional licensure on the forms and in the manner prescribed by the commissioner. The commissioner must act on an application within 90 working days after receiving a complete application. new text end Sec. 56. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.12, is amended to read: 256B.12 LEGAL REPRESENTATION. The attorney general or the appropriate county attorney appearing at the direction of the attorney general shall be the attorney for the state agency, and the county attorney of the appropriate county shall be the attorney for the deleted text begin localdeleted text end agency in all matters pertaining hereto. To prosecute under this chapter or sections 609.466 deleted text begin anddeleted text end new text begin ,new text end 609.52, subdivision 2,new text begin and 609.542new text end or to recover payments wrongfully made under this chapter, the attorney general or the appropriate county attorney, acting independently or at the direction of the attorney general may institute a criminal or civil action. Sec. 57. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.85, subdivision 12, is amended to read: Subd. 12. Requirements for enrollment of CFSS agency-providers. (a) All CFSS agency-providers must provide, at the time of enrollment, reenrollment, and revalidation as a CFSS agency-provider in a format determined by the commissioner, information and documentation that includes but is not limited to the following: (1) the CFSS agency-provider's current contact information including address, telephone number, and email address; (2) proof of surety bond coverage. Upon new enrollment, or if the agency-provider's Medicaid revenue in the previous calendar year is less than or equal to $300,000, the agency-provider must purchase a surety bond of $50,000. If the agency-provider's Medicaid revenue in the previous calendar year is greater than $300,000, the agency-provider must purchase a surety bond of $100,000. The surety bond must be in a form approved by the commissioner, must be renewed annually, and must allow for recovery of costs and fees in pursuing a claim on the bondnew text begin . Any action to obtain monetary recovery or sanctions from a surety bond must occur within six years from the date the debt is affirmed by a final agency decision. An agency decision is final when the right to appeal the debt has been exhausted or the time to appeal has expired under section 256B.064new text end ; (3) proof of fidelity bond coverage in the amount of $20,000 per provider location; (4) proof of workers' compensation insurance coverage; (5) proof of liability insurance; (6) a copy of the CFSS agency-provider's organizational chart identifying the names and roles of all owners, managing employees, staff, board of directors, and additional documentation reporting any affiliations of the directors and owners to other service providers; (7) proof that the CFSS agency-provider has written policies and procedures including: hiring of employees; training requirements; service delivery; and employee and consumer safety, including the process for notification and resolution of participant grievances, incident response, identification and prevention of communicable diseases, and employee misconduct; (8) proof that the CFSS agency-provider has all of the following forms and documents: (i) a copy of the CFSS agency-provider's time sheet; and (ii) a copy of the participant's individual CFSS service delivery plan; (9) a list of all training and classes that the CFSS agency-provider requires of its staff providing CFSS services; (10) documentation that the CFSS agency-provider and staff have successfully completed all the training required by this section; (11) documentation of the agency-provider's marketing practices; (12) disclosure of ownership, leasing, or management of all residential properties that are used or could be used for providing home care services; (13) documentation that the agency-provider will use at least the following percentages of revenue generated from the medical assistance rate paid for CFSS services for CFSS support worker wages and benefits: 72.5 percent of revenue from CFSS providers, except 100 percent of the revenue generated by a medical assistance rate increase due to a collective bargaining agreement under section 179A.54 must be used for support worker wages and benefits. The revenue generated by the worker training and development services and the reasonable costs associated with the worker training and development services shall not be used in making this calculation; and (14) documentation that the agency-provider does not burden participants' free exercise of their right to choose service providers by requiring CFSS support workers to sign an agreement not to work with any particular CFSS participant or for another CFSS agency-provider after leaving the agency and that the agency is not taking action on any such agreements or requirements regardless of the date signed. (b) CFSS agency-providers shall provide to the commissioner the information specified in paragraph (a). (c) All CFSS agency-providers shall require all employees in management and supervisory positions and owners of the agency who are active in the day-to-day management and operations of the agency to complete mandatory training as determined by the commissioner. Employees in management and supervisory positions and owners who are active in the day-to-day operations of an agency who have completed the required training as an employee with a CFSS agency-provider do not need to repeat the required training if they are hired by another agency and they have completed the training within the past three years. CFSS agency-provider billing staff shall complete training about CFSS program financial management. Any new owners or employees in management and supervisory positions involved in the day-to-day operations are required to complete mandatory training as a requisite of working for the agency. (d) Agency-providers shall submit all required documentation in this section within 30 days of notification from the commissioner. If an agency-provider fails to submit all the required documentation, the commissioner may take action under subdivision 23a. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 58. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256I.04, subdivision 2a, is amended to read: Subd. 2a. License required; staffing qualifications. (a) Except as provided in paragraph deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (c)new text end , an agency may not enter into an agreement with an establishment to provide housing support unless: (1) the establishment is licensed by the Department of Health as a hotel and restaurant; a board and lodging establishment; a boarding care home before March 1, 1985; or a supervised living facility, and the service provider for residents of the facility is licensed under chapter 245A. However, an establishment licensed by the Department of Health to provide lodging need not also be licensed to provide board if meals are being supplied to residents under a contract with a food vendor who is licensed by the Department of Health; (2) the residence is: (i) licensed by the commissioner of human services under Minnesota Rules, parts 9555.5050 to 9555.6265; (ii) certified by a county human services agency prior to July 1, 1992, using the standards under Minnesota Rules, parts 9555.5050 to 9555.6265; (iii) licensed by the commissioner under Minnesota Rules, parts 2960.0010 to 2960.0120, with a variance under section 245A.04, subdivision 9; or (iv) licensed under section 245D.02, subdivision 4a, as a community residential setting by the commissioner of human services; or (3) the facility is licensed under chapter 144G and provides three meals a day. new text begin (b) Effective January 1, 2027, the commissioner may enter into housing support agreements with a board and lodging establishment under section 256I.04, subdivision 2a, paragraph (a), clause (1), that is also certified by the commissioner as a recovery residence, subject to the requirements of section 256I.04, subdivisions 2a to 2f. When doing so, the department of human services serves as the lead agency for the agreement. new text end deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (c)new text end The requirements under paragraph (a) do not apply to establishments exempt from state licensure because they are: (1) located on Indian reservations and subject to tribal health and safety requirements; or (2) supportive housing establishments where an individual has an approved habitability inspection and an individual lease agreement. deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (d)new text end Supportive housing establishments that serve individuals who have experienced long-term homelessness and emergency shelters must participate in the homeless management information system and a coordinated assessment system as defined by the commissioner. deleted text begin (d)deleted text end new text begin (e)new text end Effective July 1, 2016, an agency shall not have an agreement with a provider of housing support unless all staff members who have direct contact with recipients: (1) have skills and knowledge acquired through one or more of the following: (i) a course of study in a health- or human services-related field leading to a bachelor of arts, bachelor of science, or associate's degree; (ii) one year of experience with the target population served; (iii) experience as a mental health certified peer specialist according to section 256B.0615; or (iv) meeting the requirements for unlicensed personnel under sections 144A.43 to 144A.483; (2) hold a current driver's license appropriate to the vehicle driven if transporting recipients; (3) complete training on vulnerable adults mandated reporting and child maltreatment mandated reporting, where applicable; and (4) complete housing support orientation training offered by the commissioner. Sec. 59. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 260E.14, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Facilities and schools. (a) The local welfare agency is the agency responsible for investigating allegations of maltreatment in child foster care, family child care, legally nonlicensed child care, and reports involving children served by an unlicensed personal care provider organization under section 256B.0659. Copies of findings related to personal care provider organizations under section 256B.0659 must be forwarded to the Department of Human Services provider enrollment. (b) The Department of Children, Youth, and Families is the agency responsible for screening and investigating allegations of maltreatment in juvenile correctional facilities listed under section 241.021 located in the local welfare agency's county and in facilities licensed or certified under chapters 245A and 245D. (c) The Department of Health is the agency responsible for screening and investigating allegations of maltreatment in facilities licensed under sections 144.50 to 144.58 and 144A.43 to 144A.482 or chapter 144H. (d) The Department of Education is the agency responsible for screening and investigating allegations of maltreatment in a school as defined in section 120A.05, subdivisions 9, 11, and 13, and chapter 124E. The Department of Education's responsibility to screen and investigate includes allegations of maltreatment involving students 18 through 21 years of age, including students receiving special education services, up to and including graduation and the issuance of a secondary or high school diploma. new text begin (e) The Department of Human Services is the agency responsible for screening and investigating allegations of maltreatment of minors in an EIDBI agency operating under a provisional license under section 245A.142. new text end deleted text begin (e)deleted text end new text begin (f)new text end A health or corrections agency receiving a report may request the local welfare agency to provide assistance pursuant to this section and sections 260E.20 and 260E.22. deleted text begin (f)deleted text end new text begin (g)new text end The Department of Children, Youth, and Families is the agency responsible for screening and investigating allegations of maltreatment in facilities or programs not listed in paragraph (a) that are licensed or certified under chapters 142B and 142C. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 60. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 325F.725, is amended to read: 325F.725 deleted text begin SOBER HOMEdeleted text end new text begin RECOVERY RESIDENCEnew text end TITLE PROTECTION. No person or entity may use the phrase deleted text begin "sober home,"deleted text end new text begin "recovery residence,"new text end whether alone or in combination with other words and whether orally or in writing, to advertise, market, or otherwise describe, offer, or promote itself, or any housing, service, service package, or program that it provides within this state, unless the person or entity meets the definition of a deleted text begin sober homedeleted text end new text begin recovery residencenew text end in section 254B.01, subdivision 11, and meets the requirements of section 254B.181. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 61. new text begin [609.542] HUMAN SERVICES PROGRAMS CRIMES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definition. new text end new text begin For purposes of this section, "federal health care program" has the meaning given in United States Code, title 42, section 1320a-7b(f). new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Prohibited payments made relating to human services programs. new text end new text begin A person is guilty of a crime and may be sentenced as provided in subdivision 5 if the person intentionally offers or pays any remuneration, including any kickback, bribe, or rebate, directly or indirectly, overtly or covertly, in cash or in kind, to another person: new text end new text begin (1) to induce that person to apply for, receive, or induce another person to apply for or receive an item or service for which payment may be made in whole or in part under a federal health care program, state behavioral health program under section 254B.04, or family program under chapter 142E; or new text end new text begin (2) in return for purchasing, leasing, ordering, or arranging for or inducing the purchasing, leasing, or ordering of any good, facility, service, or item for which payment may be made in whole or in part, or which is administered in whole or in part under a federal health care program, state behavioral health program under section 254B.04, or family program under chapter 142E. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Receipt of prohibited payments relating to human services programs. new text end new text begin A person is guilty of a crime and may be sentenced as provided in subdivision 5 if the person intentionally solicits or receives any remuneration, including any kickback, bribe, or rebate, directly or indirectly, overtly or covertly, in cash or in kind: new text end new text begin (1) in return for applying for or receiving a human services benefit, service, or grant for which payment may be made in whole or in part under a federal health care program, state behavioral health program under section 254B.04, or family program under chapter 142E; or new text end new text begin (2) in return for purchasing, leasing, ordering, or arranging for or inducing the purchasing, leasing, or ordering of any good, facility, service, or item for which payment may be made in whole or in part under a federal health care program, state behavioral health program under section 254B.04, or family program under chapter 142E. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Exemptions. new text end new text begin (a) This section does not apply to remuneration exempted under the Anti-Kickback Statute, United States Code, title 42, section 1320a-7b(b)(3), or payment made under a federal health care program which is exempt from liability by United States Code, title 42, section 1001.952. new text end new text begin (b) This section does not apply to: new text end new text begin (1) any amount paid by an employer to a bona fide employee for providing covered items or services under chapter 142E while acting in the course and scope of employment; or new text end new text begin (2) child care provider discounts, scholarships, or other financial assistance to families allowed under section 142E.17, subdivision 7. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Sentence. new text end new text begin (a) A person convicted under subdivision 2 or 3 may be sentenced pursuant to section 609.52, subdivision 3. new text end new text begin (b) For purposes of sentencing a violation of subdivision 2, "value" means the fair market value of the good, facility, service, or item that was obtained as a direct or indirect result of the prohibited payment. new text end new text begin (c) For purposes of sentencing a violation of subdivision 3, "value" means the amount of the prohibited payment solicited or received. new text end new text begin (d) As a matter of law, a claim for any good, facility, service, or item rendered or claimed to have been rendered in violation of this section is noncompensable and unenforceable at the time the claim is made. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Aggregation. new text end new text begin In a prosecution under this section, the value of the money, property, or benefit received or solicited by the defendant within a six-month period may be aggregated and the defendant charged accordingly in applying the provisions of subdivision 5. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin False claims. new text end new text begin In addition to the penalties provided for in this section, a claim, as defined in section 15C.01, subdivision 2, that includes items or services resulting from a violation of this section constitutes a false or fraudulent claim for purposes of section 15C.02. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 62. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 626.5572, subdivision 13, is amended to read: Subd. 13. Lead investigative agency. "Lead investigative agency" is the primary administrative agency responsible for investigating reports made under section 626.557. (a) The Department of Health is the lead investigative agency for facilities or services licensed or required to be licensed as hospitals, home care providers, nursing homes, boarding care homes, hospice providers, residential facilities that are also federally certified as intermediate care facilities that serve people with developmental disabilities, or any other facility or service not listed in this subdivision that is licensed or required to be licensed by the Department of Health for the care of vulnerable adults. "Home care provider" has the meaning provided in section 144A.43, subdivision 4, and applies when care or services are delivered in the vulnerable adult's home. (b) The Department of Human Services is the lead investigative agency for facilities or services licensed or required to be licensed as adult day care, adult foster care, community residential settings, programs for people with disabilities, family adult day services, mental health programs, mental health clinics, substance use disorder programs, the Minnesota Sex Offender Program, or any other facility or service not listed in this subdivision that is licensed or required to be licensed by the Department of Human Servicesnew text begin , including EIDBI agencies operating under a provisional license under section 245A.142new text end . (c) The county social service agency or its designee is the lead investigative agency for all other reports, including, but not limited to, reports involving vulnerable adults receiving services from a personal care provider organization under section 256B.0659. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 63. new text begin TRANSITION TO NONPROVISIONAL EIDBI LICENSE; FUTURE LICENSURE STANDARDS.new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must develop a process and transition plan for comprehensive EIDBI agency licensure by January 1, 2026. new text end new text begin (b) By December 1, 2026, in consultation with stakeholders the commissioner shall draft standards for nonprovisional EIDBI agency licensure and submit proposed legislation to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over human services licensing. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 64. new text begin WORKING GROUP FOR RECOVERY RESIDENCES.new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of human services must convene a working group on recovery residences. new text end new text begin (b) The working group must: new text end new text begin (1) produce a report that examines how other states fund recovery residences, identifying best practices and models that could be applicable to Minnesota; new text end new text begin (2) engage with communities to ensure meaningful collaboration with key external partners on the ideas being developed that will inform the final plan and recommendations; and new text end new text begin (3) develop an implementable plan addressing housing needs for individuals in outpatient substance use disorder treatment that includes: new text end new text begin (i) clear strategies for aligning housing models with individual treatment needs; new text end new text begin (ii) an assessment of funding streams, including potential federal funding sources; new text end new text begin (iii) a timeline for implementation, with key milestones and action steps; new text end new text begin (iv) recommendations for future resource allocation to ensure long-term housing stability for individuals in recovery; and new text end new text begin (v) specific recommendations for policy or legislative changes that may be required to support sustainable recovery housing solutions. new text end new text begin (c) The working group shall include but is not limited to: new text end new text begin (1) at least two designees from the Department of Human Services, at least one representing behavioral health policy and at least one representing homelessness, housing and support services policy; new text end new text begin (2) the commissioner of health or a designee; new text end new text begin (3) two people who have experience living in a recovery residence; new text end new text begin (4) representatives from at least three substance use disorder lodging facilities currently operating in Minnesota; new text end new text begin (5) three representatives from county social services agencies, at least one from within and one from outside the seven-county metropolitan area; new text end new text begin (6) a representative from a Tribal social services agency; and new text end new text begin (7) representatives from national or state organizations specializing in recovery residences and substance use disorder treatment. new text end new text begin (d) The working group shall meet at least monthly and as necessary to fulfill its responsibilities. The commissioner of human services shall provide administrative support and meeting space for the working group. The working group may conduct meetings remotely. new text end new text begin (e) The commissioner of human services shall make appointments to the working group by October 1, 2025, and convene the first meeting of the working group by January 15, 2026. new text end new text begin (f) The working group shall submit a final report with recommendations to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over health and human services policy and finance on or before January 1, 2027. new text end Sec. 65. new text begin REVISOR INSTRUCTION.new text end new text begin The revisor of statutes shall change the terms "mental health practitioner" and "mental health practitioners" to "behavioral health practitioner" or "behavioral health practitioners" wherever they appear in Minnesota Statutes, chapter 245I. new text end Sec. 66. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin (a) new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, sections 245G.01, subdivision 20d; 245G.07, subdivision 2; and 254B.01, subdivision 5, new text end new text begin are repealed. new text end new text begin (b) new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 254B.04, subdivision 2a, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin Paragraph (a) is effective July 1, 2025, and paragraph (b) is effective July 1, 2027. new text end ARTICLE 3 DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142E.16, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Record-keeping requirement. (a) As a condition of payment, all providers receiving child care assistance payments must: (1) keep accurate and legible daily attendance records at the site where services are delivered for children receiving child care assistance; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (2) make those records available immediately to the county or the commissioner upon request. Any records not provided to a county or the commissioner at the date and time of the request are deemed inadmissible if offered as evidence by the provider in any proceeding to contest an overpayment or disqualification of the providerdeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (3) submit data on child enrollment and attendance in the form and manner specified by the commissioner. new text end (b) As a condition of payment, attendance records must be completed daily and include the date, the first and last name of each child in attendance, and the times when each child is dropped off and picked up. To the extent possible, the times that the child was dropped off to and picked up from the child care provider must be entered by the person dropping off or picking up the child. The daily attendance records must be retained at the site where services are delivered for six years after the date of service. (c) When the county or the commissioner knows or has reason to believe that a current or former provider has not complied with the record-keeping requirement in this subdivision: (1) the commissioner may: (i) deny or revoke a provider's authorization to receive child care assistance payments under section 142E.17, subdivision 9, paragraph (d); (ii) pursue an administrative disqualification under sections 142E.51, subdivision 5, and 256.98; or (iii) take an action against the provider under deleted text begin sections 142E.50 to 142E.58deleted text end new text begin section 142E.51new text end ; or (2) a county or the commissioner may establish an attendance record overpayment under paragraph (d). (d) To calculate an attendance record overpayment under this subdivision, the commissioner or county agency shall subtract the maximum daily rate from the total amount paid to a provider for each day that a child's attendance record is missing, unavailable, incomplete, inaccurate, or otherwise inadequate. (e) The commissioner shall develop criteria for a county to determine an attendance record overpayment under this subdivision. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective June 22, 2026. new text end ARTICLE 4 DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 270C.445, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Standards of conduct. No tax preparer shall: (1) without good cause fail to promptly, diligently, and without unreasonable delay complete a client's return; (2) obtain the signature of a client to a return or authorizing document that contains blank spaces to be filled in after it has been signed; (3) fail to sign a client's return when compensation for services rendered has been made; (4) fail to provide on a client's return the preparer tax identification number when required under section 6109(a)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code or section 289A.60, subdivision 28; (5) fail or refuse to give a client a copy of any document requiring the client's signature within a reasonable time after the client signs the document; (6) fail to retain for at least four years a copy of a client's returns; (7) fail to maintain a confidential relationship with clients or former clients; (8) fail to take commercially reasonable measures to safeguard a client's nonpublic personal information; (9) make, authorize, publish, disseminate, circulate, or cause to make, either directly or indirectly, any false, deceptive, or misleading statement or representation relating to or in connection with the offering or provision of tax preparation services; (10) require a client to enter into a loan arrangement in order to complete a client's return; (11) claim credits or deductions on a client's return for which the tax preparer knows or reasonably should know the client does not qualify; (12) report a household income on a client's claim filed under chapter 290A that the tax preparer knows or reasonably should know is not accurate; (13) engage in any conduct that is subject to a penalty under section 289A.60, subdivision 13, 20, 20a, 26, or 28; (14) whether or not acting as a taxpayer representative, fail to conform to the standards of conduct required by Minnesota Rules, part 8052.0300, subpart 4; (15) whether or not acting as a taxpayer representative, engage in any conduct that is incompetent conduct under Minnesota Rules, part 8052.0300, subpart 5; (16) whether or not acting as a taxpayer representative, engage in any conduct that is disreputable conduct under Minnesota Rules, part 8052.0300, subpart 6; (17) charge, offer to accept, or accept a fee based upon a percentage of an anticipated refund for tax preparation services; (18) under any circumstances, withhold or fail to return to a client a document provided by the client for use in preparing the client's return; (19) take control or ownership of a client's refund by any means, including: (i) directly or indirectly endorsing or otherwise negotiating a check or other refund instrument, including an electronic version of a check; (ii) directing an electronic or direct deposit of the refund into an account unless the client's name is on the account; and (iii) establishing or using an account in the preparer's name to receive a client's refund through a direct deposit or any other instrument unless the client's name is also on the accountdeleted text begin , except that a taxpayer may assign the portion of a refund representing the Minnesota education credit available under section 290.0674 to a bank account without the client's name, as provided under section 290.0679deleted text end ; (20) fail to act in the best interests of the client; (21) fail to safeguard and account for any money handled for the client; (22) fail to disclose all material facts of which the preparer has knowledge which might reasonably affect the client's rights and interests; (23) violate any provision of section 332.37; (24) include any of the following in any document provided or signed in connection with the provision of tax preparation services: (i) a hold harmless clause; (ii) a confession of judgment or a power of attorney to confess judgment against the client or appear as the client in any judicial proceeding; (iii) a waiver of the right to a jury trial, if applicable, in any action brought by or against a debtor; (iv) an assignment of or an order for payment of wages or other compensation for services; (v) a provision in which the client agrees not to assert any claim or defense otherwise available; (vi) a waiver of any provision of this section or a release of any obligation required to be performed on the part of the tax preparer; or (vii) a waiver of the right to injunctive, declaratory, or other equitable relief or relief on a class basis; or (25) if making, providing, or facilitating a refund anticipation loan, fail to provide all disclosures required by the federal Truth in Lending Act, United States Code, title 15, in a form that may be retained by the client. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025. new text end ARTICLE 5 DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION Section 1. new text begin [13.3211] DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION OFFICE OF THE INSPECTOR GENERAL; INVESTIGATIVE DATA. new text end new text begin (a) Data on persons that are collected, maintained, used, or disseminated by the Department of Education in an investigation conducted under section 127A.21 are confidential data on individuals pursuant to section 13.02, subdivision 3, or protected nonpublic data on an individual pursuant to section 13.02, subdivision 13, and shall not be disclosed except: new text end new text begin (1) pursuant to section 13.05; new text end new text begin (2) pursuant to statute or valid court order; new text end new text begin (3) to a party named in a civil or criminal proceeding for preparation of a defense; new text end new text begin (4) to an investigator acting on behalf of a county, state, or federal government, including a law enforcement officer or attorney in the investigation or prosecution of a criminal, civil, or administrative proceeding, unless the inspector general determines that disclosure may compromise an investigation; or new text end new text begin (5) to provide notices required or permitted by statute. new text end new text begin (b) The data referred to in this section shall be classified as public data upon submission to a court in a civil or criminal proceeding, or when the investigation is no longer being pursued actively, except that the data shall be disclosed as required to comply with section 6.67 or 609.456, unless chapter 13 provides otherwise. new text end new text begin (c) Notwithstanding paragraph (a), the existence of an investigation conducted by the Office of the Inspector General or withholding of payment by the commissioner may be disclosed if the commissioner, after consulting with the inspector general, determines that it will not compromise the investigation. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 13.82, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Application. This section shall apply to agencies which carry on a law enforcement function, including but not limited to municipal police departments, county sheriff departments, fire departments, the Bureau of Criminal Apprehension, the Minnesota State Patrol, the Board of Peace Officer Standards and Training, the Department of Commerce, new text begin the Office of the Inspector General within the Department of Education, new text end and county human service agency client and provider fraud investigation, prevention, and control units operated or supervised by the Department of Human Services. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 124D.111, subdivision 2a, is amended to read: Subd. 2a. Federal child and adult care food program and federal summer food service program; criteria and noticenew text begin ; board of directors; salariesnew text end . (a) The commissioner must post on the department's website eligibility criteria and application information for nonprofit organizations interested in applying to the commissioner for approval as a multisite sponsoring organization under the federal child and adult care food program and federal summer food service program. The posted criteria and information must inform interested nonprofit organizations about: (1) the criteria the commissioner uses to approve or disapprove an application, including how an applicant demonstrates financial viability for the Minnesota program, among other criteria; (2) the commissioner's process and time line for notifying an applicant when its application is approved or disapproved and, if the application is disapproved, the explanation the commissioner provides to the applicant; and (3) any appeal or other recourse available to a disapproved applicant. (b) The commissioner must evaluate financial eligibility as part of the application process. An organization applying to be a prospective nonprofit multisite sponsoring organization for the federal child and adult care food program or the federal summer food service program must provide documentation of financial viability as an organization. Documentation must include: (1) evidence that the organization has operated for at least one year and has filed at least one tax return; (2) the most recent tax return submitted by the organization and corresponding forms and financial statements; (3) a profit and loss statement and balance sheet or similar financial information; and (4) evidence that at least ten percent of the organization's operating revenue comes from sources other than the United States Department of Agriculture child nutrition program and that the organization has additional funds or a performance bond available to cover at least one month of reimbursement claims. new text begin (c) When a nonprofit organization applies for sponsorship as a multisite sponsoring organization under the federal child and adult care food program and federal summer food service program, applications are evaluated on the following criteria in addition to federal requirements: new text end new text begin (1) any sponsor that receives reimbursement over the federal single audit threshold, as defined under Code of Federal Regulations, title 2, part 200, must ensure a minimum of one full-time equivalent financial director or similar role for the organization. This position must be solely dedicated to the responsibilities of a financial director or similar role and be separate from any other position within the organization; new text end new text begin (2) volunteers must not be allowed to make organization-level decisions, monitor sites, or provide financial oversight. Board members, whether paid or unpaid, are not considered volunteers; and new text end new text begin (3) unless granted special approval by the commissioner, sponsoring organizations are limited to an annual maximum increase of 25 percent for the number of sponsored sites and total reimbursement. new text end new text begin (d) A nonprofit organization's board of directors: new text end new text begin (1) must have bylaws that outline the procedures for changing the governance structure, consistent with chapter 317A; new text end new text begin (2) must have meetings that comply with chapter 13D governing open meetings; and new text end new text begin (3) that have nonprofit multisite sponsoring organizations must publish and maintain: new text end new text begin (i) the meeting minutes of the board of directors and of members and committees having board-delegated authority within 30 days following the earlier of the date of board approval of the minutes or at the next regularly scheduled meeting and must maintain meeting minutes for at least 365 days from the date of publication; and new text end new text begin (ii) directory information for the board of directors and for the members of committees having board-delegated authority. new text end new text begin (e) The commissioner must post annually on the department's website the salary ranges for the positions of executive director, financial director, monitoring staff, administrative staff, and officer-level positions for multisite sponsoring organizations under the federal child and adult care food program and federal summer food service program. Salaries charged to the nonprofit food service fund must fall within these ranges. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 124E.02, is amended to read: 124E.02 DEFINITIONS. (a) For purposes of this chapter, the terms defined in this section have the meanings given them. (b) "Affidavit" means a written statement the authorizer submits to the commissioner for approval to establish a charter school under section 124E.06, subdivision 4, attesting to its review and approval process before chartering a school. (c) "Affiliate" means a person that directly or indirectly, through one or more intermediaries, controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with another person. (d) "Charter management organization" or "CMO" means a nonprofit entity or organization that operates or manages a charter school or a network of charter schools or can control all or substantially all of a school's education program or a school's administrative, financial, business, or operational functions. new text begin (e) "Competitive procurement process" means a process for procurement by sealed bids or by proposals under section 124E.26, subdivision 4a. new text end deleted text begin (e)deleted text end new text begin (f)new text end "Control" means the ability to affect the management, operations, or policy actions or decisions of a person, whether by owning voting securities, by contract, or otherwise. deleted text begin (f)deleted text end new text begin (g)new text end "Educational management organization" or "EMO" means a for-profit entity or organization that operates or manages a charter school or a network of charter schools or can control all or substantially all of a school's education program, or a school's administrative, financial, business, or operational functions. deleted text begin (g)deleted text end new text begin (h)new text end "Immediate family member" means any relationship by blood, marriage, adoption, or partnership of spouses, parents, grandparents, siblings, children, first cousins, aunts, uncles, grandchildren, nieces, and nephews. deleted text begin (h)deleted text end new text begin (i)new text end "Market need and demand study" means a study that includes the following for the proposed locations of the school or additional sitenew text begin that supports all of the proposed grades, sites, and programsnew text end : (1) current and projected demographic information; (2) student enrollment patterns; (3) information on existing schools and types of educational programs currently available; (4) characteristics of proposed students and families; (5) availability of properly zoned and classified facilities; and (6) quantification of existing demand for the school or site. deleted text begin (i)deleted text end new text begin (j)new text end "Person" means an individual or entity of any kind. deleted text begin (j)deleted text end new text begin (k)new text end "Related party" means an affiliate or immediate family member of the other interested party, an affiliate of an immediate family member who is the other interested party, or an immediate family member of an affiliate who is the other interested party. deleted text begin (k)deleted text end new text begin (l)new text end For purposes of this chapter, the terms defined in section 120A.05 have the same meanings. Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 124E.16, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Audit report. (a) A charter school is subject to the same financial audits, audit procedures, and audit requirements as a district, except as required under this subdivision. Audits must be conducted in compliance with generally accepted governmental auditing standards, the federal Single Audit Act, if applicable, and section 6.65 governing auditing procedures. The audit must comply with the requirements of sections 123B.75 to 123B.83 governing school district finance, except when the commissioner and authorizer approve a deviation made necessary because of school program finances. The commissioner, state auditor, legislative auditor, or authorizer may conduct financial, program, or compliance audits. A charter school in statutory operating debt under sections 123B.81 to 123B.83 must submit a plan under section 123B.81, subdivision 4. (b) The charter school must submit an audit reportnew text begin , including all supplemental information included with the audit,new text end to the commissioner and its authorizer annually by December 31. (c) The charter school, with the assistance of the auditor conducting the audit, must include with the report, as supplemental information: (1) a copy of deleted text begin a newdeleted text end new text begin anynew text end management agreement deleted text begin or an amendment to a current agreementdeleted text end with a CMO or EMO deleted text begin signed during the audit yeardeleted text end ; and (2) a copy of a service agreement or contract with a company or individual totaling over five percent of the audited expenditures for the most recent audit year. The agreements must detail the terms of the agreement, including the services provided and the annual costs for those services. (d) A charter school independent audit report shall include audited financial data of an affiliated building corporation under section 124E.13, subdivision 3, or other component unit. (e) If the audit report finds that a material weakness exists in the financial reporting systems of a charter school, the charter school must submit a written report to the commissioner explaining how the charter school will resolve that material weakness. An auditor, as a condition of providing financial services to a charter school, must agree to make available information about a charter school's financial audit to the commissioner and authorizer upon request. Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 124E.16, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Authorizer performance evaluation report. new text end new text begin (a) A charter school must publish on its website the formal written performance evaluation from its authorizer and disseminate the evaluation to enrolled families in languages parents understand. new text end new text begin (b) Evaluations must be published on the charter school's website within 15 business days of receipt of the evaluation by the charter school. new text end Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 124E.26, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Required policy components. A charter school procurement policy must at a minimum include: (1) conflict of interest provisions consistent with section 124E.14; (2) thresholds for purchases by employees without board approval; (3) thresholds for purchases that require competitive deleted text begin biddingdeleted text end new text begin procurement new text end processesnew text begin as defined in section 124E.02, paragraph (e)new text end , except that a competitive deleted text begin biddingdeleted text end new text begin procurement new text end process must occur for any procurement estimated to exceed $25,000; and (4) a prohibition on breaking up a procurement into smaller components to avoid the thresholds established in clauses (2) and (3). new text begin Notwithstanding clause (3), for a procurement estimated to exceed $25,000 but not $175,000, the purchase may be made either by a competitive procurement process, or by direct negotiation by obtaining two or more bids or proposals for the purchase or sale when possible and without advertising for bids or proposals or otherwise complying with the requirements of a competitive procurement process. If a procurement is estimated to exceed $175,000, a competitive procurement process must occur. new text end Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 124E.26, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 4a. new text end new text begin Competitive procurement. new text end new text begin (a) "Procurement by sealed bids" means a process in which bids are publicly solicited and a firm fixed price contract by lump sum or unit price is awarded to the responsible bidder whose bid, conforming with all material terms and conditions of the invitation for bids, is the lowest in price. If sealed bids are used, the following requirements apply: new text end new text begin (1) bids must be solicited from an adequate number of qualified sources, providing bidders sufficient response time prior to the date set for opening bids; new text end new text begin (2) the invitation for bids, which includes any specifications and pertinent attachments, must define the items or services in order for the bidder to properly respond; new text end new text begin (3) all bids will be opened at the time and place prescribed in the invitation for bids, and the bids must be opened publicly; new text end new text begin (4) a firm fixed price contract award will be made in writing to the lowest responsive and responsible bidder. Where specified in bidding documents, factors such as discounts, transportation cost, and life cycle costs must be considered in determining which bid is lowest. Payment discounts will only be used to determine the low bid when prior experience indicates that the discounts are usually taken advantage of; new text end new text begin (5) any or all bids may be rejected if there is a sound documented reason; and new text end new text begin (6) in order for a sealed bid to be feasible, the following conditions must be present: new text end new text begin (i) a complete, adequate, and realistic specification or purchase description is available; new text end new text begin (ii) two or more responsible bidders are willing and able to compete effectively for the business; and new text end new text begin (iii) the procurement lends itself to a firm fixed price contract and the selection of the successful bidder can be made principally on the price. new text end new text begin (b) "Procurement by proposals" means a process in which either a fixed price or cost-reimbursement type contract is awarded. Proposals are generally used when conditions are not appropriate for the use of sealed bids. They are awarded in accordance with the following requirements: new text end new text begin (1) requests for proposals must be publicized and identify all evaluation factors and their relative importance. Proposals must be solicited from an adequate number of qualified offerors. Any response to publicized requests for proposals must be considered to the maximum extent practical; new text end new text begin (2) the charter school must have a written method for conducting technical evaluations of the proposals received and for making selections; and new text end new text begin (3) contracts must be awarded to the responsible offeror whose proposal is most advantageous to the charter school, with price and other factors considered. new text end Sec. 9. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 124E.26, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Reduction in aid. If a charter school makes a purchase new text begin with a policy not consistent with this section or new text end without a procurement policy adopted by the school's boardnew text begin ,new text end or makes a purchase not in conformity with the school's procurement policy, the commissioner may reduce that charter school's state aid in an amount equal to the purchase. Sec. 10. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 127A.21, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Establishment of Office of the Inspector General; powers; duties. The commissioner must establish within the department an Office of the Inspector General. The inspector general shall report directly to the commissioner. The Office of the Inspector General is charged with protecting the integrity of the department and the state by detecting and preventing fraud, new text begin theft, new text end waste, and abuse in department programs. The Office of the Inspector General must conduct independent and objective investigations to promote the integrity of the department's programs and operations. When fraudnew text begin , theft,new text end or other misuse of public funds is detected, the Office of the Inspector General must report it to the appropriate law enforcement entity and collaborate and cooperate with law enforcement to assist in the investigation and any subsequent civil and criminal prosecution. Sec. 11. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 127A.21, subdivision 1a, is amended to read: Subd. 1a. Definitions. (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. (b) "Abuse" means actions that may, directly or indirectly, result in unnecessary costs to department programs. Abuse may involve paying for items or services when there is no legal entitlement to that paymentdeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ,new text end new text begin or behavior that is deficient or improper when compared with behavior that a prudent person would consider a reasonable and necessary business practice given the facts and circumstances. Abuse includes but is not limited to:new text end new text begin (1) obtaining or attempting to obtain department program funds when required information is missing or incorrect; new text end new text begin (2) failing to correct errors in the filing or maintenance of records in a timely manner after a request by the department; new text end new text begin (3) obtaining or attempting to obtain department program funds that overstate the level or amount that is allowed to be reimbursed under law, program rules, or contract; new text end new text begin (4) obtaining or attempting to obtain grant funds from the department program by means that are not allowed or do not comply with grant requirements; new text end new text begin (5) failing to disclose or make available requested records to the department pursuant to law, program rules, or contract; new text end new text begin (6) refusing to provide access to records as required by subdivision 4; new text end new text begin (7) failing to keep or maintain records as required by law, rule, or contract; and new text end new text begin (8) a program participant seeking department program funds after being excluded. new text end (c) "Department program" means a program funded by the Department of Education that involves the transfer or disbursement of public funds or other resources to a program participant. "Department program" includes state and federal aids or grants received by a school district or charter school or other program participant. new text begin (d) "Excluded" means removed by any means from a program administered by a Minnesota state agency or federal agency. new text end deleted text begin (d)deleted text end new text begin (e)new text end "Fraud" means an intentional or deliberate act to deprive another of property or money or to acquire property or money by deception or other unfair means. Fraud includes intentionally submitting false information to the department for the purpose ofnew text begin eithernew text end obtaining a greater compensation or benefit than that to which the deleted text begin persondeleted text end new text begin program participantnew text end is legally entitlednew text begin or hiding the misuse of fundsnew text end . deleted text begin Fraud also includes failure to correct errors in the maintenance of records in a timely manner after a request by the department.deleted text end new text begin Fraud also includes acts that constitute a crime against any program, or attempts or conspiracies to commit those crimes, including but not limited to the following:new text end new text begin (1) theft in violation of section 609.52; new text end new text begin (2) perjury in violation of section 609.48; and new text end new text begin (3) aggravated forgery and forgery in violation of sections 609.625 and 609.63. new text end deleted text begin (e)deleted text end new text begin (f)new text end "Investigation" means an audit, investigation, proceeding, or inquiry by the Office of the Inspector General related to a program participant in a department program. deleted text begin (f)deleted text end new text begin (g)new text end "Program participant" means any entity or person, including associatednew text begin entities ornew text end persons, that receives, disburses, or has custody of funds or other resources transferred or disbursed under a department program.new text begin Associated persons or entities include but are not limited to vendors or other entities or persons that contract with recipients of department program funds.new text end new text begin (h) "Theft" means the act defined in section 609.52, subdivision 2. new text end deleted text begin (g)deleted text end new text begin (i)new text end "Waste" means practices that, directly or indirectly, result in unnecessary costs to department programs, such as misusing resources.new text begin Waste includes an attempt or act using or expending resources carelessly, extravagantly, or to no purpose.new text end deleted text begin (h)deleted text end new text begin (j)new text end For purposes of this section, neither "fraud,"new text begin "theft,"new text end "waste," nor "abuse" includes decisions on instruction, curriculum, personnel, or other discretionary policy decisions made by a school district, charter school, cooperative unit as defined by section 123A.24, subdivision 2, or any library, library system, or library district defined in section 134.001. Sec. 12. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 127A.21, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Access to records. (a) For purposes of an investigation, and regardless of the data's classification under chapter 13, the Office of the Inspector General shall have access to all relevant books, accounts, documents, data, and property related to department programs that are maintained by a program participant, charter school, or government entity as defined by section 13.02. (b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a), the Office of the Inspector General must issue a subpoena under subdivision 3 in order to access routing and account numbers to which Department of Education funds have been disbursed. (c) Records requested by the Office of the Inspector General under this subdivision shall be provided in a format, place, and time frame reasonably requested by the Office of the Inspector General. (d) The department may enter into specific agreements with other state agencies related to records requests by the Office of the Inspector General. new text begin (e) In an investigation, program participants must give the Office of the Inspector General immediate access without prior notice to any locations of potential record storage and the records themselves, whether physical or electronic, during regular business hours, and to any records related to a department program. Denying the Office of the Inspector General access to requested records is cause for immediate suspension of payment. new text end new text begin (f) The Office of the Inspector General, at its own expense, may photocopy or otherwise duplicate any record related to a department program. Photocopying or electronic duplication shall be done on the program participant's premises when immediate access is requested, unless removal is specifically permitted by the program participant. If requested, a program participant must help the Office of the Inspector General duplicate any department program record or other records related to a department program's operation, including hard copies or electronically stored data, on the day when access is requested. new text end Sec. 13. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 127A.21, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Sanctions; appeal. (a) This subdivision does not authorize any sanction that reduces, pauses, or otherwise interrupts state or federal aid to a school district, charter school, cooperative unit as defined by section 123A.24, subdivision 2, or any library, library system, or library district defined in section 134.001. (b) The inspector general may recommend that the commissioner impose appropriate deleted text begin temporarydeleted text end sanctionsdeleted text begin , including withholding of payments under the department program,deleted text end on a program participant deleted text begin pending an investigation by the Office of the Inspector Generaldeleted text end if: deleted text begin (1) during the course of an investigation, the Office of the Inspector General finds credible indicia of fraud, waste, or abuse by the program participant; deleted text end deleted text begin (2)deleted text end new text begin (1)new text end there has been a criminal, civil, or administrative adjudication of fraud,new text begin theft,new text end waste, or abuse against the program participant in Minnesota or in another state or jurisdiction;new text begin ornew text end deleted text begin (3) the program participant was receiving funds under any contract or registered in any program administered by another Minnesota state agency, a government agency in another state, or a federal agency, and was excluded from that contract or program for reasons credibly indicating fraud, waste, or abuse by the program participant; or deleted text end deleted text begin (4)deleted text end new text begin (2)new text end the program participant has a pattern of noncompliance with an investigation. (c) If an investigation finds, by a preponderance of the evidence, fraud,new text begin theft,new text end waste, or abuse by a program participant, the inspector general may, after reviewing all facts and evidence and when acting judiciously on a case-by-case basis, recommend that the commissioner impose appropriate sanctions on the program participant. (d) Unless prohibited by law, the commissioner has the authority to implement recommendations by the inspector general, including imposing appropriate sanctionsdeleted text begin , temporarily or otherwise,deleted text end on a program participant. Sanctions may include ending program participation, stopping disbursement of funds or resources, monetary recovery, and termination of department contracts with the participant for any current or future department program or contract. A sanction may be imposed for up to the longest period permitted by state or federal law. Sanctions authorized under this subdivision are in addition to other remedies and penalties available under law. (e) If the commissioner imposes sanctions on a program participant under this subdivision, the commissioner must notify the participant in writing within seven business days of imposing the sanction, unless requested in writing by a law enforcement agency to temporarily delay issuing the notice to prevent disruption of an ongoing law enforcement agency investigation. A notice of sanction must state: (1) the sanction being imposed; (2) the general allegations that form the basis for the sanction; (3) the duration of the sanction; (4) the department programs to which the sanction applies; and (5) how the program participant may appeal the sanction pursuant to paragraph (e). (f) A program participant sanctioned under this subdivision may, within 30 days after the date the notice of sanction was mailed to the participant, appeal the determination by requesting in writing that the commissioner initiate a contested case proceeding under chapter 14. The scope of any contested case hearing is limited to the sanction imposed under this subdivision. An appeal request must specify with particularity each disputed item, the reason for the dispute, and must include the name and contact information of the person or entity that may be contacted regarding the appeal. (g) The commissioner shall lift sanctions imposed under this subdivision if the Office of the Inspector General determines there is insufficient evidence of fraud,new text begin theft,new text end waste, or abuse by the program participant. The commissioner must notify the participant in writing within seven business days of lifting the sanction. Sec. 14. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 127A.21, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Data practices. (a) It is not a violation of rights conferred by chapter 13 or any other statute related to the confidentiality of government data for a government entity as defined in section 13.02 to provide data or information under this section. (b) The inspector general is subject to the Government Data Practices Act, chapter 13, and shall protect from unlawful disclosure data classified as not public. Data collected, created, received, or maintained by the inspector general relating to an deleted text begin audit,deleted text end investigation, proceeding, or inquiry are subject to deleted text begin section 13.39deleted text end new text begin sections 13.3211 and 13.82new text end . Sec. 15. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 127A.21, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. deleted text begin Retaliation,deleted text end Interference prohibited. deleted text begin (a) An employee or other individual who discloses information to the Office of the Inspector General about fraud, waste, or abuse in department programs is protected under section 181.932, governing disclosure of information by employees. deleted text end deleted text begin (b)deleted text end No state employee may interfere with or obstruct an investigation authorized by this section. Sec. 16. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 127A.21, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Immunity and confidentiality. new text end new text begin (a) A person who makes a good faith report is immune from any civil liability that might otherwise arise from reporting or participating in the investigation. Nothing in this subdivision affects an individual's or entity's responsibility for any monetary recovery under existing law or contractual obligation when receiving public funds. new text end new text begin (b) For purposes of this subdivision, "person" means a natural person. new text end new text begin (c) After an investigation is complete, the reporter's name and any identifying information must be kept confidential. The subject of the report may compel disclosure of the reporter's name only with the consent of the reporter or upon a written finding by a district court that the report was false and there is evidence that the report was made in bad faith. This subdivision does not alter disclosure responsibilities or obligations under the Rules of Criminal Procedure, except that when the identity of the reporter is relevant to a criminal prosecution the district court shall conduct an in-camera review before determining whether to order disclosure of the reporter's identity. new text end Sec. 17. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 127A.21, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Limits on receiving public funds; prohibition. new text end new text begin (a) This subdivision does not authorize any action that reduces, pauses, or otherwise interrupts state or federal aid to a school district, charter school, cooperative unit as defined in section 123A.24, subdivision 2, or any library, library system, or library district defined in section 134.001. new text end new text begin (b) For purposes of this subdivision, "program participant" includes individuals or persons who have an ownership interest in, control of, or the ability to control a program participant in a department program. new text end new text begin (c) If a program participant is excluded from a department program, the inspector general shall notify the commissioner, who shall: new text end new text begin (1) prohibit the excluded program participant from enrolling in, receiving grant money from, or registering in any other program administered by the commissioner; and new text end new text begin (2) disenroll or disqualify the excluded program participant from any other program administered by the commissioner. new text end new text begin (d) If a program participant enrolled, licensed, or receiving funds under any contract or program administered by a Minnesota state agency or federal agency is excluded from that program, the inspector general shall notify the commissioner, who may: new text end new text begin (1) prohibit the excluded program participant from enrolling in, becoming licensed, receiving grant money from, or registering in any other program administered by the commissioner; and new text end new text begin (2) disenroll or disqualify the excluded program participant from any other program administered by the commissioner. new text end new text begin (e) The duration of a prohibition, disenrollment, revocation, suspension, or disqualification under paragraph (c) must last for the longest applicable sanction or disqualifying period in effect for the program participant permitted by state or federal law. The duration of a prohibition, disenrollment, revocation, suspension, or disqualification under paragraph (d) may last up until the longest applicable sanction or disqualifying period in effect for the program participant as permitted by state or federal law. new text end Sec. 18. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 127A.21, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 10. new text end new text begin Notice. new text end new text begin Within five days of taking an action against a program participant under subdivision 9, paragraph (c) or (d), the commissioner must send notice of the action to the program participant. The notice must state: new text end new text begin (1) the basis for the action; new text end new text begin (2) the effective date of the action; new text end new text begin (3) the right to appeal the action; and new text end new text begin (4) the requirements and procedures for reinstatement. new text end Sec. 19. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 127A.21, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 11. new text end new text begin Appeal. new text end new text begin (a) Upon receipt of a notice under subdivision 10, a program participant may request a contested case hearing, as defined in section 14.02, subdivision 3, by filing with the commissioner a written request of appeal. The appeal request must be received by the commissioner no later than 30 days after the date the notification was mailed to the program participant. new text end new text begin (b) The appeal request must specify: (1) each disputed item and the reason for the dispute; (2) the authority in statute or rule upon which the program participant relies for each disputed item; (3) the name and address of the person or entity with whom contacts may be made regarding the appeal; and (4) other information required by the commissioner. new text end new text begin (c) Unless timely and proper appeal is received by the commissioner, the action of the commissioner shall be considered final and binding on the effective date of the action as stated in the notice under subdivision 10, clause (2). new text end Sec. 20. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 127A.21, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 12. new text end new text begin Withholding of payments. new text end new text begin (a) This subdivision does not authorize withholding of payments that reduces, pauses, or otherwise interrupts state or federal aid to a school district, charter school, cooperative unit as defined in section 123A.24, subdivision 2, or any library, library system, or library district defined in section 134.001. new text end new text begin (b) Except as otherwise provided by state or federal law, the inspector general shall notify and recommend to the commissioner to withhold payments to a program participant in any program administered by the commissioner, to the extent permitted under federal law, if the commissioner determines there is a credible allegation of fraud or theft for which an investigation is pending for a program administered by the department, a Minnesota state agency, or a federal agency. new text end new text begin (c) Allegations are considered credible when they have indicia of reliability and the inspector general has reviewed the evidence and acts on a case-by-case basis. A credible allegation of fraud is an allegation that has been verified by the commissioner from any source, including but not limited to: new text end new text begin (1) fraud hotline complaints; new text end new text begin (2) claims data mining; and new text end new text begin (3) patterns identified through provider audits, civil false claims cases, and investigations. new text end new text begin (d) The commissioner must send notice of the withholding of payments within five days of taking such action. The notice must: (1) state that payments are being withheld according to this paragraph; (2) set forth the general allegations as to the reasons for the withholding action, but need not disclose any specific information concerning an ongoing investigation; (3) state that the withholding is for a temporary period and cite the circumstances under which withholding will be terminated; and (4) inform the program participant of the right to submit written evidence for consideration by the commissioner. new text end new text begin (e) The withholding of payments shall not continue after the commissioner determines there is insufficient evidence of fraud by the program participant or after legal proceedings relating to the alleged fraud are completed, unless the commissioner has sent notice under subdivision 5 of the intention to take an additional action related to the program participant's participation in a program administered by the commissioner. new text end new text begin (f) The withholding of payments is a temporary action and shall not be subject to appeal under this subdivision or chapter 14. new text end Sec. 21. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 268.19, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Use of data. (a) Except as provided by this section, data gathered from any person under the administration of the Minnesota Unemployment Insurance Law are private data on individuals or nonpublic data not on individuals as defined in section 13.02, subdivisions 9 and 12, and may not be disclosed except according to a district court order or section 13.05. A subpoena is not considered a district court order. These data may be disseminated to and used by the following agencies without the consent of the subject of the data: (1) state and federal agencies specifically authorized access to the data by state or federal law; (2) any agency of any other state or any federal agency charged with the administration of an unemployment insurance program; (3) any agency responsible for the maintenance of a system of public employment offices for the purpose of assisting individuals in obtaining employment; (4) the public authority responsible for child support in Minnesota or any other state in accordance with section 518A.83; (5) human rights agencies within Minnesota that have enforcement powers; (6) the Department of Revenue to the extent necessary for its duties under Minnesota laws; (7) public and private agencies responsible for administering publicly financed assistance programs for the purpose of monitoring the eligibility of the program's recipients; (8) the Department of Labor and Industry and the Commerce Fraud Bureau in the Department of Commerce for uses consistent with the administration of their duties under Minnesota law; (9) the Department of Human Services and the Office of Inspector General and its agents within the Department of Human Services, including county fraud investigators, for investigations related to recipient or provider fraud and employees of providers when the provider is suspected of committing public assistance fraud; (10) the Department of Human Services for the purpose of evaluating medical assistance services and supporting program improvement; (11) local and state welfare agencies for monitoring the eligibility of the data subject for assistance programs, or for any employment or training program administered by those agencies, whether alone, in combination with another welfare agency, or in conjunction with the department or to monitor and evaluate the statewide Minnesota family investment program and other cash assistance programs, the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program, and the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program Employment and Training program by providing data on recipients and former recipients of Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP) benefits, cash assistance under chapter 256, 256D, 256J, or 256K, child care assistance under chapter 142E, or medical programs under chapter 256B or 256L or formerly codified under chapter 256D; (12) local and state welfare agencies for the purpose of identifying employment, wages, and other information to assist in the collection of an overpayment debt in an assistance program; (13) local, state, and federal law enforcement agencies for the purpose of ascertaining the last known address and employment location of an individual who is the subject of a criminal investigation; (14) the United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement has access to data on specific individuals and specific employers provided the specific individual or specific employer is the subject of an investigation by that agency; (15) the Department of Health for the purposes of epidemiologic investigations; (16) the Department of Corrections for the purposes of case planning and internal research for preprobation, probation, and postprobation employment tracking of offenders sentenced to probation and preconfinement and postconfinement employment tracking of committed offenders; (17) the state auditor to the extent necessary to conduct audits of job opportunity building zones as required under section 469.3201; (18) the Office of Higher Education for purposes of supporting program improvement, system evaluation, and research initiatives including the Statewide Longitudinal Education Data System; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (19) the Family and Medical Benefits Division of the Department of Employment and Economic Development to be used as necessary to administer chapter 268Bdeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (20) the Department of Education Office of the Inspector General for investigations related to fraud, theft, waste, and abuse or other misuse of public funds by a program participant in a department program pursuant to chapter 127A.21. new text end (b) Data on individuals and employers that are collected, maintained, or used by the department in an investigation under section 268.182 are confidential as to data on individuals and protected nonpublic data not on individuals as defined in section 13.02, subdivisions 3 and 13, and must not be disclosed except under statute or district court order or to a party named in a criminal proceeding, administrative or judicial, for preparation of a defense. (c) Data gathered by the department in the administration of the Minnesota unemployment insurance program must not be made the subject or the basis for any suit in any civil proceedings, administrative or judicial, unless the action is initiated by the department. ARTICLE 6 DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 13.82, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Application. This section shall apply to agencies which carry on a law enforcement function, including but not limited to municipal police departments, county sheriff departments, fire departments, the Bureau of Criminal Apprehension, the Minnesota State Patrol, the Board of Peace Officer Standards and Training, deleted text begin the Department of Commerce,deleted text end and county human service agency client and provider fraud investigation, prevention, and control units operated or supervised by the Department of Human Services. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 43A.17, subdivision 13, is amended to read: Subd. 13. Compensation for law enforcement officers. (a) For purposes of this subdivision, the term "law enforcement officers" means all licensed peace officers employed by the state who are included in the state units under section 179A.10, subdivision 2, including without limitation: Minnesota State Patrol troopers, Bureau of Criminal Apprehension agents, new text begin including Financial Crimes and Fraud Section agents, new text end and Alcohol and Gambling Enforcement agents, in the Department of Public Safety; Department of Natural Resources conservation officers; new text begin and new text end Department of Corrections Fugitive Apprehension Unit membersdeleted text begin ; and Commerce Fraud Bureau agents in the Department of Commercedeleted text end . (b) When the commissioner of management and budget negotiates a collective bargaining agreement establishing compensation for law enforcement officers, the commissioner must use compensation and benefit data from the most recent salary and benefits survey conducted pursuant to section 299D.03, subdivision 2a, to compare salaries to ensure appropriate increases are made to law enforcement officer salaries and benefits. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 45.0135, subdivision 2b, is amended to read: Subd. 2b. Duties. The new text begin commissioner of new text end commerce deleted text begin Fraud Bureau shalldeleted text end new text begin maynew text end : (1) review notices and reports deleted text begin within the Commerce Fraud Bureau's primary jurisdictiondeleted text end submitted by authorized insurers, their employees, and agents or producersnew text begin regarding insurance fraud, as defined in section 60A.951, subdivision 4new text end ; deleted text begin (2) respond to notifications or complaints within the Commerce Fraud Bureau's primary jurisdiction generated by other law enforcement agencies, state or federal governmental units, or any other person; deleted text end deleted text begin (3)deleted text end new text begin (2)new text end initiate inquiries and conduct investigations new text begin under section 45.027 new text end when the deleted text begin bureaudeleted text end new text begin commissionernew text end has reason to believe that deleted text begin an offense within the Commerce Fraud Bureau's primary jurisdictiondeleted text end new text begin insurance fraud, as defined in section 60A.951, subdivision 4,new text end has been or is being committed; and deleted text begin (4) report crimes disclosed by the Commerce Fraud Bureau's investigations to appropriate law enforcement agencies, including, but not limited to, the attorney general, county attorneys, or any other appropriate law enforcement or regulatory agency, and shall assemble evidence, prepare charges, and otherwise assist any law enforcement authority having jurisdiction. deleted text end new text begin (3) share active investigative data pursuant to section 13.39 concerning insurance fraud with the commissioner of public safety and the Bureau of Criminal Apprehension. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 45.0135, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 2g. new text end new text begin Criminal insurance fraud investigations. new text end new text begin (a) The Bureau of Criminal Apprehension shall conduct investigations of criminal insurance fraud, as defined in section 609.611, in accordance with section 299C.061. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner shall report criminal insurance fraud-related crimes disclosed by the Department of Commerce's investigations of civil insurance fraud to the Bureau of Criminal Apprehension. new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 45.0135, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Insurance fraud prevention account. The insurance fraud prevention account is created in the state treasury. Money received from assessments under deleted text begin subdivision 7deleted text end new text begin section 299C.061, subdivision 10,new text end and transferred from the automobile theft prevention account in sections 65B.84, subdivision 1, and 297I.11, subdivision 2, is deposited in the account. Money in this fund is appropriated to the commissioner of deleted text begin commercedeleted text end new text begin public safetynew text end for the purposes specified in this section and sections 60A.951 to 60A.956. Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 45.0135, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Assessment. Each insurer authorized to sell insurance in the state of Minnesota, including surplus lines carriers, and having Minnesota earned premium the previous calendar year shall remit an assessment to the commissioner new text begin of public safety new text end for deposit in the insurance fraud prevention account on or before June 1 of each year. The amount of the assessment shall be based on the insurer's total assets and on the insurer's total written Minnesota premium, for the preceding fiscal year, as reported pursuant to section 60A.13. new text begin The commissioner of public safety shall consult with the commissioner of commerce for purposes of calculating the assessment amount. new text end Beginning with the payment due on or before June 1, 2024, the assessment amount is: Total Assets Assessment Less than $100,000,000 $ 400 $100,000,000 to $1,000,000,000 $ 1,500 Over $1,000,000,000 $ 4,000 Minnesota Written Premium Assessment Less than $10,000,000 $ 400 $10,000,000 to $100,000,000 $ 1,500 Over $100,000,000 $ 4,000 For purposes of this subdivision, the following entities are not considered to be insurers authorized to sell insurance in the state of Minnesota: risk retention groups; or township mutuals organized under chapter 67A. Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 45.0135, subdivision 8, is amended to read: Subd. 8. Investigations; health-related boards. (a) The deleted text begin Commerce Fraud Bureaudeleted text end new text begin Bureau of Criminal Apprehensionnew text end may consult with the appropriate health-related board when a licensee, licensed under chapter 144E, 147, 148, 148B, or 150A, is suspected of insurance fraud. (b) The bureau shall, for any conviction involving or related to insurance, send copies of all public data in its possession to the appropriate health-related licensing board. Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 45.0135, subdivision 9, is amended to read: Subd. 9. Administrative penalty for insurance fraud. (a) The commissioner may: (1) impose an administrative penalty against any person in an amount as set forth in paragraph (b) for each intentional act of insurance fraud or substantiated acts of attempted insurance fraudnew text begin ,new text end as defined in section 60A.951, subdivision 4, committed by that person; (2) order restitution to any person suffering loss as a result of the insurance fraud; and (3) order restitution to a company for the reasonable documented cost of any investigation in connection with the insurance fraud. (b) The administrative penalty for each violation described in paragraph (a) may be no more than: (1) $20,000 if the funds or the value of the property or services wrongfully obtained exceeds $5,000; (2) $10,000 if the funds or value of the property or services wrongfully obtained exceeds $1,000, but not more than $5,000; (3) $3,000 if the funds or value of the property or services wrongfully obtained is more than $500, but not more than $1,000; and (4) $1,000 if the funds or value of the property or services wrongfully obtained is $500 or less. (c) If an administrative penalty is not paid after all rights of appeal have been waived or exhausted, the commissioner may bring a civil action in a court of competent jurisdiction to collect the administrative penalty, including expenses and litigation costs, reasonable attorney fees, and interest. (d) This section does not affect a person's right to seek recovery, including expenses and litigation costs, reasonable attorney fees, and interest, against any person that commits insurance fraud. (e) For purposes of this subdivision, "insurance fraud" has the meaning given in section 60A.951, subdivision 4. (f) Hearings under this subdivision must be conducted in accordance with chapter 14 and any other applicable law. (g) All revenues from penalties, expenses, costs, fees, and interest collected under paragraphs (a) to (c) shall be deposited deleted text begin indeleted text end new text begin intonew text end the insurance fraud prevention account under deleted text begin subdivision 6deleted text end new text begin section 299C.061, subdivision 9new text end . Sec. 9. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 60A.951, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Authorized person. "Authorized person" means the county attorney, sheriff, or chief of police responsible for investigations in the county where the suspected insurance fraud occurred; the superintendent of the Bureau of Criminal Apprehension; the commissioner of commerce; deleted text begin the Commerce Fraud Bureau;deleted text end the commissioner of labor and industry; the attorney general; or any duly constituted criminal investigative department or agency of the United States. Sec. 10. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 60A.952, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Notice to and cooperation with the deleted text begin Commerce Fraud Bureaudeleted text end new text begin Bureau of Criminal Apprehensionnew text end . Any insurer or insurance professional that has reasonable belief that an act of insurance fraud will be, is being, or has been committed, shall furnish and disclose all relevant information to the deleted text begin Commerce Fraud Bureaudeleted text end new text begin Bureau of Criminal Apprehensionnew text end or to any authorized person and cooperate fully with any investigation conducted by the deleted text begin Commerce Fraud Bureaudeleted text end new text begin Bureau of Criminal Apprehensionnew text end . Any person that has a reasonable belief that an act of insurance fraud will be, is being, or has been committed, or any person who collects, reviews, or analyzes information concerning insurance fraud may furnish and disclose any information in its possession concerning the act to the deleted text begin Commerce Fraud Bureaudeleted text end new text begin Bureau of Criminal Apprehensionnew text end , any authorized person, or to an authorized representative of an insurer that requests the information for the purpose of detecting, prosecuting, or preventing insurance fraud. The insurer may also release relevant information to any person authorized to receive the information under section 72A.502, subdivision 2. If disclosure is made to an authorized person other than the deleted text begin Commerce Fraud Bureaudeleted text end new text begin Bureau of Criminal Apprehensionnew text end , a copy of the disclosure must be sent to the deleted text begin Commerce Fraud Bureaudeleted text end new text begin Bureau of Criminal Apprehensionnew text end . Sec. 11. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 60A.952, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Tolling of time periods. If an insurer has a reasonable or probable cause to believe that an insurance fraud has been committed in connection with an insurance claim, and has properly notified the deleted text begin Commerce Fraud Bureaudeleted text end new text begin Bureau of Criminal Apprehensionnew text end of its suspicions according to subdivision 2, the notification tolls any applicable time period in any unfair claims practices statute or related regulations, or any action on the claim against the insurer to whom the claim had been presented for bad faith, until 30 days after determination by the deleted text begin Commerce Fraud Bureaudeleted text end new text begin Bureau of Criminal Apprehensionnew text end and notice to the insurer that the deleted text begin divisiondeleted text end new text begin Bureau of Criminal Apprehensionnew text end will not recommend action on the claim. Sec. 12. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 60A.952, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Reward for information. The deleted text begin Commerce Fraud Bureaudeleted text end new text begin Bureau of Criminal Apprehensionnew text end , in cooperation with authorized insurers and insurance professionals, may establish a voluntary fund to reward persons not connected with the insurance industry who provide information or furnish evidence leading to the arrest and conviction of persons responsible for insurance fraud. Sec. 13. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 60A.954, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Review. The commissioner may review each insurer's antifraud plan to determine whether it complies with the requirements of this section. If the commissioner finds that an insurer's antifraud plan does not comply with the requirements of this section, the commissioner shall disapprove the plan and send a notice of disapproval, along with the reasons for disapproval, to the insurer. An insurer whose antifraud plan has been disapproved by the commissioner shall submit a new plan to the commissioner within 60 days after the plan was disapproved. The commissioner may examine an insurer's procedures to determine whether the insurer is complying with its antifraud plan. The commissioner shall withhold from public inspection any part of an insurer's antifraud plan for so long as the commissioner deems the withholding to be in the public interest.new text begin The commissioner may share an insurer's complete antifraud plan with the Bureau of Criminal Apprehension.new text end Sec. 14. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 60A.956, is amended to read: 60A.956 OTHER LAW ENFORCEMENT AUTHORITY. Nothing in sections 60A.951 to 60A.956 preempts the authority of or relieves the duty of any other law enforcement agencies to investigate and prosecute alleged violations of law, prevents or prohibits a person from voluntarily disclosing any information concerning insurance fraud to any law enforcement agency other than the deleted text begin Commerce Fraud Bureaudeleted text end new text begin Bureau of Criminal Apprehensionnew text end , or limits any of the powers granted elsewhere by the laws of this state to the commissioner of commerce to investigate alleged violations of law and to take appropriate action. Sec. 15. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 65B.84, is amended to read: 65B.84 AUTOMOBILE THEFT PREVENTION PROGRAM. Subdivision 1. Program described; commissioner's duties; appropriation. (a) The commissioner of deleted text begin commercedeleted text end new text begin public safetynew text end shall: (1) develop and sponsor the implementation of statewide plans, programs, and strategies to combat automobile theft, improve the administration of the automobile theft laws, and provide a forum for identification of critical problems for those persons dealing with automobile theft; (2) coordinate the development, adoption, and implementation of plans, programs, and strategies relating to interagency and intergovernmental cooperation with respect to automobile theft enforcement; (3) annually audit the plans and programs that have been funded in whole or in part to evaluate the effectiveness of the plans and programs and withdraw funding should the commissioner determine that a plan or program is ineffective or is no longer in need of further financial support from the fund; (4) develop a plan of operation including: (i) an assessment of the scope of the problem of automobile theft, including areas of the state where the problem is greatest; (ii) an analysis of various methods of combating the problem of automobile theft; (iii) a plan for providing financial support to combat automobile theft; (iv) a plan for eliminating car hijacking; and (v) an estimate of the funds required to implement the plan; and (5) distribute money, in consultation with the commissioner of deleted text begin public safetydeleted text end new text begin commercenew text end , pursuant to subdivision 3 from the automobile theft prevention special revenue account for automobile theft prevention activities, including: (i) paying the administrative costs of the program; (ii) providing financial support to the State Patrol and local law enforcement agencies for automobile theft enforcement teams; (iii) providing financial support to state or local law enforcement agencies for programs designed to reduce the incidence of automobile theft and for improved equipment and techniques for responding to automobile thefts; (iv) providing financial support to local prosecutors for programs designed to reduce the incidence of automobile theft; (v) providing financial support to judicial agencies for programs designed to reduce the incidence of automobile theft; (vi) providing financial support for neighborhood or community organizations or business organizations for programs designed to reduce the incidence of automobile theft and to educate people about the common methods of automobile theft, the models of automobiles most likely to be stolen, and the times and places automobile theft is most likely to occur; and (vii) providing financial support for automobile theft educational and training programs for state and local law enforcement officials, driver and vehicle services exam and inspections staff, and members of the judiciary. (b) The commissioner may not spend in any fiscal year more than ten percent of the money in the fund for the program's administrative and operating costs. The commissioner is annually appropriated and must distribute the amount of the proceeds credited to the automobile theft prevention special revenue account each year, less the transfer of $1,300,000 each year to the insurance fraud prevention account described in section 297I.11, subdivision 2. (c) At the end of each fiscal year, the commissioner may transfer any unobligated balances in the auto theft prevention account to the insurance fraud prevention account under section deleted text begin 45.0135, subdivision 6deleted text end new text begin 299C.061, subdivision 9new text end . (d) The commissioner must establish a library of equipment to combat automobile-related theft offenses. The equipment must be available to all law enforcement agencies upon request to support law enforcement agency efforts to combat automobile theft. Subd. 2. Annual report. By September 30 each year, the commissioner new text begin of public safety new text end shall report to the governor and the chairs and ranking minority members of the house of representatives and senate committees having jurisdiction over the deleted text begin Departmentsdeleted text end new text begin Departmentnew text end of deleted text begin Commerce anddeleted text end Public Safety on the activities and expenditures in the preceding year. Subd. 3. Grant criteria; application. (a) A county attorney's office, law enforcement agency, neighborhood organization, community organization, or business organization may apply for a grant under this section. Multiple offices or agencies within a county may apply for a grant under this section. (b) The commissionernew text begin of public safetynew text end , in consultation with the commissioner of deleted text begin public safetydeleted text end new text begin commercenew text end , must develop criteria for the fair distribution of grants from the automobile theft prevention account that address the following factors: (1) the number of reported automobile thefts per capita in a city, county, or region, not merely the total number of automobile thefts; (2) the population of the jurisdiction of the applicant office or agency; (3) the total funds distributed within a county or region; and (4) the statewide interest in automobile theft reduction. (c) The commissioner may give priority to: (1) offices and agencies engaged in a collaborative effort to reduce automobile theft; and (2) counties or regions with the greatest rates of automobile theft. (d) The minimum amount of a grant award is $5,000. After considering the automobile theft rate and total population of an applicant's jurisdiction, if a grant award, as determined under the criteria and priorities in this subdivision, would be less than $5,000, it must not be awarded. Subd. 4. Advisory board; creation; membership. An Automobile Theft Prevention Advisory Board is established to advise the commissioner on the distribution of grants under this section. The board must consist of seven members appointed by the commissioner new text begin of public safety new text end and must include representatives of law enforcement, prosecuting agencies, automobile insurers, and the public. The commissioner must annually select a chair from among its members. Subd. 5. Definition. For purposes of this section, "automobile theft" includes automobile-related theft. Sec. 16. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 268.19, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Use of data. (a) Except as provided by this section, data gathered from any person under the administration of the Minnesota Unemployment Insurance Law are private data on individuals or nonpublic data not on individuals as defined in section 13.02, subdivisions 9 and 12, and may not be disclosed except according to a district court order or section 13.05. A subpoena is not considered a district court order. These data may be disseminated to and used by the following agencies without the consent of the subject of the data: (1) state and federal agencies specifically authorized access to the data by state or federal law; (2) any agency of any other state or any federal agency charged with the administration of an unemployment insurance program; (3) any agency responsible for the maintenance of a system of public employment offices for the purpose of assisting individuals in obtaining employment; (4) the public authority responsible for child support in Minnesota or any other state in accordance with section 518A.83; (5) human rights agencies within Minnesota that have enforcement powers; (6) the Department of Revenue to the extent necessary for its duties under Minnesota laws; (7) public and private agencies responsible for administering publicly financed assistance programs for the purpose of monitoring the eligibility of the program's recipients; (8) the Department of Labor and Industry deleted text begin and the Commerce Fraud Bureau indeleted text end new text begin ,new text end the Department of Commercenew text begin , and the Bureau of Criminal Apprehensionnew text end for uses consistent with the administration of their duties under Minnesota law; (9) the Department of Human Services and the Office of Inspector General and its agents within the Department of Human Services, including county fraud investigators, for investigations related to recipient or provider fraud and employees of providers when the provider is suspected of committing public assistance fraud; (10) the Department of Human Services for the purpose of evaluating medical assistance services and supporting program improvement; (11) local and state welfare agencies for monitoring the eligibility of the data subject for assistance programs, or for any employment or training program administered by those agencies, whether alone, in combination with another welfare agency, or in conjunction with the department or to monitor and evaluate the statewide Minnesota family investment program and other cash assistance programs, the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program, and the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program Employment and Training program by providing data on recipients and former recipients of Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP) benefits, cash assistance under chapter 256, 256D, 256J, or 256K, child care assistance under chapter 142E, or medical programs under chapter 256B or 256L or formerly codified under chapter 256D; (12) local and state welfare agencies for the purpose of identifying employment, wages, and other information to assist in the collection of an overpayment debt in an assistance program; (13) local, state, and federal law enforcement agencies for the purpose of ascertaining the last known address and employment location of an individual who is the subject of a criminal investigation; (14) the United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement has access to data on specific individuals and specific employers provided the specific individual or specific employer is the subject of an investigation by that agency; (15) the Department of Health for the purposes of epidemiologic investigations; (16) the Department of Corrections for the purposes of case planning and internal research for preprobation, probation, and postprobation employment tracking of offenders sentenced to probation and preconfinement and postconfinement employment tracking of committed offenders; (17) the state auditor to the extent necessary to conduct audits of job opportunity building zones as required under section 469.3201; (18) the Office of Higher Education for purposes of supporting program improvement, system evaluation, and research initiatives including the Statewide Longitudinal Education Data System; and (19) the Family and Medical Benefits Division of the Department of Employment and Economic Development to be used as necessary to administer chapter 268B. (b) Data on individuals and employers that are collected, maintained, or used by the department in an investigation under section 268.182 are confidential as to data on individuals and protected nonpublic data not on individuals as defined in section 13.02, subdivisions 3 and 13, and must not be disclosed except under statute or district court order or to a party named in a criminal proceeding, administrative or judicial, for preparation of a defense. (c) Data gathered by the department in the administration of the Minnesota unemployment insurance program must not be made the subject or the basis for any suit in any civil proceedings, administrative or judicial, unless the action is initiated by the department. Sec. 17. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 268B.30, is amended to read: 268B.30 DATA PRIVACY. (a) Except as provided by this section, data collected, created, or maintained under this chapter are private data on individuals or nonpublic data not on individuals as defined in section 13.02, subdivisions 9 and 12, and must not be disclosed except according to a district court order or section 13.05. A subpoena is not considered a district court order. (b) Data classified under paragraph (a) may be disseminated to and used by the following without the consent of the subject of the data: (1) state and federal agencies specifically authorized access to the data by state or federal law; (2) the unemployment insurance division, to the extent necessary to administer the programs established under this chapter and chapter 268; (3) employers, to the extent necessary to support adjudication of application requests and to support the employer's administration of a leave of absence; (4) health care providers, to the extent necessary to support verification of health care conditions and qualifying events; (5) the public authority responsible for child support in Minnesota or any other state in accordance with section 518A.83; (6) human rights agencies within Minnesota that have enforcement powers; (7) the Department of Revenue, to the extent necessary for its duties under Minnesota laws; (8) public and private agencies responsible for administering publicly financed assistance programs for the purpose of monitoring the eligibility of the program's recipients; (9) the Department of Labor and Industry deleted text begin and the Commerce Fraud Bureau indeleted text end new text begin ,new text end the Department of Commercenew text begin , and the Bureau of Criminal Apprehensionnew text end for uses consistent with the administration of their duties under Minnesota law; (10) the Department of Human Services and the Office of Inspector General and its agents within the Department of Human Services, including county fraud investigators, for investigations related to recipient or provider fraud and employees of providers when the provider is suspected of committing public assistance fraud; (11) the Department of Public Safety for support in identity verification; (12) local, state, and federal law enforcement agencies for the purpose of ascertaining the last known address and employment location of an individual who is the subject of a criminal investigation; (13) the Department of Health for the purposes of epidemiologic investigations; (14) the Department of Corrections for the purposes of tracking incarceration of applicants; and (15) contracted third parties, to the extent necessary to aid in identity verification, adjudication, administration, and evaluation of the program. (c) Data on individuals and employers that are collected, maintained, or used by the department in an investigation under section 268B.19, 268B.21, 268B.22, or 268B.23 are confidential as to data on individuals and protected nonpublic data not on individuals as defined in section 13.02, subdivisions 3 and 13, and must not be disclosed except under statute or district court order or to a party named in a criminal proceeding, administrative or judicial, for preparation of a defense. (d) Data gathered by the department in the administration of this chapter must not be made the subject or the basis for any suit in any civil proceedings, administrative or judicial, unless the action is initiated by the department. Sec. 18. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 297I.11, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Automobile theft prevention account. A special revenue account in the state treasury shall be credited with the proceeds of the surcharge imposed under subdivision 1. Of the revenue in the account, $1,300,000 each year must be transferred to the insurance fraud prevention account under section deleted text begin 45.0135, subdivision 6deleted text end new text begin 299C.061, subdivision 9new text end . Revenues in excess of $1,300,000 each year may be used only for the automobile theft prevention program described in section 65B.84. Sec. 19. new text begin [299C.061] FINANCIAL CRIMES AND FRAUD SECTION. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Fraud involving state funded or administered programs or services" includes any violation of section 609.445, 609.465, 609.466, 609.52, 609.5523, 609.611, 609.651, 609.7475, or 609.821 involving a state agency or state funded or administered program or service. new text end new text begin (c) "Peace officer" has the meaning given in section 626.84, subdivision 1, paragraph (c). new text end new text begin (d) "State agency" has the meaning given in section 13.02, subdivision 17. new text end new text begin (e) "Superintendent" means the superintendent of the Bureau of Criminal Apprehension. new text end new text begin (f) "Section" means the Financial Crimes and Fraud Section of the Bureau of Criminal Apprehension. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Financial Crimes and Fraud Section. new text end new text begin The superintendent shall operate the Financial Crimes and Fraud Section within the Bureau of Criminal Apprehension to conduct investigations into insurance fraud, financial crimes, wage theft, and fraud involving state funded or administered programs or services. The Section shall be partially or fully comprised of licensed peace officers. Members of this section have the full authorities specified in chapter 299C and are not limited to the duties enumerated in this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Duties. new text end new text begin The Financial Crimes and Fraud Section shall: new text end new text begin (1) review notices and reports of insurance fraud and related crimes submitted by authorized insurers, their employees, and agents or producers pursuant to sections 60A.951 to 60A.956; new text end new text begin (2) initiate inquiries and conduct investigations when the Section has reason to believe that any of the following offenses have been or are being committed: new text end new text begin (i) fraud involving state funded or administered programs or services in subdivision 1, paragraph (b); new text end new text begin (ii) insurance fraud and related crimes, as defined in sections 60A.951, subdivision 4, and 609.611 and support of those activities; new text end new text begin (iii) wage theft and related crimes; and new text end new text begin (iv) any other financial crimes; and new text end new text begin (3) operate the automobile theft prevention program under section 65B.84. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Mandatory referral; duty to investigate. new text end new text begin (a) Except as provided in paragraphs (b) and (d), a state agency shall refer all suspected fraudulent activity under the provisions in subdivision 1, paragraph (b), equaling $100,000 or more, to the Section for evaluation and investigation or appropriate referral. Upon receipt of the referral, the Section shall review and, where appropriate, conduct criminal investigations into the allegations. The Section has sole discretion as to which allegations are investigated further, referred back to the reporting agency for appropriate regulatory investigation, or referred to another law enforcement agency with appropriate jurisdiction. new text end new text begin (b) When acting in a civil or criminal law enforcement capacity and permitted by applicable law or order, the attorney general may, in the attorney general's discretion, refer suspected fraudulent activity under the provisions in subdivision 1, paragraph (b), to the Section for evaluation and investigation or appropriate referral in accordance with paragraph (a). new text end new text begin (c) Notwithstanding paragraph (b), this section has no effect on the authority of the attorney general to investigate and enforce violations or suspected violations of Minnesota civil or criminal law. new text end new text begin (d) Referral to the Section under this subdivision is not required when a state agency is required to refer the fraudulent activity to the state Medicaid Fraud Control Unit in accordance with Code of Federal Regulations, title 42, section 455.21(A)(1)(a), and section 256B.04, subdivision 10. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Discretionary referral. new text end new text begin (a) A state agency may refer suspected fraud involving state funded or administered programs or services equaling less than $100,000 to the Section for investigation. Upon referral, the Section shall: new text end new text begin (1) accept the referral and, where appropriate, conduct criminal investigations into the allegations and make appropriate referrals for criminal prosecution; or new text end new text begin (2) redirect the referral to another appropriate law enforcement agency or civil investigative authority, offering assistance where appropriate. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Data-sharing authorized. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding chapter 13 or any other statute related to the classification of government data to the contrary, state agencies making a referral under subdivision 3 or 4 shall provide data related to the suspected fraudulent activity to the Section, including data classified as not public. The Section may share active criminal investigative data concerning insurance fraud with the Department of Commerce. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin State agency reporting. new text end new text begin By January 15 of each year, each state agency must report all suspected fraud incurred by the agency that involves state funded or administered programs or services equaling $10,000 or more to the Section to be summarized in the report under subdivision 8. This subdivision does not apply to information obtained by the attorney general when acting in a civil or criminal law enforcement capacity. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Annual report. new text end new text begin (a) By February 1 of each year, the superintendent shall report to the commissioner, the governor, and the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over public safety policy and finance, and commerce consumer protection policy and finance, the following information pertaining to the Section since the previous report: new text end new text begin (1) the number of investigations initiated; new text end new text begin (2) the number of allegations investigated; new text end new text begin (3) the outcomes or current status of each investigation; new text end new text begin (4) the charging decisions made by the prosecuting authority of incidents investigated by the Section; new text end new text begin (5) the number of plea agreements reached in incidents investigated by the Section; new text end new text begin (6) the number of reports received under subdivision 7; new text end new text begin (7) the number of state agency referrals to the state Medicaid Fraud Control Unit reported to the superintendent under paragraph (b); and new text end new text begin (8) any other information relevant to the Section's responsibilities. new text end new text begin (b) No later than January 15 of each odd-numbered year, each state agency that is required to make referrals to the state Medicaid Fraud Control Unit in accordance with Code of Federal Regulations, title 42, section 455.21(A)(1)(a), and section 256B.04, subdivision 10, shall report the following information to the superintendent for the two previous calendar years: new text end new text begin (1) the number of cases referred to the state Medicaid Fraud Control Unit; new text end new text begin (2) the number of referrals accepted by the state Medicaid Fraud Control Unit; and new text end new text begin (3) the number of referrals declined by the state Medicaid Fraud Control Unit. new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Funding allocation. new text end new text begin One hundred percent of the funding allocated to the Bureau of Criminal Apprehension for the assessment in subdivision 10 may only be used for the investigation of insurance fraud and related crimes, as defined in sections 60A.951, subdivision 4, and 609.611, and support of those activities. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin (a) Subdivisions 1, 2, 3, 6, and 9 are effective July 1, 2025. new text end new text begin (b) Subdivisions 4, 5, 7, and 8 are effective January 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 20. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 299C.40, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Definitions. (a) The definitions in this subdivision apply to this section. (b) "CIBRS" means the Comprehensive Incident-Based Reporting System, located in the Department of Public Safety and managed by the Bureau of Criminal Apprehension. A reference in this section to "CIBRS" includes the Bureau of Criminal Apprehension. (c) "Law enforcement agency" means a Minnesota municipal police department, the Metropolitan Transit Police, the Metropolitan Airports Police, the University of Minnesota Police Department, the Department of Corrections Fugitive Apprehension Unit, a Minnesota county sheriff's department, the Enforcement Division of the Department of Natural Resources, deleted text begin the Commerce Fraud Bureau,deleted text end the Bureau of Criminal Apprehension, or the Minnesota State Patrol. Sec. 21. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.531, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Definitions. For the purpose of sections 609.531 to 609.5318, the following terms have the meanings given them. (a) "Conveyance device" means a device used for transportation and includes, but is not limited to, a motor vehicle, trailer, snowmobile, airplane, and vessel and any equipment attached to it. The term "conveyance device" does not include property which is, in fact, itself stolen or taken in violation of the law. (b) "Weapon used" means a dangerous weapon as defined under section 609.02, subdivision 6, that the actor used or had in possession in furtherance of a crime. (c) "Property" means property as defined in section 609.52, subdivision 1, clause (1). (d) "Contraband" means property which is illegal to possess under Minnesota law. (e) "Appropriate agency" means the Bureau of Criminal Apprehension, deleted text begin the Department of Commerce Fraud Bureau,deleted text end the Minnesota Division of Driver and Vehicle Services, the Minnesota State Patrol, a county sheriff's department, the Three Rivers Park District Department of Public Safety, the Department of Natural Resources Division of Enforcement, the University of Minnesota Police Department, the Department of Corrections Fugitive Apprehension Unit, a city, metropolitan transit, or airport police department; or a multijurisdictional entity established under section 299A.642 or 299A.681. (f) "Designated offense" includes: (1) for weapons used: any violation of this chapter, chapter 152 or 624; (2) for driver's license or identification card transactions: any violation of section 171.22; and (3) for all other purposes: a felony violation of, or a felony-level attempt or conspiracy to violate, section 325E.17; 325E.18; 609.185; 609.19; 609.195; 609.2112; 609.2113; 609.2114; 609.221; 609.222; 609.223; 609.2231; 609.2335; 609.24; 609.245; 609.247; 609.25; 609.255; 609.282; 609.283; 609.322; 609.342, subdivision 1, or subdivision 1a, clauses (a) to (f) and (i); 609.343, subdivision 1, or subdivision 1a, clauses (a) to (f) and (i); 609.344, subdivision 1, or subdivision 1a, clauses (a) to (e), (h), or (i); 609.345, subdivision 1, or subdivision 1a, clauses (a) to (e), (h), and (i); 609.352; 609.42; 609.425; 609.466; 609.485; 609.487; 609.52; 609.525; 609.527; 609.528; 609.53; 609.54; 609.551; 609.561; 609.562; 609.563; 609.582; 609.59; 609.595; 609.611; 609.631; 609.66, subdivision 1e; 609.671, subdivisions 3, 4, 5, 8, and 12; 609.687; 609.821; 609.825; 609.86; 609.88; 609.89; 609.893; 609.895; 617.246; 617.247; or a gross misdemeanor or felony violation of section 609.891 or 624.7181; or any violation of section 609.324; or a felony violation of, or a felony-level attempt or conspiracy to violate, Minnesota Statutes 2012, section 609.21. (g) "Controlled substance" has the meaning given in section 152.01, subdivision 4. (h) "Prosecuting authority" means the attorney who is responsible for prosecuting an offense that is the basis for a forfeiture under sections 609.531 to 609.5318. (i) "Asserting person" means a person, other than the driver alleged to have used a vehicle in the transportation or exchange of a controlled substance intended for distribution or sale, claiming an ownership interest in a vehicle that has been seized or restrained under this section. Sec. 22. new text begin [609.5523] THEFT OF PUBLIC FUNDS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Public funds" means all general, special, permanent, trust, and other funds, regardless of source or purpose, held or administered by a government entity. new text end new text begin (c) "Government entity" has the meaning provided in section 13.02, subdivision 7a. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Acts constituting theft of public funds. new text end new text begin A person who engages in any of the following commits theft of public funds and may be sentenced as provided in subdivision 3: new text end new text begin (1) intentionally and without claim of right takes, uses, transfers, conceals, or retains possession of public funds from a government entity or a third party administering a program funded by public vendors without consent and with intent to permanently deprive the government entity of the possession of public funds; new text end new text begin (2) obtains, for the actor or another, possession or custody of public funds from a government entity or third party administering a publicly funded program by intentionally deceiving the government entity or third party with a false representation that the actor or another knows to be false, is made with intent to defraud, and does defraud the government entity or third party to whom the false representation is made. False representation includes but is not limited to: new text end new text begin (i) a promise made with intent not to perform. Failure to perform is not evidence of intent not to perform unless corroborated by other substantial evidence; or new text end new text begin (ii) the preparation or filing of a claim for reimbursement, a rate application, or a cost report that intentionally and falsely misrepresents the costs of or actual services provided by a vendor; or new text end new text begin (3) swindling, whether by artifice, trick, device, or any other means, in order to obtain public funds or publicly funded services from a government entity or a third party administering a program funded by public funds. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Sentence. new text end new text begin (a) A person who commits theft of public funds may be sentenced: new text end new text begin (1) to imprisonment for not more than 24 years or to payment of a fine of not more than $100,000, or both, if the value of property stolen is more than $35,000; new text end new text begin (2) to imprisonment for not more than 12 years or to payment of a fine of not more than $20,000, or both, if the value of the property stolen exceeds $5,000; or new text end new text begin (3) to imprisonment for not more than six years or to payment of a fine of not more than $10,000, or both, if the value of the property is more than $1,000 but not more than $5,000. new text end new text begin (b) In any prosecution for theft of public funds, the value of the money or property received by the defendant in violation of any of these provisions within any six-month period may be aggregated and the defendant charged accordingly under the provisions of this subdivision. new text end Sec. 23. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 626.05, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Peace officer. The term "peace officer," as used in sections 626.04 to 626.17, means a person who is licensed as a peace officer in accordance with section 626.84, subdivision 1, and who serves as a sheriff, deputy sheriff, police officer, conservation officer, agent of the Bureau of Criminal Apprehension, agent of the Division of Alcohol and Gambling Enforcement, deleted text begin peace officer of the Commerce Fraud Bureau,deleted text end University of Minnesota peace officer, Metropolitan Transit police officer, Minnesota Department of Corrections Fugitive Apprehension Unit member, State Patrol trooper as authorized by section 299D.03, or railroad peace officer as authorized by section 219.995 and United States Code, title 49, section 28101. Sec. 24. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 626.84, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Definitions. For purposes of sections 626.84 to 626.863, the following terms have the meanings given them: (a) "Board" means the Board of Peace Officer Standards and Training. (b) "Director" means the executive director of the board. (c) "Peace officer" means: (1) an employee or an elected or appointed official of a political subdivision or law enforcement agency who is licensed by the board, charged with the prevention and detection of crime and the enforcement of the general criminal laws of the state and who has the full power of arrest, and shall also include the Minnesota State Patrol, agents of the Division of Alcohol and Gambling Enforcement, state conservation officers, Metropolitan Transit police officers, Department of Corrections Fugitive Apprehension Unit officers, deleted text begin Department of Commerce Fraud Bureau Unit officers,deleted text end the statewide coordinator of the Violent Crime Coordinating Council, and railroad peace officers as authorized by section 219.995 and United States Code, title 49, section 28101; and (2) a peace officer who is employed by a law enforcement agency of a federally recognized tribe, as defined in United States Code, title 25, section 450b(e), and who is licensed by the board. (d) "Part-time peace officer" means an individual licensed by the board whose services are utilized by law enforcement agencies no more than an average of 20 hours per week, not including time spent on call when no call to active duty is received, calculated on an annual basis, who has either full powers of arrest or authorization to carry a firearm while on active duty. The term shall apply even though the individual receives no compensation for time spent on active duty, and shall apply irrespective of the title conferred upon the individual by any law enforcement agency. (e) "Reserve officer" means an individual whose services are utilized by a law enforcement agency to provide supplementary assistance at special events, traffic or crowd control, and administrative or clerical assistance, and shall include reserve deputies, special deputies, mounted or unmounted patrols, and all other employees or volunteers performing reserve officer functions. A reserve officer's duties do not include enforcement of the general criminal laws of the state, and the officer does not have full powers of arrest or authorization to carry a firearm on duty. (f) "Law enforcement agency" means: (1) a unit of state or local government that is authorized by law to grant full powers of arrest and to charge a person with the duties of preventing and detecting crime and enforcing the general criminal laws of the state; (2) subject to the limitations in section 626.93, a law enforcement agency of a federally recognized tribe, as defined in United States Code, title 25, section 450b(e); and (3) subject to the limitation of section 219.995, a railroad company. (g) "Professional peace officer education" means a postsecondary degree program, or a nondegree program for persons who already have a college degree, that is offered by a college or university in Minnesota, designed for persons seeking licensure as a peace officer, and approved by the board. (h) "Railroad peace officer" means an individual as authorized under United States Code, title 49, section 28101: (1) employed by a railroad for the purpose of aiding and supplementing law enforcement agencies in the protection of property owned by or in the care, custody, or control of a railroad and to protect the persons and property of railroad passengers and employees; and (2) licensed by the board. Sec. 25. new text begin REVISOR INSTRUCTION.new text end new text begin The revisor of statutes shall renumber the subdivisions in column A with the number listed in column B. The revisor shall also make necessary cross-reference changes in Minnesota Statutes and Minnesota Rules consistent with the renumbering. new text end new text begin Column A new text end new text begin Column B new text end new text begin section 45.0135, subdivision 6 new text end new text begin section 299C.061, subdivision 9 new text end new text begin section 45.0135, subdivision 7 new text end new text begin section 299C.061, subdivision 10 new text end new text begin section 45.0135, subdivision 8 new text end new text begin section 299C.061, subdivision 11 new text end new text begin section 45.0135, subdivision 9 new text end new text begin section 299C.061, subdivision 12 new text end new text begin section 299C.061, subdivision 9 new text end new text begin section 299C.061, subdivision 13 new text end Sec. 26. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, sections 45.0135, subdivisions 2a, 2c, 2d, 2e, 2f, 3, 4, and 5; and 325E.21, subdivision 2b, new text end new text begin are repealed. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: 25-04814 45.0135 COMMERCE FRAUD BUREAU. Subd. 2a. Authorization. (a) The commissioner may appoint peace officers, as defined in section 626.84, subdivision 1, paragraph (c), and establish a law enforcement agency, as defined in section 626.84, subdivision 1, paragraph (f), known as the Commerce Fraud Bureau, to conduct investigations, and to make arrests under sections 629.30 and 629.34. The primary jurisdiction of the law enforcement agency is limited to offenses with a nexus to insurance-related crimes or financial crimes. (b) Upon request and at the commissioner's discretion, the Commerce Fraud Bureau may respond to a law enforcement agency's request to exercise law enforcement duties in cooperation with the law enforcement agency that has jurisdiction over the particular matter. (c) The Commerce Fraud Bureau must allocate at least 70 percent of its work to insurance fraud, as defined in sections 60A.951, subdivision 4, and 609.611. Subd. 2c. Arrests and investigations. The initial processing of a person arrested by the Commerce Fraud Bureau for an offense within its jurisdiction is the responsibility of the bureau unless otherwise directed by the law enforcement agency with primary jurisdiction. Subsequent investigation shall be the responsibility of the bureau unless otherwise directed by the law enforcement agency with primary jurisdiction. At the request of the primary jurisdiction, the bureau may assist in a subsequent investigation being carried out by the primary jurisdiction. Subd. 2d. Policy for notice of investigations. The Commerce Fraud Bureau must develop a policy for notifying the law enforcement agency with primary jurisdiction when it has initiated investigation of any person within the jurisdiction of that agency. Subd. 2e. Chief law enforcement officer. The commissioner shall appoint a peace officer employed full time to be the chief law enforcement officer and to be responsible for the management of the Commerce Fraud Bureau. The chief law enforcement officer shall possess the necessary police and management experience to manage a law enforcement agency. The chief law enforcement officer may appoint, discipline, and discharge all employees of the bureau. All police managerial and supervisory personnel must be full-time employees of the bureau. Supervisory personnel must be on duty and available any time peace officers of the bureau are on duty. Subd. 2f. Compliance. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the Commerce Fraud Bureau shall comply with all statutes and administrative rules relating to the operation and management of a law enforcement agency. Subd. 3. Evidence, documentation, and related materials. If the bureau seeks evidence, documentation, and related materials pertinent to an investigation, and the matter is located outside of this state, the bureau may designate representatives, including officials of the state where the matter is located, to secure the matter or inspect the matter on its behalf. Subd. 4. Confidentiality and immunity. The provisions of chapter 13, including, but not limited to, section 13.82, apply to the classification, disclosure, and collection of data relating to the Commerce Fraud Bureau. Subd. 5. Annual report on activities and cost-effectiveness. The Commerce Fraud Bureau shall maintain records and information in order to produce an annual report of its activities as may be prescribed by the commissioner of commerce. The commissioner shall report annually to the house of representatives and senate standing committees with jurisdiction over insurance issues as to the activities of the bureau and the cost-effectiveness of the programs established by the bureau. 245G.01 DEFINITIONS. Subd. 20d. Skilled treatment services. "Skilled treatment services" has the meaning provided in section 254B.01, subdivision 10. 245G.07 TREATMENT SERVICE. Subd. 2. Additional treatment service. A license holder may provide or arrange the following additional treatment service as a part of the client's individual treatment plan: (1) relationship counseling provided by a qualified professional to help the client identify the impact of the client's substance use disorder on others and to help the client and persons in the client's support structure identify and change behaviors that contribute to the client's substance use disorder; (2) therapeutic recreation to allow the client to participate in recreational activities without the use of mood-altering chemicals and to plan and select leisure activities that do not involve the inappropriate use of chemicals; (3) stress management and physical well-being to help the client reach and maintain an appropriate level of health, physical fitness, and well-being; (4) living skills development to help the client learn basic skills necessary for independent living; (5) employment or educational services to help the client become financially independent; (6) socialization skills development to help the client live and interact with others in a positive and productive manner; (7) room, board, and supervision at the treatment site to provide the client with a safe and appropriate environment to gain and practice new skills; and (8) peer recovery support services must be provided by a recovery peer qualified according to section 245I.04, subdivision 18. Peer recovery support services must be provided according to sections 254B.05, subdivision 5, and 254B.052. 254B.01 DEFINITIONS. Subd. 5. Local agency. "Local agency" means the agency designated by a board of county commissioners, a local social services agency, or a human services board authorized under section 254B.03, subdivision 1, to determine financial eligibility for the behavioral health fund. 254B.04 ELIGIBILITY FOR BEHAVIORAL HEALTH FUND SERVICES. Subd. 2a. Eligibility for room and board services for persons in outpatient substance use disorder treatment. A person eligible for room and board services under section 254B.05, subdivision 5, paragraph (b), must score at level 4 on assessment dimensions related to readiness to change, relapse, continued use, or recovery environment in order to be assigned to services with a room and board component reimbursed under this section. Whether a treatment facility has been designated an institution for mental diseases under United States Code, title 42, section 1396d, shall not be a factor in making placements. 325E.21 DEALERS IN SCRAP METAL; RECORDS, REPORTS, AND REGISTRATION. Subd. 2b. Catalytic converter theft prevention pilot project. (a) The catalytic converter theft prevention pilot project is created to deter the theft of catalytic converters by marking them with vehicle identification numbers or other unique identifiers. (b) The commissioner shall establish a procedure to mark the catalytic converters of vehicles most likely to be targeted for theft with unique identification numbers using labels, engraving, theft deterrence paint, or other methods that permanently mark the catalytic converter without damaging its function. (c) The commissioner shall work with law enforcement agencies, insurance companies, and scrap metal dealers to identify vehicles that are most frequently targeted for catalytic converter theft and to establish the most effective methods for marking catalytic converters. (d) Materials purchased under this program may be distributed to dealers, as defined in section 168.002, subdivision 6, automobile repair shops and service centers, law enforcement agencies, and community organizations to arrange for the marking of the catalytic converters of vehicles most likely to be targeted for theft at no cost to the vehicle owners. (e) The commissioner may prioritize distribution of materials to areas experiencing the highest rates of catalytic converter theft. (f) The commissioner must make educational information resulting from the pilot program available to law enforcement agencies and scrap metal dealers and is encouraged to publicize the program to the general public. (g) The commissioner shall include a report on the pilot project in the report required under section 65B.84, subdivision 2. The report must describe the progress, results, and any findings of the pilot project including the total number of catalytic converters marked under the program, and, to the extent known, whether any catalytic converters marked under the pilot project were stolen and the outcome of any criminal investigation into the thefts.